http://www.archive.org/stream/metaphysicalelem00procuoft/metaphysicalelem00procuoft_djvu.txt

    (logo)   	
Web
Moving Images
Texts
Audio
Software
Education
Patron Info
About IA
	(navigation image)
Home 	American Libraries | Canadian Libraries | Universal Library | Project Gutenberg | Biodiversity Heritage Library | Children's Library | Additional Collections

Search: Advanced Search
	Anonymous User (login or join us)	Upload
See other formats
Full text of "Metaphysical elements"


iCO 



631 ns 

/ j a D fa- 



Metaphysical Slements 



Translated from th^e Original GreeK 

T H O S. M. J O H N S O N 
Editor of The Platonist 



"Virtuous, therefore, is the man who relieves ike 
corporeal wants of others, who wipes away the tear 
of sorrow, and gives agony repose; but more virtu 
ous he who, by disseminating wisdom, expels ig 
norance from the soul, and thus benefits the im 
mortal part of man. For it may indeed be truly 
said, that he who bus not even a knowledge of com 
mon things is a brute among men; that he who lias 
an accurate knowledge of human concerns alone 
is a man among brutes; but that he who knows all 
that can be known by intellectual energy is a God 
among men." 



i ! 

OSCEOLA. MISSOURI, U.S.A. V [ 

1 909 



TO 
WILLIAM T. HARRIS, LL. D., 

The Greatest American Thinker, 
who for over fifty years has battled in de 
fense of God, Freedom and Immortality, against 
sottish atheists and materialists, this book is dedi 
cated as an expression of admiration and friendship. 



I N TR OD U CT I O N. 

Proclus, the famous philosopher, mathematician 
and poet, came into the world of time and sense on the 
8th. day of February, A. D. 410, at Byzantium, and mi 
grated from this physical life on April the i;th. 485 A. 
D. 1 His parents, Patricias and Marcella, were Lyci- 
ans and of an illustrious family. He was taken immed 
iately after his birth to their native country, to the 
city of Xanthus, which was consecrated to Apollo. And 
this happened to him by a certain divine providence: 
for it was necessary that he who was to be the leader 
of all sciences should be educated under the presiding 
Deity of the Muses. He received his elementary edu 
cation in Lycia, and then went to Alexandria, in Egypt, 
and became a pupil of Leonas the rhetorician, and 

Orion the orammarian. j-] e likewise attended the 

fc&gt; 

schools of the Roman teachers, and acquired an accu 
rate knowledge: of the Latin language. But his tutelar 
Goddess exhorted him to study philosophy, and to go 
to the Athenian schools. In obedience to this exhorta 
tion he attended the lectures of Olympiodorus, an emi 
nent Peripatetic, in order to learn the doctrine of Aris 
totle; and he was instructed in mathematical disciplines 
by Hero. On one occasion, after hearing a lecture by 
Olympiodorus, a man who was gifted with much elo- 

1 The following sketch of Proclus is taken almost verbatim 
from Marinus Life of his Master. This biography is an admir 
able production, and gives us much curious and interesting in 
formation about the philosophic life of the Successors of Plato. It 
is unfortunate that Taylor s English version of it is practically in 
accessible. (It was printed in 1792.) The original text was edited 
by Fabricius, Hamburg, 1700, Lond., 1703; by Boissonade, Leip.. 
1814, and in the Cobet edition of Diogenes Laertius, Paris, 1850; 
and by Cousin, in his Procli Opera Inedita, Paris, 1864, 



II 

quence, and who, by the rapidity of his speech and the 
depth of his subject was understood by but very few 
of his auditors, Proclus repeated to his companions the 
lecture nearly word for word, though the discourse was 
copious. He comprehended with great facility the 
writings of Aristotle pertaining to rational philosophy, 
though the bare reading of them is difficult to those 
who attempt the task. After learning all that his 
Alexandrian masters could teach him, he went to 
Athens accompanied by the Gods who preside over 
eloquence and philosophy, and by beneficent daemons. 
For that he might preserve the genuine and entire suc 
cession of Plato, he was brought by the Gods to the 
city of the guardian (Athene) of Philosophy. Hence 
Proclus was called by way of preeminence the Pla 
tonic Successor. At Athens he became the pupil of 
the first of philosophers, Syrianusr the son of Philox- 
enus, who not only taught him but made him the com 
panion of his philosophic life, having found him such an 
auditor and successor as he had a long time sought for, 
and one who was capable of apprehending a multitude 
of disciplines and divine dogmas. In less than two 
years, therefore, Proclus read with Syrianus all the 
works of Aristotle, viz. his Logic, Ethics, Politics, Phys 
ics, and Theological Science. And being sufficiently 
instructed in these as in certain proteleia? /. &lt;?., things 

2 This truly great man appears to have been the first who 
thoroughly penetrated the profundity contained in the writings of 
the more ancient philosophers, contemporary with and prior to 
Plato, and to have demonstrated the admirable agreement of 
their doctrines with each other. Unfortunately but few of his 
works are extant. T. 

3 Aristotle s philosophy when compared with the discipline of 
Plato is, I think, deservedly considered in this place as bearing 
the relation of the proteleia to the epopteia in sacred mysteries. 
Now the proteleia, / *. . things previous to perfection, belong 1 to 



preparatory to initiation, and lesser mysteries Syrianus 
led him to the sacred discipline of Plato, in an orderly 
progression, and not, according to the Chaldean Oracle, 
with a transcendent foot. And he likewise enabled 
Proclus to survey with him truly divine mysteries, with 

the initiated, and the mystics; the former of whom were intro 
duced into some lighter ceremonies only, but the mystics were 
permitted to be present with certain preliminary and lesser 
sacred concerns. On the other hand the epoptas were admitted 
into the sanctuary of the greater sacred rites, and became specta 
tors of the symbols and more interior ceremonies. Aristotle indeed 
appears to be every where an enemy to the doctrine of ideas, as un 
derstood by Plato, though they are doubtless the leading stars of 
all true philosophy. However the great excellence of his works, 
considered as an introduction to the divine theology of Plato, de 
serves the most unbounded Commendation. Agreeable to this Da- 
mascius informs us that Isidorus the philosopher, "grasped only 
slightly the rhetorical and poetical arts, but devoted himself to the 
more divine philosophy of Aristotle. Discovering, however, that this 
was based more on necessary reasons than intuitive intellect, 
that the procedure by method was deemed sufficient, and that it 
did not entirely employ a divine or intellectual insight, he was 
but little solicitous about his doctrine. But when he tasted the 
conceptions of Plato, he did not think it worth while "to look any 
further," as Pindar says, 1 but expecting to gain his desired end 
if he could penetrate into the adyta of Plato s thought, he there 
fore directed to this purpose the whole course of his application. 
Of the most ancient philosophers, he deified Pythagoras and 
Plato, believing that they were among those winged souls which 
in the supercelestial place, in the plain of Truth, and in the 
meadow there, are nourished by divine ideas." (Photii Bibli- 
otheca, p. 337. Vol. II. ed. Bekker.)-T. 

The form of the foregoing note has been changed somewhat, 
and the quotation from Damascius extended. This note was 
written in 1792: Taylor s mature conclusion was, that the opposi 
tion of Aristotle to the Platonic doctrines, even to that of Ideas, 
was purely apparent. "He strenuously maintained that Aristotle 
was not only the pupil but in the strictest sense the holder of 
the Platonic dogmas; contrary to the ignorant and rash deduc 
tions of the moderns, who had never fully comprehended either 
master or pupil." 

4 Olymp. I. 183. 



IV 

the eyes of his soul free from material darkness, and 
with an undefiled intellectual vision. But Proclus, em 
ploying sleepless exercise and attention, both by night 
and by day, and synoptically and judiciously recording 
the discourses of Syrianus, made so great a progress in 
his studies that by the time he was twenty- eight years 
of age he had composed a multitude of works, among 
them his Commentary on the Timaeus, which is truly 
subtle and full of erudition. But from this course of 
training his manners became more adorned; and as he 
advanced in science he increased in virtue. The soul 
of Proclus, concentrating itself, and retiring into the 
depth of its essence, departed in a certain respect from 
body, while it yet appeared to be contained in its dark 
receptacle. For he possessed a Prudence, not like that 
of a civil character, which is conversant with the admin 
istration of fluctuating particulars, but Prudence itself, 
by itself pure, which is engaged in contemplating, and 
converting itself to itself, in nowise agreeing with a cor 

c&gt; O &lt;" 

poreal nature. He likewise possessed a Temperance 
free from the inferior part or body, which is not even 
moderately influenced by perturbations, but is abstracted 
from all affections. And, lastly, he acquired a Forti 
tude, which does not fear a departure from the body. 
But reason and intellect dominating in him, and the in 
ferior powers of his soul no longer opposing them 
selves to purifying Justice, his whole life was adorned 
with the divine irradiations of genuine Virtue. Proclus, 
having perfected himself in this form of the virtues, ad 
vancing as it were by the highest and most mystical 
step ascended to the greatest and most consummate 
virtues, being conducted by a prosperous nature and 
scientific discipline. For being now purified, rising 
above generation, and despising the wand or thyrsus- 
bearers in it/ he was divinely inspired about the 
5 The narthex (warifi or thrysus) is a symbol of material and. 



V 

Primal Essences, and became an inspector of the truly 
blessed spectacles which are in the Intelligible Sphere. 
It was no longer necessary for him to acquire a knowl 
edge of them by processes of reasoning and demon 
strations, but surveying them as it were by direct vision, 
and beholding by simple intuitions of the thinking 
power the paradigms in the Divine Intellect, he ob 
tained a virtue which no one would rightly call Pru 
dence, but rather Wisdom, or something even more 
venerable than this." Proclus therefore energizing ac 
cording to this virtue easily comprehended all the the 
ology of the Greeks and Barbarians, and that which is 
adumbrated in mythological fictions, and revealed it to 
those who are willing and able to understand it. He 
explained likewise every thing more enthusiastically 
than others, and brought the different theologies into 
harmony with each other. At the same time, investi 
gating the writings of the Ancients, whatever he found 
in them genuine he judiciously adopted, but every thing 

partible fabrication , because it has as it were a false form: 
for it is wood and not wood. More rightly is it so called on ac 
count of its sundered continuity, whence it is likewise a Titanic 
plant. For they hold it before Dionysus (Bacchus) instead of his 
paternal sceptre, and through this they call him into a partible 
nature. Moreover, the Titans are wand or thyrsus-bearers; and 
Prometheus concealed fire in a reed, by which we may under 
stand either that he draws down celestial light into generation, or 
leads the soul into body, or calls forth divine illumination, the 
whole of which is ungenerated, into generation. Hence Socrates 
Orphically calls the multitude thyrsus-bearers, because they live 
Titanically. Olympiodorus: Commentary on the Phaedo, p. 96, (ed. 
Finckh, Heilbron. 1847). 

6 Doubtless the fashionable philosophasters of this mater 
ialistic age will shake their empty heads over the intellectual 
training of Proclus and brand it as "mystical," but since the 
opinion of these sapient gentlemen arises from ignorance and in 
capacity it will not disturb those whose thought ranges beyond 
the barriers of sense and matter. 



VI 

of a vain and fruitless character he entirely rejected as 
erroneous. He likewise strenuously refuted by a dili 
gent examination those doctrines which were contrary 
to truth. In his associations, too, with others he power 
fully and clearly discussed the subjects presented for 
consideration, and delineated them in his writino-s. For 

t"&gt; 

he was laborious beyond measure: in one day he de 
livered five and sometimes more lectures, and wrote as 
many as seven hundred verses. . . .In the beginning of 
his forty-second year he appeared to himself to pro 
nounce with a loud voice these verses: 

Lo! on my soul a sacred fire descends, 
Whose vivid power the intellect extends; 

From whence far beaming thro dull body s night. 

It soars to aether deck V with starry light \ 

And with soft murmurs thro the azure round, 
The lucid regions of the Gods resound. 

Moreover, he clearly perceived that he belonged to 
the Hermetic chain; and was persuaded by a dream 
that he possessed the soul of Nicomachus the Pythag 
orean. 7 

Ammonius Hermeise, a genuine Platonist and like- 

7 No opinion is more celebrated than that of the metem 
psychosis of Pythagoras, but perhaps no doctrine is more gener 
ally mistaken. By most of the present day it is exploded as 
ridiculous; and the few who retain some veneration for its 
founder endeavor to destroy the literal, and to confine it to an al 
legorical meaning. By some of the ancients this mutation was 
limited to similar bodies; so that they conceived the human soul 
might transmigrate into various human bodies, but not into those 
of brutes. And this was the opinion of Hierocles, as may be 
seen in his Commentary on the Golden Verses. But why may 
not the human soul become connected with subordinate, as 
well as with superior lives, by a tendency of inclination? Do 
not similars love to be united; and is there not in all kinds of 
life something similar and common? Hence when the affec 
tions of the soul verge to a baser nature, while connected with 



VII 

wise one of the best of the Aristotelian commentators, 
says (Com. De Interpret. Aristot.) : "If we are able to add 
any thing to the elucidation of this book from recollect 
ing the interpretations of our divine teacher, Proclus 
the Platonic Successor, who possessed the power of un 
folding the opinions of the Ancients, and a scientific 
judgment of the nature of things, in the highest perfec 
tion possible to humanity, we shall be very grateful to 
the God of discourse (Hermes)." Cousin declares 
(Procli Opera, Praefatio Generalis): "Proclus was illustri 
ous as an astronomer; he was the first among the philol 
ogists of his age; he had so comprehended all religions 
in his mind, and regarded them with such equal rever- 

a human body, these affections, on the dissolution of such a 
body, become enveloped as it were in a brutal nature, and the 
rational eye in this case clouded with perturbations is oppressed 
by the irrational energies of the brute, and surveys nothing but 
the dark phantasms of a degraded imagination. But this doctrine 
is vindicated by Proclus, with his usual acuteness, in his admir 
able Commentaries on the Timseus, Lib, 5. p. 329, [Vol. III. p. 294. 
ed. Diehl], as follows: "It is usual to inquire how human souls can 
descend into brute animals. And some indeed think that there 
are certaim similitudes of men to brutes, which they call brutal 
lives: for it is not possible that a rational essence can become 
the soul of a brute. But others allow that it may be immedi 
ately sent into irrational animals, because all souls are of a similar 
form; so that they may become wolves and leopards and mollusca. 
But true reason indeed asserts that the human soul may enter 
into brutes, yet in such a manner that it may retain its own 
proper life; the soul riding as it were on and bound by sympathy 
to the brutal nature. And that this is the only mode of insinua 
tion we have proved by a multitude of arguments, in our Com 
mentaries on the Phsedrus. If however it be requisite to remind 
the reader that this is the opinion of Piato, we may observe that 
in his Republic he says that the soul of Thersites assumed the na 
ture of an ape, but not the body of an ape; and in the Phsedrus 
that the soul descends into a brutal life, but not into a brutal 
body. For the life is conjoined to its proper soul. And in this 
place he says that it is changed into a brutal nature. For a 
brutal nature is not, a brutal body, but a brutal life." T. 



VIII 

ence, that he was as it were the hierophant of the whole 
universe: nor was it wonderful that a man possessing 
such a profound knowledge of nature and science 
should have this initiation into all sacred mysteries. . . . 
As he was the head of the Athenian School and of all 
later philosophy, so I may affirm that all the earlier is 
found gathered up in him, and that he may be taken as 
the one interpreter of the whole philosophy of the 
Greeks. . . .1 shall set it down as an established fact 
that nothing great was thought out by lamblichus, Por 
phyry, and Plotinus, either in Ethics, Metaphysics or 
Physics, which is not found expressed more clearly and 
methodically in Proclus. . . .The threefold division of 
Greek Philosophy may be reduced ultimately to one, 
which being the same always, by a natural and certain 
progress enlarges and unfolds itself, and moves on 
through three stages intimately connected, the first be 
ing contained in the second, the second in the third, so 
that the man who after the lapse of ages finds himself 
at the end of this gradually evolving series, on the high 
est apex of that third age, as he embraces all the ac 
cumulations of former times in himself, stands as the 
representative of each sect of Greece, emphatically the 
Greek philosopher such a man I say was Proclus, in 
whom it seems to me are combined and from whom 
shine forth in no irregular or uncertain rays all the phil 
osophical lights which have illuminated Greece in vari 
ous times, to wit Orpheus, Pythagoras, Plato, Aristotle, 
Zeno, Plotinus, Porphyry, and lamblichus." 

These eulogies, which may seem extravagant to 
those who know Proclus, if at all, only through the 
average historian of Philosophy, are in my deliberate 
judgment, a judgment formed after a study of many- 
years of the writings of Proclus, based on the truth. 

Proclus was unquestionably one of the greatest phi 
losophers of any age or country. His authority was 



IX 

dominant during his own time: in all subsequent ages, 
directly and indirectly, he exerted an enormous and far- 
reaching influence through his writings, especially the 
Metaphysical Elements, which were generally read, 

either in the original or in translation. The noted Liber 
de Causis, which was compiled almost textually from 
the Metaphysical Elements, was one cf the most 
famous and widely -circulated books of the medieval 
ages, and the source of many of the conceptions of the 
medieval thinkers, Christian and Arabian. It was at 
tributed to Aristotle, and was variously known as Liber 
de essentia purae bonitatis, De causis causarum, De In- 
telligentiis, De Esse, etc. Jourdain says that the phi 
losophy of the loth, century cannot be known well, un 
less the Liber de Causis and Eons Vitae are analyzed. 
Renan thought that the Liber de Causis holds in germ 
all the scholastic philosophy. Haureau 9 observes: 
"Such is the Book concerning Causes, which has 
made so great an uproar; which, according to the 
Church, has ruined so many consciences; which has 
produced at least so many scandals." 

It would be superfluous to enumerate the names of 
all the thinkers who were nurtured by his philosophic 
conceptions, but a few may be mentioned. The 
writings of Pseudo Dionysius the Areopagite, which 
profoundly inspired and influenced Christian thought 
for many centuries, owe much to Proclus. Generally, 
and particularly in his treatise On the Divine Names, 
Dionysius borrowed extensively from him. The 
hierarchies of Dionysius are modelled on the different 
orders of the "gods" (Oeoi) which are divine natures, es 
sences or forces, of varying power and rank. 

During the Renaissance Proclus, made known to 
the Latin world by the translations of divers of his 

9 De La Phil. Scol. 1. 389. 



X 

works by William of Moerbeke 10 and Marsilius Ficinus, 
was one of the mighty intellectual forces which emanci 
pated mankind from the shackles of prejudice, bigotry 
and ignorance. Later, the writings of Giordano Bruno 
and Benedict Spinoza show that they drew from Pro- 
clus some of their cardinal doctrines, 

In Modern times the influence of Proclus has not 
diminished. Many distinguished scholars and thinkers, 
though in all cases not directly, have been stimulated or 
inspired by his thought. Hegel, for instance, studied 
Proclus deeply, and was largely indebted to him. He 
gave special attention to the Elements, as is evidenced 
by his correspondence with Creuzer on the text. 11 

If the reader wishes to ascertain what the character 
of Proclus was not, and to get a travesty of his philos 
ophy, he may peruse "Alexandria and Her Schools" by 
Charles Kingsley, one of the blind leaders of the blind 
in philosophical science, a gentleman who was in the 
habit of vilifying whatever he did not understand, and 
who was no more qualified to explain or criticize what 
he termed "Neo-Platonism" than an Esquimo. 

I first read the Greek text of the Metaphysical El 
ements, (Srwxt-iGOffiS OeoXoyinrj), in Creuzer s edition, 



10 William of Moerbeke, Archbishop of Corinth, who flourished 
in the 13th. century, translated from the Greek into Latin several 
books of Proclus, among which was theMetaphysical Elements. He 
records that he finished his translation of the Elements on the 18 
th, day of May, 1268, at Viterbo, Italy. This is extant in Ms., 
but has never been printed. A Ms. Kxpoxitio of the Elements, by 
Brother Berealdus of the Dominican Order, written in 1454, is pre 
served in the library of Balliol College, Oxford. The Commentary 
of Thomas Aquinas on the JAber De Caush is published in the com 
plete editions of his works. Aquinas knew that this book was an 
Arabic abstract of the Metaphysical Elements of Proclus. 

11 Creuzer s edition was dedicated to Hegel and Van Heusde, 
Cousin dedicated his edition of Proclus Commentary on the Par- 
menides to Boissonade, Schelling and Hegel. 



XI 

in the Winter of 187273. At that time many of the 
Propositions were beyond my full comprehension, but 
the study of the whole book was to me an intellectual 
discipline of inestimable value, and the Propositions 
which I mastered amply repaid all the time and thought 
expended upon them. In the Spring of 1873 I read 
Taylor s translation, published in I792, 12 in connection 
with the original. His notes illuminated many of the 

dark places. 

In translating the Metaphysical Elements I have 
spent many intensely laborious but very pleasant and 
extremely profitable hours. The translation is based on 
Taylor s, but it would be an act of injustice to him to 
call my version a revision of his, though my indebted 
ness to him is large, and is cheerfully acknowledged. 
Many of the Propositions I retranslated entirely, and in 
the others more or less changes were made, for the 
sake of perspicuity or by way of correction. Taylor s 
notes are generally truly illuminative of the subject, and 
I have reprinted nearly all of them. I am also much 
indebted to Mr. Thomas Whittaker, whose book, "The 
Neo-Platonists", may be strongly commended to all 
students. His abstract of the Elements is excellent. 

Purely philological notes have been omitted. These 
rightly belong to an edition of the original text, which 
some day I may publish. As a rule the text as edited 
by Creuzer, (Francof. 1822), has been followed, but I 
have adopted most of the emendations of Taylor, and 
made a few of my own. The Latin version of Fran- 
ciscus Patricius, (Ferrar. I583), 13 is a valuable aid to the 
interpretation of the original. He undoubtedly used a 

12 A second, revised edition appeared in 1816. 

13 This is of course a very rare book. It was only in April 
last that I was able, after a search of many years, to find a copy. 



XII 

much more perfect manuscript than any which is now 
known. 

Greek words and quotations are printed without 
the accents. It is difficult to get them printed correctly, 
but there is a better reason for dispensing with them: 
they are practically useless. They "seldom occurin Greek 
manuscripts before the seventh century" of the Chris 
tian era. Accents were invented by Aristophanes of 
Byzantium about 200 B. C. , for the purpose of preserv 
ing the true pronunciation of the Hellenic language. 
This they failed to do: the true pronunciation is lost, 
beyond recovery. We should remember that accents 
were not devised for scholars. 

Probably the best preparation for the apprehen 
sion of the Elements is a mastery of Plotinus treatise 
On the Three Archical Hypostases of Things, viz. The 
Good, Intellect, and Soul. He demonstrates that the 
Primary Causes can be neither more nor less than these. 
"But these three are thus denominated, because 
they are not consubsistent; and they are not consub- 
sistent, because they are essentially different from each 
other. For, according to Plato, The Good is superes- 
sential; Intellect is an impartible, immovable essence; and 
Soul is a self -motive essence ydiTid subsists as a medium be 
tween Intellect and the nature which is distributed about 
bodies/ The chief aim of Proclus in the Elements is 
to demonstrate and develop this Platonic insight. The 
work "contains two hundred and eleven propositions, 
disposed in a scientific order, and supported by the 
firmest demonstrations. They begin from super- es 
sential unity, and proceed gradually through all the 
beautiful and wonderful progressions of divine causes, 
ending in the self-moving energies of soul. They pos 
sess all the accuracy of Euclid, arid all the subtility 
and sublimity necessary to a knowledge of the most 
profound theology, and may be considered as bearing 



XIII 

the same relation to the Pythagoric and Platonic 
wisdom as Euclid s Elements to the most abstruse 
geometry." 

Mr. D. E. Waofenhals, of Nashville, Ills., has in- 

o 

geniously and admirably illustrated the Propositions 
of the Metaphysical Elements by geometrical diagrams 
a work which I heartily hope will soon be given 
to the public. These diagrams will much facilitate 
the student s apprehension of the Elements. In an 
Appendix two specimens of these diagrams are pre 
sented, by the kindness of Mr. Wagenhals. 

At the request of friends, a few notes of personal 
intellectual history are here given. My introduction to 
the so-called Neo- Platonic philosophy was on a day in 
the Spring of 1870 when, roaming around the Library 
of the University of Notre Dame, 14 Indiana, seeking 
any book of interest, especially of a classical nature, I 
found half a dozen dust covered volumes of the old 
Classical Journal, (published in London, 1810 1829). 
How these volumes ever gained entrance into the Li 
brary, I have often wondered. Be that as it may, 
there they were, and the first article I saw when I 
opened one of them was the Chaldean Oracles, 15 ed 
ited, translated and annotated by the famous Thomas 
Taylor the Platonist. (Taylor shows that the Chaldean 
and Platonic teachings on important points were iden 
tical). There were other translations and papers by 
Taylor, and through them I discovered the existence of 
the mighty thinkers, the genuine disciples of Plato. 

14 Then and now the principal Catholic University in 
America. 

15 The last edition of the Chaldean Oracles is by Kroll, 
(Breslau, 1894). It is philologically prood, but philosophically 

worthless. 



XIV 

In the latter part of August, i87O, 1G on my way to the 
University, I purchased in St. Louis the April No., 1869, 
of the Journal of Speculative Philosophy, which contains 
the Sentences of Prophyry, translated by my friend, 
the late Prof. Thomas Davidson. My attention had 
been called to it by a press notice giving" the contents of 
this particular number. 

In December, 1870, I procured the original text of 
the writings of Plotinus, (2 vols., ed. by Adolph Kirch- 
hoff, Lips., 1856). Later I procured the Paris edition, 
(1855), which has Prolegomena and the Latin version 
of Marsilius Ficinus. 17 In 1871 I picked up Taylor s 
version of the Select Works of Plotinus, (London, 
1817), which is excellent, though almost as concise as 
the original, and is enriched with useful notes and an 
Introduction profoundly interesting and valuable. But 
I soon found that it was an Herculean task to reach the 
insights of Plotinus. I had a fair mastery of the Ian 
guage, but to apprehend his Thought was very difficult. 
But I persevered. The gathering of Platonic knowl 
edge, if a matter of constant toil and activity, was 

16 In June of this year I read Emerson s works, (2 vols., 1869), 
and his magnificent eulogy at the end of his essay on Intellect on 
the Trismeghti, among whom he ranks the "Neo-Platonists," im 
pressed me greatly. It is somewhat curious that my first knowl 
edge of Emerson came through a hostile review in the Catholic 
World of this very edition. Emerson is one of the best stimu- 
lants to the study of Philosophy, of which I know. 

IT Several years ago I was fortunate to secure a copy of the 
first edition of Ficinus translation, which appeared at Florence, 
Italy, in the month of May, 1492, folio. It is a magnificent speci 
men of typography. The type is large and elegant, the paper is 
of a superior quality, the margins are wide, and the printing is 
fi ne _it will indeed compare favorably with that of the present 
time. The publication of this work opened to mankind a new in 
tellectual world, just as the discovery of America by Columbus in 
the same year opened a new physical world, 



XV 

equally a matter of perpetual delight and profit. My 
appetite for Wisdom was immeasurably stimulated, and 
it is still insatiably strong. And thus gradually I was 
able to recall a knowledge of the wonderful and mar 
velous Philosophy, of which Plato is the chief exponent 
the Philosophy whose principles will never become 
obsolete, for they are "the same yesterday, and to day, 
and forever": the Philosophy which, as Proclus truly 
says, "came to mankind for the benefit of terrestrial 
souls, in lieu of statues, temples, and the whole of sa 
cred institutions; and which is the leader of intellectual 
salvation alike to the men that now are and to those 
who shall come hereafter." True, I knew something of 
Plato, even before this. I had read several of his 
works in a wretched English version, 18 and the Apology 
and Crito in the Greek, but my "knowledge" was 

18 A childish performance, translated from the French of Da- 
cier, by "several Hands," (London, 1701). It passed through six 
or seven editions, however, in spite of or on account of its worth- 
lessness. The "several Hands" apparently conspired to make this 
production stale, flat and unprofitable. All the intellectual vital 
ity, force and energy of the Platonic text disappear in this ver 
sion, and the thought evaporates into persiflage. 

Of the three English versions of Plato s complete writings, Tay 
lor s is the best, despite some verbal imperfections and infelicities. 
He knew more Plato, if others knew more Greek. The Bohn 
translation is largely a piece of hack-work, done to order: it is purely 
verbal. The translators criticize Taylor severely, but are under 
deep obligations to him, and inmost of the difficult passages adopt 
his renderings! Jowett s version is popular, and is highly esteemed 
by many. Three editions of it have appeared. In the second and 
third numerous changes were made. Jowett aimed to make his 
work better, but his efforts were confined chiefly to the improve 
ment of his style. In his anxiety to turn polished Greek into 
polished English, he often allowed the force and thought of Plato 
to escape him. The Platonic style is characteristic of the Greek, 
and is untranslatable, either into English or any other language. 
Still, Jowett doubtless expresses as much of the Platonic thought 
as the average reader will or can assimilate. 



XVI 

merely superficial. I had never until now found the 
key which would admit me into the penetralia of his 
Thought. But when I read Taylor and Plotinus, then 
indeed was the darkness of ignorance dispersed then 
I could truly say, 

"Nights candles are burnt out, and jocund day 
Stands tiptoe on the misty mountain tops" 

By an indefatigable study of the Platonic text, 
with these and others of the Golden Chain of the 
Platonic Succession as guides, i was enabled to find 
and travel the way to the divine Ideas of Plato. The 
way was not easy, for 

" The path by which to deity we climb 
Is arduous, rougJi, ineffable, sublime" 

but every step taken was an encouragement to proceed, 
by reason of the gain of new insights and a contin 
uous accession of intellectual power. 

The Platonic are the only writings to which I can 
return, in health or in sickness, without satiety, fatigue 
or dissatisfaction. It matters not how often I open 
these golden books, I find thoughts and ideas which lift 
me above the sordid and material cares of life, and 
which are a perennial consolation and a refuge. 
These ideas are primarily in the noumenal world, and 
our apprehension and participation of them here, in the 
region of time and space, is a foretaste of a perfect 
participation hereafter, if we qualify ourselves for such 
an exalted intellectual experience. 

THOS. M. JOHNSON, 
Oscc ola. Mo., U. S, A. October, 1909, 



Proclus 

Metaphysical 

Elements 

On The One 

PROPOSITION I. 

Every multitude partakes in some respect of The One. 

For if it in no way or degree participates of The 
One, neither will the whole be one, nor each of the 
many things from which multitude arises, but each mul 
titude will originate from certain or particular things, 
and this will continue ad infinitum. And of these in 
finites each will be again infinite multitude. For, if 
multitude partakes in no respect of any one, neither as 
a whole nor through any of its parts.it will be in every re 
spect indeterminate. Each of the many, whichever you 
may assume, will be one or not one; and if not one will 
be either many or nothing. But if each of the many is 
nothing, that likewise which arises from these will be 
nothing. If each is many, each will consist of infinites 
without limit. But this is impossible. For there is no 
being constituted of infinites without limit, since there 
is nothing greater than the infinite itself; and that which 
consists of all is greater than each particular thing. 
Neither is any thing composed of nothing. Every mul 
titude therefore partakes in some respect of The One. 1 

PROPOSITION n. 
Every thing which partakes of The One is alike one and 

not one. 

For though it is not The One itself since it partic 
ipates of The One and is therefore other than it is it ex- 



periences The One through participation, and is thus 
able to become one. If therefore it is nothing- besides 
The One, it is one alone, and will not participate of The 
One but will be The One itself. But if it is something 
other than The One, which is not The One but a par 
ticipant of it, it is alike one and non-one, one being, 
indeed, since it partakes of oneness, but not oneness it 
self. This therefore is neither The One itself, nor that 
which The One is. But, since it is one and at the same 
time a participant of The One, and on this account not 
one per sc, it is alike one and not one, because it is 
something other than The One. And so far as it is 
multiplied it is not one; and so far as it experiences a 
privation of number or multitude it is one. Every thing, 
therefore, which participates of The One is alike one 
and not one. 

i Proclus understands by multitude or number everything 
which is mixed, compounded, or in any respect non-simple in 
brief, all things other than the Supreme One. It has been shown 
that all things partake in some degree of oneness. By virtue of 
this participation every number or individual thing is at the same 
time one and non-oneone through participation or communion but 
not one essentially, because in this case it would be One it 
self, and not merely a participant of it. So far as any individual 
or thing departs from its primal abiding with the Supreme Unity, 
so far it becomes multiplied or compounded: it becomes one or re 
turns to its original abode exactly to the degree that it rids itself 
of multiplicity or everything alien to its true nature. 

The orders of multitude are three: (1) Primary, con sist- 
ing of unities; (2) Composite, consisting of things united; (3) Sim 
ple, consisting of the last of things. 

There exist no more beautiful lines in English poetry than 
the following, taken from the "Adonais," lines in which the whole 
system of Plotinus [and Proclus] is summed up in exquisite words: 

The One remains, the many change and pass, 
Heaven s light forever shines, Earth s shadows fly; 
Life, like a dome of many-colored glass, 
Stains the white radiance of Eternity." Kuhns: The Sense 
of the Infinite. 



3 

PROPOSITION III. 

Every thing which becomes one, becomes so by the partici 
pation of The One, and is one so far as it experi 
ences the participation of The One. 

For if the things which are not one become one, 
they doubtless become so by a harmonious alliance an d 
association with each other, and experience the presence 
of The One, though they are not that which The One 
is. Hence they participate of The One, so far as they 
allow themselves to become one. But if they are already 
one, they will not become one: for that which is, does 
not become that which it already is. But if they become 
one from that which was previously not one, they will 
possess The One, since a certain one was ingenerated 
in their nature. [And this ingenerated one must be de 
rived from The One itself. Everything, therefore, which 
becomes one, becomes so by the participation of The 
One, etc.] 

PROPOSITION IV. 

Every thing which is united is different from The One 
itself. 

For if it is united it will participate in a certain re 
spect of The One, so far as it is rightly said to be 
united. That, however, which is a participant of The 
One is both one and not one. But The One itself is not 
both one and not one: for if this was so, again the one 
which is in it would have both of these, and this would 
take place ad infinitum, if there was no One itself at 
which it is possible to stop; but every thing being one 
and not one, there will be something united, which is 
different from The One. For if The One is the same 
as the united, it will be infinite multitude. And in a 
similar manner each of the things of which the united 



consists will be infinite multitude. Every thing, there 
fore, which is united is different from The One itself. 

PROPOSITION V. 

All multitude is posterior to The One. 

For if multitude is prior to The One, The One in 
deed will participate of multitude, but multitude which 
is prior will not participate of The One, since prior to 
the existence of The One that multitude was. For it 
does not participate of that which is not: because a par 
ticipant of The One is one and at the same time not one 
but,on the hypothesis, The One will not yet subsist, that 
which is first being multitude. But it is impossible that 
there should be a certain multitude which in no respect 
whatever participates of The One. Multitude, there 
fore, is not prior to The One. But if multitude and 
The One subsist simultaneously, they will be naturally 
co-ordinate with each other, and intimately related. 
Nothing in time prohibits this, since neither is The One 
essentially many, nor is multitude The One, because 
they are directly opposite to each other by nature, if 
neither is prior or posterior to the other. Hence mul 
titude essentially will not be one, and each of the things 
which are in it will not be one, and this will be the case 
to infinity, which is impossible. Multitude, therefore, 
according to its own nature participates of The One, 
and there is no thing of it which is not one. For if it 
is not one it will be an infinite, consisting of infinites, 
as has been demonstrated. Hence it entirely partici 
pates of The One. If therefore The One, which is es 
sentially one, in no possible respect participates of mul- 
tude, multitude will be wholly posterior to The One 
participating indeed of The One, but not being par 
ticipated by it. But if The One participates of multi 
tude, subsisting indeed as one according to its essence, 



5 

but as not one according to participation, The One will 
be multitude, just as multitude is united by reason of 
The One. The One therefore will communicate with 
multitude, and multitude with The One. 2 Butthings which 
coalesce and communicate with each other in a certain 
respect, if they are impelled together by another, that 
is prior to them: but if they themselves harmonize they 
are not antagonistic to each other. For opposites do 
not hasten to each other. If therefore The One and 

2 It is a fundamental principle of the Platonic Philosophy 
that all things primarily proceed from, and depend on, One First 
Cause. It necessarily follows from this principle that One pre 
cedes Many; or, in other words, that pure, simple being is prior to 
the compound or multiplied. E-/ery bsing, other than the First, is 
to a greater or less degree a number or multitude. Every number 
or individual thing must in some respect participate of primal one 
nessotherwise it could not exist as a whole, nor in each of 
its parts. In brief, Oneness is absolutely essential to the in 
dividual existence of every being or thing. All beings are 
beings through The One, both such as are primarily beings, and 
such as in any respect whatever are said to be classed in the order 
of beings. What indeed would they be, if they were not one? 
Truly, if deprived of oneness, they are no longer that which they 
were said to be. Neither would an army or a choir or a herd exist, 
as such, unless each of them was one. But neither would a house 
or a ship have an existence, unless they possessed The One; since 
a house is one thing, and also a ship, which one if they lose 
the house will no longer be a house, nor the ship a ship. Contin 
ued magnitudes, therefore, unless The One is present in them, will 
not exist. Hence when they are divided, so far as they lose The 
One they change their existence. The bodies, also, of plants and 
animals, each of which is one, if they fly from The One, thereby 
becoming dissipated into multitude, will lose the essence which 
they before possessed, no longer being that which they were, but 
becoming other things, and continuing to be these so long- as they 
are one. Health, likewise, subsists when the body is congregated 
into one, [i. e. when it possesses symmetry], and beauty flourishes 
when the nature of The One confines the parts of the body. And 
Virtue reigns in the soul when the soul tends to unity, and is unit 
ed in one concord." Plotinus: En. VI. Lib. 9.1. 



multitude are oppositely divided, and multitude so far 
as it is multitude is not one, and The One so far as it 
is one is not multitude, neither will one of these sub 
sisting in the other be one and at the same time two. 
And if there is something prior to them, which impells 
them to harmonize, this will be either one or not one. 
But if it is not one, it will be either many or nothing. 
But neither will it be many, lest multitude should be 
prior to The One, nor will it be nothing. For how 
could nothing impell together those things which are 
something or many? It is therefore one alone. For 
this one is not many, lest there should be a progres 
sion to infinity. It is therefore The One itself, and all 
multitude proceeds from The One itself. 

On Unity. 

PROPOSITION VI. 

Every multitude consists either of things united, or of 
unities. 

It is evident that each of things many will not be it 
self multitude alone, and, again, that each part of this will 
not be multitude alone. But if it is not multitude alone/ 
it is either united or unities. And if indeed it partakes 
of The One it is united; but if it consists of things of 
which that which is primarily united consists, it will be 
unities. For if The One itself exists, there is also that 
which primarily participates of it, and which is prima 
rily united. But this consists of unities: for if it consists 
of things united, again, things united consist of certain 
things, and this will be the case to infinity. It is neces 
sary, however, that what is primarily united should con 
sist of unities. And thus we have discovered what we 
proposed at first, [viz. that every multitude consists 
either of things united, or of unities.] 



On Producing Causes and Effects. 

PROPOSITION VII. 

Every thing productive of another is better than the na 
ture of that which is produced. 

For it is either superior, or inferior, or equal. 
Hence that which is produced from this has itself either 
a power productive of something else, or it is entirely 
unprolific. But if it is unprolific, by reason of this fact 
it will be inferior to and unequal to its producer, which 
is prolific, and has the power of producing. But if it is 
productive of other things, it either produces that which 
is equal to itself, and this similarly in all things, and all 
beings will be equal to each other, and no one thing 
will be better than another, that which produces always 
generating that which is equal to itself, in a consequent 
series; or it produces that which is unequal to itself, and 
thus that which is produced will no longer be equal to its 
producer. For it is the province of equal powers to pro 
duce equal things: the progeny of these, however, will 
be unequal to each other, if that which produces indeed is 
equal to the cause prior to itself, but the thing posterior 
to it is unequal to it. Hence it is not right that the 
thing produced should be equal to its producing cause. 
Moreover, neither will that which produces ever be 
less than that which is produced by it. For if it imparts 
essence to the thing produced, it will also supply it with 
essential power. And if it is productive of all the power 
which that posterior to itself possesses, it will certainly 
be able to make itself such as its production is. But if 
this be so, it will also make itself more powerful; impo- 
tency cannot hinder, the productive power being present, 
nor a defect of will, since all things naturally desire 
the good. Hence, if it is able to render another thing 
more perfect, it will also perfect itself before it perfects 



s 

that which is posterior to itself. The thing produced, 
therefore, is neither equal to nor better than its produc 
ing cause: and hence the producing cause is in every 
respect better than the nature of the thing produced. 

On the First Good, Which is Called 
&he Good Itself. 

PROPOSITION VIII. 

That which is primarily good, and which is no other 
other than The Good itself, is superior to all things 
which in any way whatever participate of good. 
For if all beings desire good, it is evident that the 
Primary Good is beyond beings. If it is the same with 
a certain one of beings, either being and The Good are 
the same, and this particular being will no longer desire 
good, since it is The Good itself for that which desires 
anything is indigent of that which it desires, and is dif 
ferent from it or, being is one thing, and the good an 
other. And if some one being and The Good are the 
same, being indeed will participate, and that which is 
participated in being will be The Good. Hence, on this 
hypothesis, The Good is a certain good inherent in a 
certain participant and which the participant alone 
desires, but is not that which is simply good, and 
which all things desire: for this Good is the common 
object of desire to all beings. But that which is in 
herent in a certain thing pertains to that alone 
which participates of it. Hence that which is pri 
marily good is nothing else than The Good itself. The 
adding of any thing else to The Good is to diminish it 
by the addition, making it a certain or particular good 
instead of that which is simply good. For the addition, 
since it is not The Good but something less than it, will 
by its association diminish The Good. 



9 

On The Self-sufficient. 

PROPOSITION IX. 

Every thing which is self -sufficient, either according to es 
sence or energy, is better than that which is not seif -suffi 
cient, and depends on another cause for its perfection. 

For if all beings naturally desire good, and one 
thing supplies well-being from itself, but another is in 
digent of something else, the one indeed will have the 
cause of good present, but the other separate and apart. 
To the degree, therefore, that the former is nearer to 
that which supplies the object of desire, to that extent 
will it be superior to that which is indigent of a separate 
cause, and which externally receives the perfection of its 
nature or its energy. For since the self-sufficient is 
both similar and diminished, it is more similar to The 
Good itself [than that which is not self-sufficient]. It is 
diminished indeed by participating of The Good, and 
because it is not primarily The Good, though it is allied 
to it in a certain respect so far as it is able to possess 
good of and from itself. But to participate good, and 
to participate through another, are more remote from 
that which is primarily good, and which is nothing else 
than good. 

PROPOSITION X. 

Every thing which is self-sufficient is inferior to that which 
is simply good. 

For what else is the self-sufficient than that which 
from and in itself possesses good? But this is now full 
of good, and participates of it, but is not that which is 
simply good: for that is better than participation and 
plenitude, as has been demonstrated. If therefore the 
self-sufficient fills itself with ofood, that from which it 



IO 

fills itself will be better than the self-sufficient, and will 
be superior to self-sufficiency. And that which is simply 
good will not be indigent of any thing: for it does not 
desire any thing else, since the desiring would indicate 
a deficiency. Nor is the simply good self-sufficient, for 
in that case it would be full of good, but not that which 
is primarily The Good. 3 

On Cause. 

PROPOSITION XI. 

All beings proceed from One First Cause. 

For either there is no cause of any being, or the 
causes of all finite things revolve in a circle, or the as 
cent (progression) is to infinity, and one thing is the 
cause of another, and the presubsistence of essence 
(cause) will in no respect cease. If, however, there is 
no cause of beings, there will be neither an order of 
things second and first, of things perfecting and perfec 
ted, of things adorning and adorned, of things generat 
ing and generated, and of agents and patients, nor will 
there be any science of beings. For the knowledge of 
causes is the work of science, and we are then said to 
know scientifically when we know the causes of things. 
But if causes revolve in a circle, the same things will be 
prior and posterior, more powerful and more imbecile. 
For every thing which produces is better than the nature 
of that which is produced. Nor does it make a differ 
ence to conjoin cause to effect, and through many or 

3 "For Intellect subsists after The First, and is indigent of 
nourishment and intelligence, being proximate to that nature 
which is indigent of nothing, not even intelligence (thought). In 
tellect, however, has true plenitude and thought, because it has 
these primarily: but that which is prior to Intellect and these 
neither needs nor has, otherwise it would not be The Good itself. * 
Plotinus: En, III. Lib. viii, 11, 



fewer media to produce from cause. For cause will be 
superior to all the intermediate natures of which it is the 
cause; and the more numerous the media the greater is 
the causality of the cause. 

And if the addition of causes is to infinity, and there 
is always again a cause prior to another, there will be 
no science of any being: for there is not a knowledge 
of any thing infinite. But causes being unknown, neither 
will there be a science of the things consequent to the 
causes. If, therefore, it is necessary that there should 
be a cause of beings, and causes are distinct from the 
things caused, and there is not an ascent to infinity, 
there is a First Cause of beings, from which as from a 
root every thing proceeds, some things indeed being 
nearer to but others more remote from it. The neces 
sity of the existence of One Principle has been demon 
strated, because all multitude is secondary to The One. 

PROPOSITION XII. 

The Principle and First Cause of all beings is The Good It 
self. 

For if all things proceed from one cause, [as has 
been demonstrated], it is necessary to call that cause 
either The Good, or that which is better than The Good. 
But if it is better than The Good, is any thing imparted 
by it to beings, and to the nature of beings, or nothing? 
And if nothing is imparted by it, an absurdity will re 
sult. For we would no longer rank it in the order of 
causes, since it is everywhere necessary that something 
should be present from cause to the things caused, and 
especially from the First Cause, on which all things de 
pend, and by reason of which every being exists. But 
if something is imparted by it, in the same manner as 
there is by The Good, there will be something better 
than goodness in beings, emanating from the First Cause. 



12 

For if it is better than and above The Good it will in no 
way bestow on secondary natures any thing inferior to 
that which is imparted by the nature posterior to itself. 
But what can be greater than goodness? Since that 
which is better than other things is so called because it 
is a participant to a greater degree of the good. Hence 
if the not good cannot be said to be better than The 
Good, it must be entirely secondary to it. If, too, all 
beings desire The Good how is it possible that there 
should be any thing prior to this cause? For if they 
also desire that which is prior to The Good, how can 
they specially desire The Good? But if they do not de 
sire it, how is it possible that they should not desire the 
cause of all, since they proceed from it? If therefore 
The Good is that on which all beings depend, The Good 
is the Principle and First Cause of all things. 

PROPOSITION XIII. 

Every good has the power of uniting its participants, and 
every union is good; and The Good is the same as The One. 

For if The Good is preservative of all beings by 
reason of which it is desirable to all things that indeed 
which is preservative and connective of the essence of 
every thing is The One. For by The One all things are 
preserved, but dispersion expells every thing from its 
essence. If this be the case, The Good will cause those 
things to which it is present to be one, and will connect 
and contain them through union. And if The One is 
collective and connective of beings, it will perfect each 
of them by its presence. The union therefore which 
unites a thing with all is a good. But if union is a good 
per se, and Good itself has a unifying power, that Avhich 
is simply good and simply one are the same, causing 
beings to be both good and one. Hence those things 
which in a certain way or respect fall off from The Good, 



at the same time lose the participation of The One. And 
those things which become destitute of The One, being 
filled with separation, are equally deprived of The Good. 
Goodness therefore is union, and union is goodness, and 
The Good itself is one, and The One is that which is 
primarily Good. 4 

4 The Good is that on which all depends, and which all things 
desire and have as a principle, and of which they are all indigent, 
while The Good itself lacks absolutely nothing, is wholly self-suffi 
cient, and is the measure and limit of all; producing of itself in 
tellect, essence, soul, life and intellectual energy." Plotinus: En. 
I. Lib. 8. 10. 

On the Immovable and Self=motiVe 
Principle or Cause. 

PROPOSITION XIV. 

Every being is either immovable or moved. And if moved, it 
is either moved by itself, or by another: and if it is moved 
by itself it is self-motive, but if by another it is otter- 
motive. Every nature, therefore, is either immovable, 
self-motive, or alter-motive. 

For it is necessary, since there are alter-motive 
natures, that there also should be that which is immov 
able, and the self-motive nature, which is a medium be 
tween them, For if every alter-motive thing is moved 
because it is moved by another, motions will be either in 
a circle, or they will proceed to infinity. But neither 
will they be in a circle, nor proceed ad infinitum, since 
all beings are limited by the Principle of things, and that 
which moves is better than that which is moved. Hence 
there will be something immovable, which first moves. 
But if this be so, it is necessary that the self-motive 
exist. For if all things should stop, what will that be 
which is first moved? It cannot be the immovable, for 
this is not naturally adapted to be moved; nor the alter- 



motive, for that is moved by another. It remains, there 
fore, that the self-motive nature is that which is primari 
ly moved. It is this, too, which unites alter-motive na 
tures to that which is immovable, being in a certain re 
spect a medium, moving and at the same time being 
moved: for of these, the immovable moves only, but the 
alter-motive is moved only. Every thing, therefore, is 
either immovable, or self-motive, or alter-motive. 

Corollary. From the premises, therefore, it is 
evident, that of things which are moved, the self-motive 
nature is the first; but that of things which move other 
things the immovable is the first. 5 

5 Axiom 1.: "All things are either in themselves or in others." 
Axiom 2.: "That which cannot be conceived as through another 
must be conceived as through itself." Spinoza. 

On an Incorporeal Essence, and 
What the Characteristic of it is. 

PROPOSITION XV. 
Every thing which is able to return to itself is incorporeal. 

For no body is, by reason of its nature, competent 
to return to itself. For if that which is converted to 
anything is conjoined with that to which it is converted, 
it is evident that all the parts of the body which is con 
verted to itself will be conjoined with all the parts. 
For a thing is converted to itself, when both that which 
is converted, and that to which it is converted, become 
one. This however is impossible in body, and, in short, 
in all partible things. For the whole of that which is 
partible is not conjoined with the whole, on account of 
the separation of its parts, which lie outside one another. 
No body, therefore, is naturally able to return to itself, 
so that the whole may be converted to the whole. Hence, 



15 

if there is anything which has the power of returning to 
itself, it is incorporeal and impartible. 6 

PROPOSITION XVI. 

Every thing which is able to return to itself has an essence 
separate from every body. 

For unless it was separate from every body whatso 
ever, it would not have a certain activity or act apart 
from body: since it is impossible that, the essence being 
inseparable from body, an activity (act) proceeding from 
essence (body) should be separate. For in this case its 
activity would be better than its essence, because the 

6 There is no more important or significant word in the 
Platonic vocabulary than Eiti6rpoq&gt;?/, eititirpEfpeiv (a conversion, a 
turning back, a return to self) . It is comprehensive more or less 
of self-activity, self-development, self-determination, self-knowl 
edge, self -reflection, self-relation, self-consciousness. It is essen 
tially self -reflection or self -relation. 

"Great stress is laid on self-relation (Eiti6rpE&lt;pEiv) as the form 
of the highest order of being; and this is what Hegel s school of 
philosophy lay so much stress upon, as the doctrine of return-to- 
self." It is the form of consciousness, and life, and moral habit; 
and its image is found in the Cosmos in the shape of orbital move 
ment, diurnal revolution, recurrence of seasons, etc. The external 
image of this return-to-self-through-other has given the forms of 
speech in all languages for what is divine, and hence the sun-myth 
and other astronomical scaffolding of mythologies." Dr. Harris. 
(Memoir of A. Bronson Alcott, by F. B. Sanborn and William T. 
Harris. This is one of the most interesting and valuable biogra 
phies in the English language.) 

"The Intellect sees because it is turned back to its origin, the 
One; its movement is circular, i. e. reflexive, or turned back upon 
itself, conscious." Plotinus: En. V. Lib. I. ch 7. "For there are 
two orders of knowing, (Plotinus, En. V. Lib. 6.), self-knowing 
and the knowing of something different from the self. Self-know 
ing is the primary or highest act of the Intellect, that whereby 
it returns to its source, the One." Dr. Harris. 

"Nothing really exists which is not self-determined and self- 
related, which has not a self which it maintains through all its 
changes." Hegel. 



i6 

latter indeed would be indigent of bodies, but the former 
unindigent and self-sufficient. If therefore any thing is 
inseparable in essence from body, it is similarly insepar 
able in activity (act), or, rather, it is much more insep 
arable. But if this be so, it will not return to itself: for 
that which returns to itself, being something other than 
body, has an activity separate from body, and which is 
not either through or with body, since the activity, and 
that to which the activity is directed, are not at all in 
digent of body: hence that which returns to itself is 
wholly separate from bodies. 

PROPOSITION XVII. 

Every thing which moves itself primarily? is able to re 
turn to itself. 

For if it moves itself, and its motive energy is 
directed to itself, that which moves and that which is 
moved are at the same time one. For it either moves 
in a part or is moved in a part, or the whole moves and 
is moved, or the whole moves, but a part is moved, or 
the contrary. But if one part, indeed, is that which 
moves, and another part is that which is moved, it will 
not be essentially self-motive, since it will consist of 
things which are not self-motive, but which appear in 
deed to be so, yet are not so essentially. 

If, however, the whole moves, but the part is mov 
ed, or the contrary, there will be a certain part in each 
which in one and the same subject moves and at 
the same time is moved. 9 And this is that which is pri 
marily self-motive. If, however, one and the same thing 
moves and is moved, it will have the energy of moving 

7 Or, is primarily self -active. 

8 For if the whole moves, the part which is moved will at the 
same time be motive. T. 



to and within itself, being motive of itself. But it returns 
to that toward which it energizes. Every thing, there 
fore, which primarily moves itself, is able to return to 
itself. 

PROPOSITION XVIII. 

Every thing which im-paj*ts being to others is itself primari 
ly that which it communicates to other natures. 

For if it gives being, and makes the impartance 
from its own essence, that which it gives is subordinate 
to its own essence, 9 which is truly greater and more per 
fect, since every nature which is able to constitute any 
thing is better than that which is constituted by it hence 
the giver is essentially superior to that which is given, 
but is not the same with it, for the one exists primarily, 
but the other secondarily. For it is necessary that either 
each should be the same, and that there should be one 
reason and definition of each, or that there should be 
nothing common and the same in each, or that the one 
should subsist primarily, but the other secondarily. If, 
however, there is the same reason and definition of each, 
the one will no longer be cause, but the other effect; nor 
will the one subsist essentially, but the other in a partici 
pant; nor will the one be the maker, but the other the 
thing made. But if they have nothing which is the 
same, the one will not constitute the other from its very 
being, because in that case it imparts nothing. Hence 
it follows that the one which gives is primary, but that 
the other to which existence is given is secondary; the 
former supplying the latter from its very berng. 

9 See the 7th Proposition. 



i8 



PROPOSITION XIX 

Every thing whichis primarily inherent in a certain nature 
of beings is present to all the beings which are arranged 
according to that nature, conformably to one reason, and 
in the same manner. 

For unless it was present to all of them in the same 
manner, but present to some and not to others, it is evi 
dent that it would not be primarily in that nature, but in 
some things primarily, and in others secondarily, which 
sometimes participate of it. For that which at one time 
exists, but at another time does not, does not exist pri 
marily, nor of itself: but it is adventitious, and comes 
from some other place to the things in which it is thus 
inherent. 

PROPOSITION XX. 

The essence of soul is beyond all bodies, the intellectual na 
ture is beyond all souls, and The One is beyond- all intel 
lectual hypostases. 

For every body is movable by another, but is not 
naturally competent to move itself, but by the presence 
of soul it is moved of itself, lives through soul, and, when 
soul is present is in a certain respect self-movable, but 
when it is absent is alter- movable, because any self-mov 
able nature which it may have it receives from soul, 
which is allotted a self-movable essence: since, to what 
ever nature soul is present, to this it imparts self-motion. 
Soul is, however, by a much greater priority that which 
it imparts by its very being. Hence it is beyond bodies, 
which become self-movable by participation, because *it 
is essentially self-movable. Again, however, soul which 
is moved from itself has an order secondary to the im 
movable nature, which subsists immovable, in activity 
or energy. Because of all the natures that are moved, 
the self-movable essence is the leader; but of all that 



*9 

move, the immovable is the leader. If, therefore, soul, 
being moved from itself moves other things, it is neces 
sary that prior to it there should be that which moves 
immovably. But intellect moves, being immovable, and 
energizing always in the same manner. For soul 
through intellect participates of perpetual thought, just 
as body through soul possesses the power of moving 
itself. For if perpetual intellection or thinking was pri 
marily in soul, it would be inherent in all souls, in the 
same manner as the self-motive power. Hence per 
petual thinking is not primarily in soul. It is necessary, 
therefore, that prior to it there should be that which is 
primarily intelligent: and hence intellect is prior to souls. 
Moreover, The One is prior to intellect. For intel 
lect, though it is immovable, yet is not The One; for 
it thinks itself, and energizes about itself. And of The 

O 

One indeed all beings, in whatever way they may exist, 
participate; but all beings do not participate of intellect. 
For those beings to whom intellect is present by partici 
pation necessarily participate of knowledge; because 
intellectual knowledge is the principle and first cause of 
gnostic energy. The One, therefore, is beyond intel 
lect, nor is there anything beyond The One: for The 
One and The Good are the same. But The Good, as has 
been demonstrated, is the principle of all things. 

That Intellect is not the First Cause. 

PROPOSITION XXI. 

Every order, beginning from a monad, proceeds into a multi 
tude co-ordinate to the monad, and the multitude of every 
order is referred to one monad. 

For the monad, having the relation of a principle, 
generates a multitude allied to itself. Hence one causal 
chain and one whole order has a decrement into mtilti- 



20 

tude from the monad. For there would no longer be 
an order, or a chain, if the monad remained of itself un- 
prolific. But multitude is again referred to the one 
common cause of all coordinate natures. For that in 
every multitude which is the same has not its progres 
sion from one of those things of which the multitude 
consists. For that which subsists from one alone of the 
many is not common to all, but eminently possesses the 
peculiarity of that one alone. Hence, since in every 
order there is a certain communion, connection, and 
sameness, through which some things are said to be co 
ordinate, but others of a different order, it is evident 
that sameness comes to every order from one principle. 11 
In each order, therefore there is one monad prior to the 
multitude, which imparts one ratio and connection to 
the natures arranged in it, both to each other and to the 
whole. 

For let one thing be the cause of another, among 
things that are under the same causal chain or series; 
but that which ranks as the cause of the one series must 
necessarily be prior to all in that series, and all things 
must be generated by it as coordinate, not so that each 
will be a certain particular thing, but that each will be 
long to this order. 

o 

Corollary. From these things it is evident that both 
one and multitude are inherent in the nature of body; 
that nature has many natures co-dependent on it; and 
that many natures proceed from the one nature of the 
universe. Further, that the order of souls originates 
from one first soul, proceeds with diminution into the 
multitude of souls, and reduces multitude into one; that 
in the intellectual essence there is an intellectual monad, 
and a multitude of intellects proceeding from one intel 
lect, and returning to it; that there is a multitude of 

11 See Additional Notes. 



21 

unities in The One which is prior to all things; and that 
in these unities there is a striving for The One. Hence, 
after the Primal One there are unities; 11 after the First 
Intellect there are intellects; after the First Soul there 
are souls; and after Total Nature there are natures. 

PROPOSITION XXII. 

Every thing which subsists primarily and principally in 
each order is one, and is neither two, nor more than two, 
but is ivholly one alone. 

For, if it be possible, let there be two things which 
thus subsist, since there will be the same impossibility if 
there are more than two; or let that which subsists pri 
marily consist of each of these. But if, indeed, it con 
sists of each it will again be one, and there will not be 
two things which are first. And if it be one of the two, 
each will not be first. Nor, if both are equally primary, 
will each have a principal subsistence. For if one of 
them is primary, but this is not the same with the other, 
what will it be in that order? For that subsists primar- 

11 This will be evident by considering that The One, or the 
First Principle of all, must produce that which first proceeds from 
himself by union. And as his first production must be the most 
similar of all things to himself, and must be at the same time mul 
titude, or in what respect would it differ from The One hence it 
is necessary that this progression be no other than self-perfect 
unities. In consequence thereof of this sublime doctrine, as 
Proclus beautifully observes, (Theol. Plat. p. 123), there is One 
God and many gods; one Unity and many unities prior to beings; 
and one Goodness and many goodnesses, after the First Good. It 
likewise follows that the First Principle of all is a super-essential 
One, and that after this One there are many super-essential unities. 
And we may consider every unity of beings as the flower of some 
certain being; and as the summit and centre about which every be 
ing subsists. For a further account and confirmation of this sub 
lime doctrine, study the third book of Proclus on Plato s Theol- 
ogy.-T. 



22 

ily which is nothing else than that which it is said to be. 
But each of these being different is, and at the same time 
is not, that which it is said to be. 

If, therefore, these differ from each other, but they 
do not primarily differ so far as they are that which they 
are said to be, for this primarily experiences that which 
is the same, both will not be first, but will be that of 
which both participating are thereby said to subsist pri 
marily. 

Corollary. From these things it is evident that 
what is primarily being is one alone, and that there are 
not two primary beings, or more than two; that the first 
intellect is one alone, and that there are not two first in 
tellects; and that the first soul is one. This is also the 
case with every form, such as the primarily beautiful 
and the primarily equal. Thus, too, with respect to the 
form of animals, and the form of man, the first of each 
is one; for the demonstration is the same. 

On the Imparticipable. 

PROPOSITION XXIII. 

Every imp art icip able produces the things which are partici 
pated: and alt the natures which are participated strive 
for imparticipable essences. 

For that which is imparticipable, having the rela 
tion of a monad, as subsisting from itself and not from 
another, and being exempt from participants, produces 
those things which may be participated. For either it is 
of itself barren, remaining within itself, and possessing 
nothing worthy of honor, or it will impart something 
from itself. And that which receives indeed from it will 
participate it; but that which was given will subsist. But 
everything participating of another by which it is gen 
erated, is secondary to that which is similarly present to 



2 3 

all things, and which fills all things from itself. For 
that which is in one only is not in others. But that 
which is similarly present to all things, in order that it 
may illuminate all, is not in one thing, but is prior to all 
things. For it is either in all things, or in one of all, or 
is prior to all. But that indeed which is in all things, 
being distributed into all, will again require another 
thing which may unite that which is distributed, And 
all things will no longer participate of the same thing, 
but this of one and that of another, the one being divid 
ed. But if it is in one alone of all things it will no 
longer be common to all, but to one thing. Hence, if it 
is common to all things able to participate, and is com 
mon to all, it will be prior to all. But this is imparticip- 
able, [because it neither is nor can be participated by 
anything.] 12 

PROPOSITION XXIV. 

Every tiling which participates is inferior to that ivhich is 
participated by it; and that which is participated is in 
ferior to that wliich is imparticipable. 

For that which participates, since it is imperfect 
prior to participation, but becomes perfect through par 
ticipation, is entirely secondary to that which is par 
ticipated so far as it is perfect by participating. For so 
far as it was imperfect it is inferior to that which it par 
ticipates, which causes it to become perfect. But that 
which is participated by a certain one and not by all, is 
on this account allotted an hyparxis or essence subordi 
nate to that which is common to all things, and not to a 
certain one thing: for the latter is more allied but the 

12 The imparticipable is that which is not consubsistent with 
a subordinate nature. Thus imparticipable intellect is the intellect 
which is not consubsistent with soul, but is exempt from it. And 
imparticipable soul is the soul which is not consubsistent with body. 
And so in other things. T. 



2 4 

former less to the cause of all. 

The imparticipable, therefore, is the leader of things 
which are participated; but the latter are the leaders of 
participants. For, in short, the imparticipable is one 
prior to the many; but that which is participated in the 
many is one and at the same time not one; and every 
thing which participates is not one and at the same 
time one. 



On the Perfect. 

PROPOSITION XXV. 

Everything perfect proceeds to the generation of those things 
which it is able to produce, imitating the One Principle 
of all. 

For as the one Principle by reason of its own good 
ness is unically constitutive of all beings, for The Good 
and The One are the same, so that the boniform is the 
same with the unical, thus, also, those things which 
are posterior to the First Principle, on account of their 
perfection, hasten to generate beings inferior to their 
own essence: for perfection is a certain part or quality 
of The Good, and the perfect so far as it perfect imi 
tates The Good. But The Good is constitutive of all 
things: so that the perfect is likewise productive accord 
ing to its nature of those things which it is able to pro 
duce. And that indeed which is more perfect, the more 
perfect it is the more numerous are the progeny of which 
it is the cause. For that which is more perfect partici 
pates in a greater degree of The Good. It is therefore 
nearer to The Good, is more allied to the cause of all, 
and is the cause of a greater number of effects. That, 
however, which is more imperfect, the more imperfect it 
is the less numerous are the effects of which it is the 
cause; for, being more remote from the producer of 



25 

everything, it is the cause of fewer effects. For to that 
which constitutes, or adorns, or perfects, or connects, or 
vivifies, or fabricates all things, that nature is most allied 
which produces a greater number of each of these; but 
that is more remote which produces a less number of 
each. 

Corollary. From the premises it is evident that the 
nature which is most remote from the Principle of all is 
unprolific and is not the cause of anything. For if it 
generated a certain thing, and had something posterior 
to itself, it is evident that it would no longer be the most 
remote, but that which it produced would be more re 
mote than itself from the Principle of all things; it would 
therefore be nearer to productive power, and, in addition, 
would imitate the cause which is productive of all beings. 

On that Which Produces. 

PROPOSITION XXVI. 

Every cause which is productive of other things, itself abid 
ing in itself, produces the natures posterior to itself, and 
those which are successive. 

For if it imitates The One, but that immovably 
constitutes the things posterior to itself, everything which 
produces will possess in a similar manner the cause of 
productive energy. But The One constitutes things im 
movably. For if through motion, the motion will be in 
it; and, being moved, it will no longer be The One, be 
cause it will be changed from The One. But if motion 
subsists together with or after it, it will also be from 
The One, and either there will be a progression to in 
finity, or The One will produce immovably, and every 
thing which produces will imitate the producing cause 



26 

of all things. For everywhere from that which is primari 
ly that which is not primarily derives its subsistence; so 
that the nature which is productive of certain things orig 
inates from that which is productive of all things. Hence 
every producing cause produces subsequent natures from 
itself. And while productive natures abide in themselves 
undiminished, secondary natures are produced by them. 
For that which is in any respect diminished cannot abide 
such as it is. 

PROPOSITION XXVII. 

Every producing cause, by reason of its perfection and abun 
dance of power, is productive of secondai-y natures. 

For if it produced not on account of the perfect, but 
through a defect of power, it would not be able to pre 
serve its own order immovable. For that which imparts 
being to another thing through defect and imbecility 
imparts subsistence to it through its own mutation and 
change in quality. But every thing which produces re 
mains such as it is, and in consequence of thus remain 
ing that which is posterior to it proceeds into existence. 
Hence, being full and perfect, it constitutes secondary 
natures immovably and without diminution, it being that 
which it is, and neither being changed into them nor 
diminished. For that which is produced is not a distri 
bution into parts of the producing cause; since this is 
neither appropriate to generation, nor to generating 
causes. Nor is it a transition of one nature into another: 
for it does not become the matter of that which pro 
ceeds; since it remains such as it is, and that which is 
produced is different from it. Hence that which gener 
ates abides without alteration and undiminished; through 
prolific power multiplies itself, and from itself imparts 
secondary hypostases or natures. 



27 

PROPOSITION XXVIII. 

Every producing cause constitutes things similar to itself, 
prior to such as are dissimilar. 

For since that which produces is necessarily more 
excellent than the thing produced, they can never be 
simply the same with each other and equal in power. 
But if they are not the same and equal, but different and 
unequal, they are either entirely separated from each 
other, or they are both united and separated. If, how 
ever, they are entirely separated, they will not accord 
with each other, and nowhere will that which proceeds 
from a cause sympathize with it. Hence, neither will 
one of these participate of the other, since they are en 
tirely different from it. For that which is participated 
gives communion to its participant with reference to that 
of which it participates. Moreover, it is necessary that 
the thing caused should participate of its cause, as from 
thence deriving its essence. 

But if that which is produced is partly separated 
from and partly united to its producing cause, if, indeed, 
it experiences each of these equally, it will equally par 
ticipate and not participate: so that in the same manner 
it will have essence and not have it from the producing 
cause. And if it is more separated from than united to 
it, the thing generated will be more foreign than allied 
to that by which it is generated, will be more unadapted 
than adapted to it, and be more deprived of than possess 
sympathy with it. If, therefore, the things which pro 
ceed from causes are allied to them according to their 
very being, have sympathy with them, are naturally de 
pendent on them, and aspire after contact with them, 
desiring good, and obtaining the object of their desire 
through the cause of their existence if this be the case, 
it is evident that things produced are in a greater degree 
united to their producing causes than separated from 



28 

them. Things, however, which are more united are 
more similar than dissimilar to the natures to which they 
are especially united. Every producing cause, therefore, 
constitutes things similar to itself prior to such as are 
dissimilar. 

PROPOSITION XXIX. 

Every progression is effected through a similitude of second 
ary to primary natures . 

For if that which produces constitutes similars prior 
to dissimilars, the similitude derived from the producing 
causes will constitute the things produced. For similars 
are rendered similar through similitude, and not through 
dissimilitude. If, therefore, progression in its diminu 
tion preserves a certain sameness of that which is gen 
erated with that which generates, and shows that such 
as the generator is primarily so is that posterior to it 
secondarily, it will have its nature through similitude. 

PROPOSITION xxx. 

Everything which- is produced from a certain tiling without 
a medium, abides in its producing cause, and proceeds 
from it. 

For if every progression is effected while primary 
natures remain permanent, and is accomplished through 
similitude, similars being constituted prior to dissimilars 
if this be the case, that which is produced will in a 
certain respect abide in its producing cause. For that 
which entirely proceeds will have nothing which is the 
same with the abiding cause, but will be perfectly separ 
ated from it, But if it has anything in common with 
and united to it, it will abide in its cause in the same 
manner as that abides in itself. If, however, it abides 
only but does not proceed, it will in no respect differ 
from its cause, nor will it while that abides be generated 
something different from it. For if it is something dif- 



ferent it is separated and apart from its cause. If, how 
ever, it is apart, but the cause abides, it will proceed 
from the cause in order that while it abides it may be 
separated from it. So far, therefore, as that which is 
produced has something which is the same with the pro 
ducing cause, it abides in it; but so far as it is different, 
it proceeds from it. Being, however, similar, it is in a 
certain respect at once both the same and different. 
Hence it abides and at the same time proceeds, and does 
neither of these without the other. 

PROPOSITION XXXI. 

Every thing which proceeds from another essentially, returns 
to that from which it proceeds. 

For if it should proceed, indeed, but should not re 
turn to the cause of this progression, it would not desire 
its cause. For everything which desires is converted to 
the object of its desire. Moreover, every thing desires 
good, and to each thing the attainment of it is through 
the proximate cause. Every thing, therefore, desires its 
cause: and the cause of being to any particular thing is 
likewise the cause of well-being (good) to it. But desire 
is primarily directed to the cause of well-being: and con 
version or return is to that to which desire primarily 
tends. 

PROPOSITION XXXII. 

Every conversion or return is effected through the similitude 
of the things converted to that to which they are converted. 

For every thing which is converted hastens to be 
conjoined with its cause, and desires communion and 
colligation with it. But similitude binds all things to 
gether, just as dissimilitude separates and disjoins all 
things. If, therefore, conversion or return is a certain 
communion and contact, but all communion and all con- 



30 

tact are through similitude if this be the case, every 
conversion will be effected through similitude. 

PROPOSITION XXXIII. 

Every thing which proceeds from another and returns to it 
has a circular energy (activity). 

For if it returns to that from which it proceeds, it con 
joins the end to the beginning, and the motion is one and 
continuous emanating from the abiding cause and re 
turning to it. Hence all things proceed in a circle from 
causes to causes: but there are greater and less circles 
of conversions (returns), some of which are to the na 
tures immediately above the things which are converted, 
but others are to still higher natures, and so on to the 
Principle of all things. For all things proceed from 
this Principle, and return to it. 13 

PROPOSITION XXXIV. 

Every thing which is converted according to nature makes its 
return to that from which it received the progression of 
its characteristic essence, 

For if it is converted according to nature, it will 
have an essential desire for that to which it is converted. 
But if this be the case, the whole being of it depends on 
that to which it makes an essential conversion, and it is 
essentially similar to it. Hence also it has a natural 
sympathy with it because it is cognate to the essence of 
it. If this be so, either the being of each is the same, 
or the one is derived from the other, or both are allotted 
similitude from a certain other one. But if the being of 

13 In order to understand this Proposition the reader must 
observe that the hypothesis requires that both the progression and 
regression subsist together. And this hypothesis is no less proper 
than true: for unless effects were continually converted to their 
causes they could not exist, since they depend on these for their 
subsistence, and this can only be procured by conversion. T. 



each is the same, how is the one naturally converted to 
the other? And if both are from a certain one, it will 
be according to nature for each to be converted to that 
one. It remains, therefore, that the one must derive its 
being from the other. But if this be the case, the pro 
gression will be from that to which the conversion or 
return is according to nature. 

Corollary. From these things, therefore, it is evi 
dent that intellect is the object of desire to all things, 
that all things proceed from intellect, and that the whole 
world, though it is eternal, possesses its essence from 
intellect. For the world is not prevented from proceed 
ing from intellect because it is eternal: neither because 

o 

it is always arranged is it not converted to intellect, but 
it always proceeds, is essentially eternal, always convert 
ed, and is indissoluble because it always remains in the 
same order. 

PROPOSITION XXXV. 

Every thing caused abides in, proceeds from, and returns to, 
its cause. 

For if it alone abided, it would in no respect differ 
from its cause, since it would be without separation and 
distinction from it. For progression is accompanied 
with separation. But if it alone proceeded, it would be 
unconjoined and deprived of sympathy with its cause, 
having no communication with it whatever. And if it 
were alone converted, how can that which has not its 
essence from the cause be essentially converted to that 
which is foreign to its nature? But if it should abide 
and proceed, but should not return, how will there be a 
natural desire to everything of well-being and of good, 
and an excitation to its generating cause? And if it 
should proceed and return, but should not abide, how, 
being separated from its cause, will it hasten to be con 
joined with it? For it was unconjoined prior to its de- 



32 

parture; since, if it had been conjoined, it would entirely 
have abided in it. But if it should abide and return, but 
should not proceed, how can that which is not separated 
be able to revert to its cause? For every thing" which is 
converted resembles that which is resolved into the nature 
from which it is essentially divided. It is necessary, 
therefore, either that it should abide alone, or return 
alone, or alone proceed, or that the extremes should be 
bound to each other, or that the medium should be con 
joined with each of the extremes, or that all should be 
conjoined. Hence it follows that every thing must abide 
in its cause, proceed from, and return to it. 14 

PROPOSITION XXXVI. 

Of all things wliich are multiplied in progression the first 
are more perfect than the second, the second than those 
posterior to them, and after the same manner succes 
sively. 

For if progressions separate productions from their 
causes, and there are diminutions of things secondary 
with respect to those which are first, it follows that first 
natures in proceeding are more conjoined with their 
causes, being as it were germinations from them. But 
secondary natures are more remote from their causes, 
and in a similar manner those which are successive. 
Things, however, which are nearer and more allied to 
their causes are more perfect. For causes are more 
perfect than things caused. But things which are more 
remote are more imperfect, because they are dissimilar 
to their causes. 



14 The return or conversion (sTtitfrpow/) is a rectifying of the 
way of life (svdradfGos f.7tavopfjG)6i$). As all things proceed from 
The One, so all yearn for their Principle and return to it, to the 
extent of their power. There are three primary forms of return, 
viz. through essence, through life, through knowledge. And in 
every Principle there are abiding, progression and return 



33 

PROPOSITION XXXVII. 

Of all things which subsist according to conversion, the first 
are more imperfect than the second, and the second than 
those that follow; but the last are the most perfect. 

For if conversions are effected in a circle, and con 
version or return is to that from which progression is 
derived, but progression is from that which is most per 
fect, hence conversion tends to the most perfect. And 
if conversion first begins from that in which progression 
terminates, but progression terminates in that which is 
most imperfect, conversion will begin from the most im 
perfect. Hence in things which subsist according to 
conversion, the most imperfect are the first, but the most 
perfect are the last. 

PROPOSITION XXXVIII. 

Every thing which proceeds from many causes returns 
through as many, and every conversion is through the 
same causes which produced the progression.^ 

For since both progression and return become 
through similitude, that indeed which passes immediate 
ly from a certain thing likewise immediately returns to 
it. For the similitude here is without a medium. But 

15 "The principal momenta in the dialectical process by which, 
according to Proclus, the formation of the world was accomplished, 
are the issuing of a thing from the cause and its return to the 
same. That which is brought forth is at the same time like and 
unlike its cause: in virtue of its likeness it is contained and remains 
in its cause; in virtue of its unlikeness it is separated from it; it 
must return to its cause by becoming like it, and in this return 
the same stadia are involved as in the previous forward or out- 
coming movement. All reality is subject to this law of triadic 
development. But the oftener the process is repeated the less per 
fect is the result. What is first is highest, the last is the lowest 
in rank and worth. The development is a descending one, and 
may be symbolized by the descending course of a spiral line."- 
Ueberweg. 



34 

that which requires a medium in proceeding requires 
also a medium in returning. For it is necessary that 
each should be effected with reference to the same thing. 
Hence the return will be first to the medium, and then 
to that which is better than the medium. Therefore the 
causes of being to each thing are equal in number to the 
causes of well-being, and vice versa. 

PROPOSITION XXXIX. 

Every being either alone essentially returns, or vitally, or 
gnostically. 

For either it alone possesses being from its cause, 
or life with being, or it receives from thence a gnostic 
power. So far, therefore, as every being alone is, itmakes 
an essential conversion, but so far as it lives, a vital, and 
so far as it knows, agnostic conversion. For as it proceed 
ed from its cause, so does it return to it, and the measures 
of its conversion are limited by the measures according to 
its progression. The desire to return therefore is to some 
according to being alone, this desire being an aptitude 
for the participation of causes; but to others it is accord 
ing to life, being a motion to more excellent natures; 
and to others it is according to knowledge, being a 
conscious perception of the goodness of their causes. 

PROPOSITION XL. 

The natures which exist from and of themselves, and have a 
self-subsistent essence, precede those which proceed from 
another cause- 

For if every nature which is self-sufficient, either by 
reason of its essence or energy, is more excellent than 
that which depends on another cause; and that which 
produces itself, since it produces the being of itself, is 
sufficient to itself with respect to essence; and that which 
is alone produced by another is not sufficient to itself; 



35 

and the self-sufficient is more allied to The Good; and 
things more allied and similar to their causes subsist 
from cause prior to such as are dissimilar; this being 
the case, the natures which are produced by themselves, 
and are self-subsistent, are more ancient than those 
which proceed into existence from another cause alone. 
For either there will be nothing self-subsistent, or The 
Good is a thing of this kind, or the first things which 
subsist from The Good. But if there is nothing self- 
subsistent, truly there will not be in anything self-suffici 
ency. It will not be in The Good, since that being The 
One is better than self-sufficiency: it is also The Good it 
self, and not that which possesess The Good. Nor will 
self-sufficiency be in things posterior to The Good: for 
all things will be indigent of that which is prior to their 
nature. But if The Good is self-subsistent, because it 
produces itself, it will not be The One. For that which 
proceeds from The One is not The One. And it would 
proceed from itself, if it was self-subsistent; so that The 
One would at the same time be one and not one. Hence 
it is necessary that the self-subsistent should be posterior 
to the First. And it is evident that it will be prior to 
things which alone proceed from another cause: for it 
has a more principal subsistence than these, and is more 
allied to The Good, as has been demonstrated. 

PROPOSITION XLI. 

Every thing which is in another is alone produced by another; 
but every thing which is in itself is self-subsistent. 

For that which is in another and is indigent of a 
subject can never be generative of itself. For that which 
is naturally competent to generate itself does not require 
another base, because it is contained by itself, and is 
preserved in itself apart from a subject. But that which 
abides, and is able to be established in itself, is produc 
tive of itself, itself proceeding into itself, and being con- 



30 

nective of itself: and thus it is in itself, as the thing- 
caused is in its cause. For it is not in itself, as in place or 
as in a subject: since place is different from that which 
is in place, and that which is in a subject is different from 
the subject. But this which is in itself is the same with 
that in which it is inherent. It is therefore self-subsist- 
ent, and abides in itself as that which is from a cause is 
in the cause. 

PROPOSITION XLII. 
Every tiling self-subsistent is able to return to itself. 

For if it proceeds from itself, it will likewise return 
to itself. For to that which is the source of a progres 
sion there is a return coordinate to the progression. For 
if it alone proceeded from itself, and did not return to it 
self, it would never strive for its characteristic good, and 
that which it is able to impart to itself. Every cause, how 
ever, is able to impart to that which proceeds from it 
both essence and well-being conjoined with this essence. 
Hence that which is self-subsistent will impart this to 
itself. This therefore is the proper good to that which 
is self-subsistent. And hence this will not be the object 
of desire to that which does not return to itself. But 
not desiring this good, it will not obtain it, and not ob 
taining it, it will be imperfect and not self-sufficient. If, 
however, self-sufficiency and perfection belong to any 
thing, it must be to that which is self-subsistent. Hence 
it will desire and obtain its characteristic good, and will 
return to itself. 

PROPOSITION XLIII. 

Every thing which is able to return to itself is self-subsistent. 
For if it returns to itself according to nature, it is 
perfect in the conversion to itself, and will possess essence 
from itself. For from every thing to which there is a 
return according to nature, there is equally a progres- 



37 

sion according to essence. If, therefore, it imparts well- 
being to itself, it will likewise undoubtedly impart being 
to itself, and will be the lord of its own hypostasis or 
nature. Hence that which is able to revert to itself is 
self-subsistent. 

PROPOSITION XLIV. 

Every thing which is able to return to itself through energy 
or activity, is likewise able to return to itself through 
essence. 

For if it is capable of reverting to itself through its 
activity but not through its essence, it will be more ex 
cellent in activity than in essence, the former being re- 
vertive, but the latter not. For that which depends on 
itself is better than that which alone depends on another. 
And that which has a power of preserving itself is more 
perfect than that which is alone preserved by another. 
If, therefore, it is revertible to itself through the activity 
emanating from essence, it will also be allotted a re 
vertible essence, so that it will not alone energize within 
itself but will depend on itself, and will be contained, 
connected, and perfected by itself. 

PROPOSITION XLV. 
Every thing self-subsistent is unbegotten. 

For if it be generated, because of its generation it 
will be imperfect of itself, and will be indigent of per 
fection emanating from another. Because, however, it 
produces itself, it is perfect and self-sufficient. For 
every thing generated is perfected by another, which 
imparts generation to it not yet existing. For genera 
tion is a path from the imperfect to its contrary, the per 
fect. But if anything produces itself it is always per 
fect, since it is always present with the cause of itself, 
or rather is inherent in that which is perfective of its es 
sence. 



3S 

PROPOSITION XLVI. 
Every thing self -sub sistent is incorruptible. 

For if it should be corrupted, it would depart from 
itself and would be without itself. This, however, is im 
possible. For, since it is one, it is at the same time cause 
and the thing" caused. But every thing which is cor 
rupted, is corrupted departing from its cause. For so 
far as it adheres to that which contains, connects, and 
preserves it, it is connected and preserved But that 
which is self-subsistent never leaves its cause because it 
does not desert itself: for it is its own cause. Every 
thing, therefore, which is self-subsistent is incorruptible. 

PROPOSITION XLVII. 
Every thing self-subsistent is impartible and simple. 

For if it is partible, since it is self-subsistent, it will 
constitute itself partible, and the whole will return to 
itself, and all will be in all itself. 16 This, however, is im 
possible. Hence that which is self-subsistent is impart 
ible, but it is likewise simple. For, if it is a composite, 
one thing in it will be less but another more excellent, and 
the more will be derived from the less excellent, and 
the less from the more excellent, if the whole proceeds 
from itself. 17 Further, it would not be self-sufficient, 
since it would be indigent of its own elements, of which 
it consists. 18 

16 This is absurd, because every partible nature must be con 
verted to something different from itself, on account of its parts. 
So, likewise, since a self-subsistent nature resides in itself, if such 
a nature was partible one divisible whole would be in another, not 
different from itself. T. 

17 Because every composite consists of matter and form; the 
former of which is less and the latter more excellent. T. 

18 See Porphyry s Auxiliaries to the Perception of Intelligible 
Natures, Nos. XXXIII. and XXXVI. 



39 

Every thing, therefore, which is self-subsistent is 
impartible and simple. 

On the Perpetual, Demonstrating 
That the World is Perpetual. 1 * 

PROPOSITION XLVIII. 

Every thing which is not perpetual is either a composite or 
subsists in another. 

For either it is dissoluble into those things of which 

19 "He participates also the eternity of Intellect, as an image 
thereof; otherwise he would at some time cease to possess that 
image. But this is not an image formed by art; and every image 
formed by nature lasts as long as its archetype endures. For this 
reason they are not in the right who suppose that the sensible 
world will perish while the intelligible remains, and who think the 
former was produced as the result of deliberation on the part of 
the Creator. For whatever be the manner of such a creation, they 
will not understand, nor do they know, that as long as that intelli 
gible world shines, this world of ours will never fail, but since that 
is, this also exists. But the intelligible world ever was and ever 
will be; for we are obliged, by the desire of signifying something 
concerning it, to employ such words as these/ i. e , such expres 
sions as "ZMS" and "will be" cannot properly be applied to that 
which is eternal. Plotinus: En. V. Lib. 8. 12. An excellent trans 
lation of this book, Concerning Intelligible Beauty, by W. C. Ward, 
appeared in The Theosophical Review. See further, on the Per 
petuity of the World, Plotinus: En. II. Lib. 1., On the Heaven, and 
En. III. Lib. 7., On Eternity and Time; Proclus: Theol. Plat. Lib. III. 
16., and Stobaeus in Eclog. Lib. I. cap. 22. 

To exiSiov, The Perpetual. Is that which subsists always, but is 
connected with the three parts of time, the past, present, and 
future. Hence the fabricator of the world is eternal, but the 
world is perpetual. T. 

To aiGoviov, The Eternal. Is that which has a never ending 
subsistence, without any connection with time. For Eternity, as 
it is profoundly defined by Plotinus, is infinite life, the whole of 
which is at once present, without any thing belonging to it being 
consumed, and in which there is neither past nor future. (En. III. 
Lib. 7.)-T. 



4 

it consists, and is entirely composed of the things into 
which it is dissolved, or it is indigent of a subject and, 
leaving the subject, it departs into nonentity. But if it 
is simple in itself it will be indissoluble and incapable of 
being dissipated. 

PROPOSITION XLIX. 
Every self-subsistent native is perpetual. 

For there are two modes according to which it is 
necessary a thing should not be perpetual: the one aris 
ing from composition, and the other from a subsistence 
in something else, as in a subject. That which is self- 
subsistent, however, is neither a composite but a simple, 
nor in another but in itself. Hence it is perpetual. 

PROPOSITION L. 

Every thing ivhich is measured by time, either according to 
essence or according to activity, is generation so far as it 
is measured by time. 

For if it is measured by time it will belong to it to 
be, or to act, in time; and the was and the will be, which 
differ from each other, pertain to it. For if the was and 
the will be were the same in number, that which is mea 
sured by time would suffer nothing by time proceeding, 
and always having one part prior and another posterior. 
If, therefore, the was and the will be are different, that 
which is measured by time is becoming to be and never 
is, but proceeds together with time by which it is mea 
sured, existing in a tendency to being. 20 

It likewise does not stop in the same state of being, 
but is always receiving another and another being, just as 
the now in time is always another and another, through 
the progression of time. Hence it is not a simultaneous 
whole; for it subsists in a dispersion of temporal exten- 

20 See Additional Notes. 



4 1 

sion, and is co-extended with time. This, however, is to 
possess being in non-being. For that which is becom 
ing to be is not that which is become. Generation, 
therefore, is such a kind of being. 

PROPOSITION LI. 

Every thing self-subsistent is essentially exempt from the 
natures which are measured by time. 

For if that which is self-subsistent is unbegotten, it 
will not be measured by time, according to existence. 
For generation is conversant with the nature which is 

o 

measured by time. Hence nothing self-subsistent has 
its being in time. 

PROPOSITION LII. 

Every thing eternal is a whole which subsist sat once -.whether 
it has its essence alone eternal, possessing the whole 
at once present, but not having one of its parts al 
ready constituted, and another to be constituted because 
it is not yet in existence, but as much as is pos 
sible it now possesses the whole without diminu 
tion and without extension or whether it has its activ 
ity as well as its essence at once present, it possessing 
this likewise collectively, abiding in the same measure of 
perfection, and as it were fixed immovably and without 
transition according to one and the same boundary 

For if the eternal, as the name denotes, is unceas 
ing being, but being and becoming to be are different 
from unceasing being, it is not right that it should have 
one thing prior and another posterior. For in that case 
it would be generation and not being. But where there 
is neither prior nor posterior, nor was and will be, but 
being alone, and this a whole, there every thing subsists 
at once that which it is. The same thing likewise takes 
place with respect to the activity of that which is 
eternal. 



42 

Corollary. From this it is evident that eternity is 
the cause to wholes of their existence as wholes, since 
every thing which is eternal either in essence or in en 
ergy, has the whole of its essence or energy present to 
itself. 

On Eternity and Eternal Natures. 

PROPOSITION LIII. 

Eternity subsists prior to all eternal natures, and time exists 
prior to every thing which subsists in time. 

For if everywhere the natures which are partici 
pated are prior to their participants, and imparticipables 
are prior to participated natures, it is evident that the 
eternal is one thing, the eternity which is in the eternal 
another, and eternity itself another. And the first of 
these indeed subsists as a participant, the second as a 
thing participated, and the third as an imparticipable. 
That likewise which is in time is one thing, for it is a 
participant; the time which is in this is another thing, 
for it is participated: and the time prior to this is 
another thing, for it is imparticipable. Everywhere, also, 
each of these is from the imparticipable, which is in all 
things the same. But that which is participated is in 
those things only by which it is participated. For there 
are many eternal and many temporal natures, in all of 
which eternity subsists by participation. The time also 
which is in temporal natures subsists divisibly; but the 
time which they participate is indivisible. And there is 
one time prior to both of these. Eternity itself, likewise, 
is an eternity of eternities, and time itself is a time of 
times; and the one constitutes participated eternity, but 
other participated time. 21 

21 See Plato s Timaeus, pp. 36, 38; Aristotle s On the Heaven, 
I. 9; Plotinus book, On Eternity and Time; Proclus On the Theol 
ogy of Plato, I. 13., III. 16., and V. 30; and Jo. Laur. Lydus De 
Mensibus, p. 41, 



43 

PROPOSITION LIV. 

Every eternity is the measure of eternal natures, and every 
time is the measure of things in time; and these are the 
only two measures of life and motion in beings. 

For every thing which measures, either measures 
according to a part, or it measures the whole at once 
when it is adapted to that which is measured. That 
which measures, therefore, according to the whole is 
eternity, but that which measures according to parts is 
time. Hence there are only two measures, the one of 
things eternal, but the other of things in time, 

PROPOSITION LV. 

Every thing which subsists in time, either subsists through 
the whole of time, or has its hypostasis once in a part 
of time. 

For if all progressions are through similitude, and 
things more similar to first natures subsist in union with 
them prior to those which are dissimilar, but it is impos 
sible for things which are generated in a part of time to 
be conjoined with eternal natures for, because they are 
generated they differ from first natures, which are self- 
subsistent, and as existing at one time they are sepa 
rated from things which always exist, but the media be 
tween these are the things which are partly similar and 
partly dissimilar to them this being the case, the 
medium between things which are at one time gene 
rated and those that exist always is either that which is 
always becoming to be, or that which is at one time, or 
that which is not truly being. It is, however, impossible 
it should be that which at one time only truly is. And 
that which is at one time not truly being is the same 
with that which is becoming to be: hence this is not 
the medium. It follows, therefore, that the medium be 
tween both is that which is always becoming to be, con- 



44 

joined indeed with the worse of the two through becom 
ing to be, but through subsisting always imitating an 
eternal nature. 

Corollary. From these things it is evident that the 
perpetuity is two-fold, the one eternal, but the other 
temporal. The one likewise a stable, but the other a flow 
ing perpetuity. And the one indeed has its being 
united, and the whole subsisting at once, but the other 
diffused and expanded according to temporal extension. 
And the one is a whole of itself, but the other consists 
of parts, each of which is separate, according to prior 
and posterior. 

PROPOSITION LVI. 

Every thing which is produced by secondary natures is pro 
duced in a greater degree by prior and more causal na 
tures, by whom those which are secondary were also 
produced. 

For if that which is secondary has the whole of its 
essence from that which is prior to it, its power of pro 
ducing is also derived from thence, for productive 
powers are essentially in producing causes, and give com 
pletion to the essence of them. But if it is allotted the 
power of producing from a superior cause, it will have 
from that its existence as the cause of things of 
which it is the cause, and its power of constituting 
other things will be measured from thence. If, how 
ever, this be the case, the things proceeding from it 
are effects through that which is prior to it. For the 
one perfects a cause, and the other the thing caused. 
But if this be so, the thing caused is from thence 
rendered such as it is. 

Moreover, that it is likewise in a greater degree 
perfected from thence is evident. For if that which 
is first imparts to that which is second the cause of 



45 

producing, it will primarily possess this cause; and 
on this account that which is secondary generates, re 
ceiving from the first a secondary generative power. 
If, however, the one becomes productive through par 
ticipation, but the other in a way superior to partici 
pation and primarily, that will be in a greater degree 
a cause which imparts generative power to another 
thing proximate to its own nature. 

PROPOSITION LVII. 

Every cause energizes prior to the thing caused, and consti 
tutes more effects posterior to it. 

For so far as it is cause it is more perfect and 
more powerful than that which is posterior to it, and 
by reason of this is the cause of more effects. For it 
is the province of a greater power to produce more, of 
an equal power to produce equal, and of a less power 
to produce a less, number of effects. And the power 
which is able to effect greater things among similars is 
also capable of effecting those which are less. But that 
which is able to effect those which are less is not neces 
sarily capable of producing those which are greater. If, 
therefore, the cause is more powerful, it is productive of 
more numerous effects. 

Moreover, the effects which the thing caused is able 
to produce, the cause is in a greater degree able to pro 
duce. For every thing which is produced by secondary 
natures is in a greater degree produced by those which 
are prior and more causal. All things, therefore, which 
the thing caused is naturally able to produce co-exist 
with and are produced by the cause. But if likewise it 
produces prior to it, it is indeed evident that it energizes 
prior to the thing caused, according to the energy which 
is productive of it. Every cause, therefore, energizes 
prior to the thing caused, and with it and posterior to 



4 6 

it constitutes other things. 

Corollary. Hence it is evident that of the things 
of which soul is the cause, intellect likewise is the cause; 
but that soul is not equally the cause of the things of 
which intellect is the cause. But intellect energizes 
prior to the soul. And the things which soul imparts 
to secondary natures, intellect likewise imparts in a 
greater degree: and when soul no longer energizes, in 
tellect imparts by illumination the gifts of itself to those 
things to which soul does not impart herself. For that 
which is inanimate, so far as it participates of form par 
ticipates of intellect, and the production of intellect. 22 
Moreover, of the things of which intellect is the cause, 
The Good likewise is the cause; but not vice versa. For 
the privations of forms are from The Good; since all 
things are from thence. But intellect, since it is form, 
does not constitute privation. 

PROPOSITION LVIII. 

Every thing which is produced by many is more composite 
than that which is produced by fewer causes. 

For if every cause imparts something to that which 
proceeds from it, more causes will impart a greater num 
ber of gifts, but fewer causes a less number. Hence, 
of participants some will consist of a greater number of 
things, but others of a less number, of which each par 
ticipates; some, indeed through a progression from a 
greater number of causes, but others from a less. Those, 
however, which proceed from a greater number of 
causes are more composite, but those from a less num 
ber of the same causes are more simple. Every thing, 
therefore, which is produced by a greater number of 
causes is more composite, but that which is produced by 

22 See Proclus, On the Theology of Plato, 1.13. II.4. and III.7., 
where the conceptions of Parmenides, Plato, Plotinus and others 
on the subject are examined and unfolded. 



47 

a less number is more simple. For the more composite 
participates of those things of which the more simple 
participates, but the contrary to this is not true. 

PROPOSITION LIX. 

Every thing which is simple in essence is either better or 
worse than composite natures. 

For if the beings which are the extremes of things 
are produced by fewer and more simple causes, but 
those which are in the middle by a great number of 
causes, the latter indeed will be composites, but of the 
former some are more simple according to that which 
is better, but others according to that which is worse. 
That the extremes, however, are produced by fewer 
causes is evident, because the natures which are higher 
begin to produce prior to those which are subordi 
nate, and extend beyond them to things to which su 
bordinate natures do not proceed, through a diminution 
of power. Therefore the last of things, z. e., matter, is 
most simple, as well as the first of things, because it 
proceeds from the first alone. But, of these simplicities 
one is better than all composition, but the other accord 
ing to that which is worse. And there is the same rea 
soning with respect to all things. 23 

PROPOSITION LX. 

Every thing which is the cause of many effects is better than 
that which is allotted a power of producing few, and 
ivliich produces the parts of those things the wholes of 
which the other constitutes. 

For if the one is the cause of a few, but the other 
of many effects, but the former are parts of the latter, 
that which constitutes many effects will produce all that 

23 See Aristotle s Metaphysics, VII. 17. and Plotinus: En. V. 
3.13., En. IV. 7.2., En. VI. 2., 9, 10., and Proclus, On the Theology 
of Plato, VI. 11. 



the other produces, but not vice versa. Hence the former 
of these two is more powerful and more comprehensive. 
For as that which proceeds is to that which proceeds, so 
is one productive power to another, when assumed with 
reference to each other. For that which is able to ef 
fect a greater number of things possesses a greater and 
more total power. But this is nearer to the cause of 
all things. That, however, which is nearer to the cause 
is in a greater degree good, just as the cause of all is 
The Good itself. Hence that which is the cause of 
many effects is essentially more excellent than that 
which produces a few. 

PROPOSITION LXI. 

Every power which is impartible is greater, but when divid 
ed is less. 

For if it is divided it proceeds into multitude. And 
if this be so, it becomes more remote from The One. 
But because of this it is able to effect a fewer number 
of things, through departing from The One, which con 
tains it, and will be imperfect, since the good of every 
thing consists in union. 

PROPOSITION LXII 

Every multitude which is nearer to The One is less in quan 
tity than things more remote from it, but is Beater in 
power. 

For that which is nearer to is more similar to The 
One. But The One constitutes all things without hav 
ing any multitude in itself. Hence that which is more 
similar to it, since it is the cause of a greater number of 
effects, if The One is the cause of all things, will be 
more unical and more impartible and thereby resemble 
The One. As, therefore, that which is less multiplied 
is more allied to The One, so likewise, since it is allied 



49 

to the cause of all things, it is productive of a greater 
number of effects. Hence it is more powerful. 

Corollary. From these things, it is evident that 
there are more corporeal natures than souls; more souls 
than intellectual natures; and more intellects than divine 
unities. And there is the same reason or proportion in 
all other things. 

PROPOSITION LXIII. 

Every thing which is imparticipable constitutes two-fold or 
ders of participated natures one in things ivhich occa 
sionally participate, but the other in things which always 
and connascently participate. 

For that which is always participated is more sim 
ilar to the imparticipable than that which is occasionally 
participated. Hence before the imparticipable estab 
lishes that which is occasionally it will establish that 
which is always participable, and which by being partic 
ipated differs from that whtch is posterior to it, but by 
the always is more allied and more similar to the im 
participable. Nor are there alone things which are oc 
casionally participated; for prior to these are the na- 
turee which are always participated, through which these 
also are bound to imparticipables according to a certain 
well-ordered progression. Nor are there alone things 
which are always participated. For these, possessing 
an inextinguishable power, since they are always, are 
prolific of other things which are occasionally partici 
pated, and as far as to these the diminution proceeds. 

Corollary. From hence it is evident that of the 
unions proceeding from The One, and which illuminate 
beings, some are always but others occasionally partici 
pated. Intellectual participations, likewise, are in a 
similar manner twofold, as also are the animations 
of souls and the participations of other forms. For 
beauty, similitude, permanency, and sameness, since 



50 

they are imparticipable, are participated through na 
tures which always participate, and, secondarily, by 
those that occasionally participate according to the 
same order. 24 

PROPOSITION LXIV. 

Every archical monad constitutes a twofold number; one of 
self-perfect hypostases or natures, but the other of illumi 
nations which possess their hypostasis in other things. -$ 

For if progression is according to diminution 
through things appropriate to producing causes, perfect 
natures will proceed from the all-perfect, and through 
these as media imperfect natures will proceed in a well- 
ordered progression, so that some will be self-perfect 
hypostases, but others will be imperfect. And the im 
perfect will become the forms of participants: for, be- 

24 See Plotinus book, On the Beautiful, (En. I. 6), chapters 
1 and 2. This whole work is replete with wonderful insights, and 
will richly repay the deepest study. 

25 An archical monad* is one which has the relation of a 
principle to an entity. According to Butherus, (quoted by Sto- 
baeus in Eclog. I. 5), number is composed of monads. The mo 
nad is the principle and measure of beings, simple, unbegotten, 
perpetual, alone, pure, self-subsistent, the beginning and first na 
ture." All that is known of Butherus is that he was a Pythag 
orean of Cyzicus, a city of Mysia, Asia Minor, and that he flour 
ished about the 4th. century, B. C. Aside from the quotations 
preserved by Stobaeus, there is nothing extant of his writings. 

The author of the Theologumena Arithmeticae, who was al 
most certainly lamblichus, says that "the monad is the principle 
of number." See the valuable Introductio Arithmetica of Nico- 
machus of Gerasa, I. 11. Also, Plotinus, On the Three Archical 
Hypostases, (En. V. 1.), Auxiliaries of Porphyry, No. XXXVIII. 
and Proclus, On the Theology of Plato, I. 3. 

Taylor s Theoretic Arithmetic, (London, 1816), contains an 
accurate and exhaustive exposition of the nature of the monad 
and numbers, drawn from ancient authorities, with the addition 
of original matter. It is the best work on the subject. 



cause they are imperfect, they will be indigent of sub 
jects in their very nature. But the self-perfect hy- 
postases will produce things which participate of them 
selves: for, since they are perfect, they will indeed fill these 
from themselves, and establish them in themselves. But 
they will require nothing of inferior natures to their own 
subsistence. Self-perfect hypostases, therefore, through 
their separation into multitude are indeed diminished 
with respect to their principal monad, but through their 
self-perfect hyparxis they are in a certain respect assim 
ilated to it. But imperfect hypostases, by reason of 
subsisting in other things, are remote from that which 
subsists from itself, and through their imperfection are 
separated from that which perfects all things. Progres 
sions, however, are through similars, even to natures 
which are entirely dissimilar. Every archical monad, 
therefore, constitutes a twofold number. 

Corollary. From these things it is evident that of 
the unities some are self-perfect proceeding from The 
One, but others are illuminations of unities and intel 
lect. And some of them are self-perfect essences, but 
others are only the images of souls which are animated. 
And hence neither is every union a God but this is 
true of a self-perfect unity alone nor is every intel 
lectual peculiarity an intellect, but an essential peculiar 
ity alone is entitled to this appellation; nor is every il 
lumination of soul a soul, but there are likewise images 
of souls. 

PROPOSITION LXV. 

Every thing which subsists in any manner whatsoever, either 
subsists causally, having the form, of a principle, or 
according to hyparxis, or according to participation, 
iconically. 

For either that which is produced is seen in that 
which produces, as preexisting in cause, because every 



52 

cause antecedently contains in itself the thing caused, 
being that primarily which the thing caused is second 
arily, or that which produces is seen in that which is 
produced. For the latter, participating of the former, 
exhibits in itself secondarily that which the producing 
cause is primarily. Or each thing is beheld in its own 
order, and is neither seen in the cause nor in the effect. 
For the cause is better than that which exists out of the 
cause. But that which is in the effect is inferior to that 
which exists out of the cause, but is not in anything 
else. It is, however, necessary there should be that 
which in this manner is. But every thing subsists ac 
cording to hyparxis in its own order. 26 

PROPOSITION LXVI. 

All beings in relation to each other are either wholes or parts, 
or the same or different. 

For either some of them contain, but the others are 
contained, or they neither contain nor are contained. 
And they either experience something which is the 
same, as participating of one, or they are separated from 
each other. But if they contain they will be wholes, and 
if they are contained, parts. If, likewise, many things 
participate of one, they are the same according to one. 
But if they are alone many things, so far as they are 
many they will be different from each other. 

PROPOSITION LXVII. 

Every totality is either prior to parts, or consists of parts, or 
is in a part. 

For either the form of each thing is surveyed in its 

26 By vicap&s, hyparxis, in these Elements is meant that 
characteristic or summit of any nature through which it subsists, 
and in the Gods is the same with the unity and deity of their na 
tures. And by vito6Ta&lt;5is, hypostasis, is meant any individual na 
ture, whether essential or super essential, considered as something 
distinct and different from accident. T. 



53 

cause, and we call that which subsists in its cause a 
whole prior to parts, because it presubsists in the cause, 
or it is seen in the parts which participate of it. And 
this in a twofold respect: for it is either seen in all the 
parts together, aud this is a whole consisting- of parts, 
any part of which being absent diminishes the whole, 
or, it is seen in each of the parts, so that the part like 
wise becomes by participation a whole; which makes 
the part to be a whole partially. The whole, therefore, 
which is according to hyparxis consists of parts; but the 
whole which is prior to parts is according to cause. And 
the whole which is in a part is according to participa 
tion: for this, likewise, according to an ultimate diminu 
tion or remission is a whole so far as it imitates the 
whole which consists of parts, since it is not any casual 
part, but that which is capable of being assimilated to 
a whole of which the parts likewise are wholes. 

PROPOSITION LXVIII. 

Every wliole which is in a part is a part of that whole which 
consists of parts. 

For if it is a part, it is a part of a certain whole. 
And it is either a part of the whole which it contains, 
according to which it is said to be a whole in a part, 
but thus it will be a part of itself, the part will be equal 
to the whole, and each will be the same, or it will be 
a part of a certain other whole. And if of some other, 
it is either the only part of that, and thus again it will in 
no respect differ from the whole, being one part of one 
thing, or it will be a part in conjunction with another 
part. For of every whole the parts are more than one, 
and that will be a whole of the many parts of which it 
consists. And thus the whole which is in a part is a 
part of the whole which consists of parts. 



54 

PROPOSITION LXIX. 

Every whole which consists of parts participates of the whole 
ness which is prior to parts. 27 

For if it consists of parts the whole is passive, i. e., 
the whole participates of another whole. For the parts 
becoming one are passive to a whole on account of their 
union, and the whole subsists in parts which are not 
wholes. But the imparticipable subsist prior to every 
thing which is participated. The imparticipable whole 
ness, therefore, subsists prior to that which is partici 
pated. Hence there is a certain form of wholeness 

27 A totality or wholeness (w/lor?/?) is a whole which has a 
perpetual subsistence, and which comprehends in itself ail the 
multitude of which it is the cause. T. 

Of these four elements the constitution of the world took 
in the whole of each. Of the whole of Fire, Water, Air and 
Earth its Artificer fabricated it, leaving no part of any one of these 
nor any power of them outside: intending thereby, first, that the 
world should be an animal in the highest degree a perfect whole 
composed of perfect parts. Plato: Timaeus, VII. 

The doctrine of these perfect parts or wholes of the universe 
is of the first importance in the philosophy of Plato, and forms 
one of the grand articles of belief in the creed of the 
Platonic philosopher. T. 

I believe that as the world considered as one great compre 
hending whole is a divine animal, so likewise every whole which it 
contains is a world, possessing in the first place a self -perfect unity 
proceeding from the ineffable, by which it becomes a god; in the 
second place, a divine intellect; in the third place, a divine soul; 
and in the last place, a deified body. That each of these wholes is 
the producing cause of all the multitude which it contains, and on 
this account is said to be a whole prior to parts, because consider 
ed as possessing an eternal form which holds all its parts together, 
and gives to the whole perpetuity of subsistence, it is not indigent 
of such parts to the perfection of its being. And that it follows 
by a geometrical necessity that these wholes which rank thus high 
in the universe must be animated. T. 

See Plotinus: En. IV. 3. 2., and Proclus in Plat. Theol. pp. 
Ill sq. 155 sq. 221 sq. 



55 

prior to the whole which consists of parts, which is not 
passive to a whole, but is wholeness itself, and from 
which the wholeness consisting- of parts is derived. For 
the whole, indeed, which consists of parts subsists in 
many places and in many things, in various ways. It is 
however, necessary that there should be a monad es 
sentially of all totalities. For neither is each of these 
wholes genuine, since it is indigent of parts which are 
not wholes, of which it consists. Nor is the whole 
which is in a certain thing capable of being- the cause of 
wholeness to all other things. Hence that which is the 
cause to all wholes of their being wholes is prior to 
parts. For if this also consisted of parts, it would be a 
certain whole and not simply whole. And, again, this 
would be from another whole, and so on to infinity; or 
it will subsist on account of that which is primarily a 
whole, and which is not a whole from parts, but is a 
wholeness. 

PROPOSITION LXX. 

Every thing which is more total is among principal causes, 
and prior to partial natures illuminates participants; 
and that which participates something remains secon 
dary to principal causes. 

For it begins its activity in secondary natures prior 
to that which is posterior to it, and is present with the 
presence of it. When, likewise, that which is posterior 
to it no longer acts the more causal is still present, and 
continues to act. And this not only in different subjects 
but likewise in each of the natures which sometimes 
participate. Thus it is necessary, for instance, that be 
ing should be first generated, then animal, and then 
man. And man indeed is no more, if the rational power 
departs, but there is still animal, breathing and senti 
ent. And, again, life failing-, being remains. For 



56 

though a thing- does not live, yet it has existence. And 
there is a similar reasoning in all things. 28 

The cause, however, of this is, that the more causal 
nature, being more efficacious, acts prior to that which 
participates. For the thing caused experiences first 
that which is more powerful. And that which is sec 
ondary again acting, that which is more powerful acts 
with it. Because everything which the secondary na 
ture produces, that which is more causal produces like 
wise in conjunction with it. And if the former fails, the 
latter is still present. For the communication of the more 
powerful cause, operating in a greater degree, leaves 
last that which participates it. For through the com 
munication of the secondary nature it corroborates its 
own illumination. 

28 See the very valuable and profound work of Plotinus, On 
the Nature of Living itself and on the Nature of Man, (En. I. 1.) 
My translation of this book was printed in Vol. IV. Nos. 5 and 
6 of The Platonist. See, further, Plotinus: En. VI. 1. and En. 
VI. 6. 9.; Damascius Uf.pr T&V Upwrcov Apx^r, p. 69, ed. Ruelle, 
Paris, 1899; and Syrianus in Aristot. Metaphys. II. p. 46, ed. 
Kroll, Berlin, 1902. 

Of the massive treatise of Damascius, Doubts and Solutions 
concerning First Principles, "which has preserved a most valu 
able store of recondite wisdom, and unfolded some of the sub- 
limest mysteries of the ancient theology," unfortunately there is 
no English translation. In No. 2 of the Bibliotheca Platonica I 
began the publication of an English version, preceded by a bio 
graphical and bibliographical introduction, but only six chapters 
appeared. As I have said elsewhere, he alone who is able to rise 
above sensuous perceptions, and cognize universals, can compre 
hend and appreciate this work. 

The Commentary of Syrianus on the II. III. XII. and XIII. books 
of the Metaphysics of Aristotle, an exposition of great learning 
and subtle reasoning, awaits a translation into any language other 
than the Latin. Parts of it however were translated by Taylor, in 
his notes to Aristotle s Metaphysics. It is an absolute and com 
plete refutation of all the objections, apparent or otherwise, urged 
by Aristotle and the Peripatetics against the Platonic doctrines, 
especially that of Ideas. 



57 

PROPOSITION LXXI. 

All things which are among principal causes, since tliey pos 
sess a more universal and higher order in their effects, ac 
cording to the illuminations proceeding from them, be 
come in a, certain respect subject to the communications 
of more partial causes. And the illuminations indeed 
from higher causes receive the progressions from second 
ary causes; but the latter are established in the former. 
And thus some participations precede others, and some 
representations extend after others, beginning from on 
high, to the same subject,more total causes having a prior 
activity, but those which are more partial sup ply ing their 
participants with theii* communications, posterior to the 
activities of more total causes. 

For if more causal natures act prior to those which 
are secondary on account of exuberance of power, and 
are present to those which have a more imperfect 
aptitude, and likewise illuminate them; but things more 
subordinate and secondary in rank are supplied from 
those which are more causal, it is evident that the illum 
inations of superior natures antecedently comprehend 
that which participates of both of these, and give stabil 
ity to the communications of things subordinate. But 
these illuminations of superior causes employ the re 
semblances of subordinate natures as foundations, and 
operate on that which participates of them, the superior 
causes themselves having a prior activity. 

PROPOSITION LXXII. 

All things which in their participants have the relation of a 
subject proceed from more perfect and total causes. 

For the causes of a greater number of effects are 
more powerful and total, and are nearer to The One, 
than the causes of fewer effects. But the natures which 
constitute the things which are antecedently the sub- 



58 

jects of others, are the causes of a greater number of 
effects, constituting the properties or peculiarities prior 
to the presence of forms. And hence these among 
causes are more universal and perfect. 

Corollary. From hence it is evident why matter 
which derives its subsistence from The One is of itself 
destitute of form: and why body, though it participates 
of being, is of itself destitute of soul. For matter, since 
it is the subject of all things, proceeds from the cause of 
all; but body, because it is the subject of animation, de 
rives its subsistence from that which is more universal 
than soul, because it participates in a certain respect of 
being. 29 

PROPOSITION LXXIII. 

Every whole is at the same time a certain being and partici 
pates of being, but not every being is a whole. 

For either being and whole are the same, or the one 
is prior but the other posterior. If, however, a part so 
far as it is a part is being, (for a whole is from parts 
which have a being), yet it is not of itself likewise a 
whole. Being, therefore, and whole are not the same: 
for if this were the case, a part would be a nonentity. 
But if a part was a nonentity, the whole would not exist. 
For every whole is a whole of parts, either as existing 
prior to them, and therefore causally containing them in 

29 By matter proceeding from the cause of all, nothing more 
is meant than that it depends entirely on the First Cause for its 
shadowy and unreal subsistence: for, as the emanations of causes 
are extended in proportion to their eminence, hence the proces 
sions of the one extend beyond those of every other cause, and even 
leave faint traces of their illuminations in the dark receptacle of 
matter. T. 

See Plotinus: En. II. 4., which discusses the nature of matter 
most acutely and satisfactorily; Auxiliaries of Porphyry, Nos. XXI. 
XXVIII. and XXIX.; and Tholuck s Ssufismus Sive Theosophia 
Persarum Pantheistica. 



59 

itself, or as subsisting in them. But the part not exist 
ing, neither is it possible for the whole to exist. If, how 
ever, whole is prior to being, every being will immedi- 
iately be a whole. Again, therefore, there will not be a 
part. This, however, is impossible. For if the whole is 
a whole, since it is the whole of a part, the part will be 
a part of the whole. It follows, therefore, that every 
whole is indeed a being,but not every being is a whole. 
Corollary. From these things it is evident that be 
ing is primarily beyond wholeness. For the one indeed, 
viz. being, is present to a greater number of things; 
since being is present to parts, so far as they are parts. 
But the other, viz. wholeness, is present to a less num 
ber of things. For that which is the cause of a greater 
number of effects is more excellent; but the cause of a 
less number is of a subordinate nature, as has been 
demonstrated. 

PROPOSITION LXXIV. 

Every for mis a certain whole; for it consists of many things, 
each of which completes the form. Bat not every whole is 
a form. 

For a particular thing is an indivisible whole, but 
so far as it is indivisible it is not a form. For every 
whole consists of parts; but form is that which may be 
divided into individual forms. Whole, therefore, is one 
thing, and form another. And the one is present to 
many things, but the other to a few. Hence whole is 
above the forms of beings. 

Corollary. From these things it is evident that 
whole has a mediate order between being and forms. 
And hence it follows that being subsists prior to forms, 
and that forms are beings, but that not every being is a 
form. Whence likewise privations in the effects of causes 
are in a certain respect beings, but are no longer forms, 



6o 

and by virtue of the unical power of being they likewise 
receive a certain obscure reflexion of being. 30 

PROPOSITION LXXV. 

Every cause which is rightly so called is exempt from, its 
effect. 

For if it is in the effect it either imparts completion 
to it, or is in a certain respect indigent of it in order to 
its existence, and thus it will be more imperfect than the 
thing caused. For being in the effect it is rather a con- 
cause than a cause, and is either a part of that which is 
generated, or an instrument of the maker. For that 
which is a part in the thing generated is more imper 
fect than the whole. The cause, likewise, which is in 
the effect is an instrument of generation to the maker, 
being unable to define of itself the measures of produc 
tion. Every cause, therefore, which is rightly so denomi 
nated, if it is more perfect than that which proceeds 
from it, imparts to its effect the measure of generation, 
and is exempt from instruments and elements, and, in 
brief, from everything which is called a con-cause. 

PROPOSITION LXXVII. 

Every thi?i& wliicli proceeds from an immovable cause has an 
immutable hyparxis: but every thing wliich proceeds from 
a movable cause has a mutable hyparxis. 

For if that which makes is entirely immovable, it 
does not produce that which is second from itself 
through motion, but by its very being. If, however, 
this be the case, it has that which proceeds from it con 
current with its own essence. And if this be so, it will 

30 Thus matter possesses a certain obscure image of being-, 
but does not preserve the most debile impression of form. For as 
the gradations of being are more extended than those of form, and 
as matter is the last of things, hence matter may be said to retain 
the footstep of being in its dark receptacle, whilst the processions 
of form are reflected like echoes from its rebounding seat. T. 



6i 

produce as long as it exists. But it exists always, and 
therefore it always constitutes that which is posterior to 
itself. Hence this always emanates from thence, and 
always is, conjoining with the ever according to activity 
of the cause its own ever according to progression. If, 
however, the cause is moved that likewise which be 
comes from it is essentially mutable. For that which 
has its being through motion, changes its being when 
its movable cause is changed. For if, though produced 
from motion, it should itself remain immutable, it would 
be better than its producing cause: but this is impossible. 
It will riot therefore be immutable. Hence it will be mut 
able, and will be essentially moved, imitating the motion 
of that which constituted it. 

PROPOSITION LXXVII. 

Everything which is in capacity or power proceeds from, that 
which is in activity: and that which is in capacity pro 
ceeds to that which is in activity. That likewise which is 
in a certain respect in capacity , so far as it is in capacity, 
is the offspring of tliat which is in a certain respect in ac 
tivity: but that which is all things in capacity proceeds 
from that which is all things in activity. ^ 

For that which is in capacity is not naturally com 
petent to bring itself into activity, because it is imperfect. 
For, since it is imperfect, if it should become the cause to 
itself of perfection, and this in activity, the cause will be 
more imperfect than that which is produced by it. 
Hence that which is in capacity, so far as it is in capac 
ity, will not be the cause to itself of a subsistence in ac 
tivity. For, on this hypothesis, so far as it is imperfect, 
it would be the cause of perfection ; 

31 See the "classical place" of Aristotle s Metaphysics, VIII. 
5.; the book of Plotinus, On that which is in capacity and activity, 
(En. II. 5); and the dictum of Proclus (Plat. Theol. II. 4.): "for 
every activity is the progeny of power." 



62 

since everything which is in capacity, so far as it is in 
capacity is imperfect, but that which is in activity is per 
fect. Hence if that which was in capacity becomes in 
activity, it will have its perfection from something else. 
And this will either be in capacity but thus again the 
imperfect will be generative of the perfect or it will be 
in activity, and either some other or this which was in 
capacity will be that which becomes in activity. But if 
some other which is in activity produces, operating ac 
cording to its own peculiarity, it will not by being in 
capacity make that which is in another to be in activity; 
nor will this which is now made be in activity, unless it 
becomes this so far as it was in capacity. It follows, 
therefore, that from that which is in activity that which 
is in capacity must be changed into that which is in ac 
tivity. 

PROPOSITION LXXVIII. 
Every power is either perfect or imperfect. 

For the power which is prolific of activity is per 
fect, because it makes other things to be perfect through 
its own activities. That, however, which is perfective 
of other things is in a greater degree perfect, because it 
is more self-perfect. But the power which is indigent of 
another which pre-exists in activity, according to which in 
digence it is something in capacity, is imperfect. For 
it is indigent of the perfection which is in another, in 
order that by participating of it, it may become perfect. 
Hence such a power as this is of itself imperfect. So 
that the power of that which is in energy is perfect, 
because it is prolific of energy: but the power of that 
which is in capacity is imperfect, because it derives its 
perfection from the power which is in activity. 

PROPOSITION LXXIX. 

Every tiling which becomes, becomes from a twofold power. 
For it is requisite that the thing which becomes 



63 

should possess aptitude, and an imperfect power. And 
that which makes, since it is in activity that which the 
thing generated is in capacity, antecedently comprehends 
a perfect power. For every activity proceeds from an 
inherent power. For if that which makes did not pos 
sess power, how could it act and produce another? And 
if that which is generated did not possess an inherent 
power through aptitude to become, how could it come 
into existence? For that which makes or acts, makes 
or acts in that which is receptive of acts, but not in any 
casual thing, and which is not naturally adapted to be 
acted upon by the agent. 

PROPOSITION LXXX. 

Every body of itself is naturally adapted to be passive, but 
every tiling incorporeal to act. One, indeed, is essentially 
inefficacious, but the other is impassive. Thai ivhich is 
incorporeal, however, may become passive by its associa 
tion with the body; just as bodies are able to act through 
the participation of incorporeals. 

For body so far as it is body is alone divisible, and 
through this becomes passive, being entirely partible, 
and this to infinity. But that which is incorporeal, be 
cause it is simple, is impassive. For neither is that 
which is impartible capable of being divided, nor can 
that be changed in quality which is not a composite. 
Either, therefore, nothing will be effective, or this must 
be affirmed of an incorporeal nature; since body, so far 
as it is body does not act, because it is alone liable to 
be divided and to be acted upon. For everything which 
acts has an effective power; so that body, so far as it is 
body, will not act but so far as it contains in itself a 
power of acting. But body is essentially inefficacious 
and impotent, and hence when it acts it acts through the 
participation of power. Moreover, incorporeal natures 
becoming in bodies,, participate of passions and various 



64 

affections; since they are divided with bodies, and en 
joy their partible nature, though according to their own 
essence they are impartible. 32 

PROPOSITION LXXX1. 

Every thing which is participated separably, is present to its 
participant bij a certain inseparable power ivhich it im 
parts to it. 

For if it is itself present to the participant in a sep 
arate manner, and is not in it, as if it possessed its sub 
sistence in it, a certain medium between the two is nec 
essary, connecting the one with the other, and which is 
more similar to that which is participated, and subsists 
in the participant. For if this medium is separable, how 
can it be participated by the participant, since the par 
ticipant neither contains the medium nor anything pro 
ceeding from it? A power and illumination therefore 
proceeding from that which is separable into the par 
ticipant, conjoins both. Hence one of these will be that 
through which the participation is effected, another will 
be that which is participated, and another that which 
participates. 

PROPOSITION LXXXII. 

Every thing incorporeal, since it is revertible to itself, when 
it is participated by other things is participated in a sep 
arable manner. 

For, if in an inseparable manner, the activity of it 
would not be separate from its participant, nor likewise 
its essence. If, however, this were, the case, it would 
not return to itself. For, if it returns, it will be sepa- 

32 See Aristot. Metaphys. II. 4. IV. 2.; De Anima, II. 1.; De 
Generat. et Corrupt. 1. 2. 1. 5.; Plotinus: En. II. 4. 6., En. II. 7. 2., 
En. IV. 7. 1.; Por-phyrii Sententt. cap. XIX--XXIX; Proclus in Plat. 
Theol. II. 12. Wyttenbach, in his edition of the Phaedo, (pp. 195- 
198), has some excellent observations on the subject. 



rate from its participant, each being different from the 
other. If, therefore, it is able to return to itself it will 
be participated in a separable manner, when it is partic 
ipated by other things. 

PROPOSITION LXXXIII. 

Every nature which is jjtiostic of itself is able to return 
wholly to itself. 

For, knowing itself it is evident that it returns to 
itself in activity. For the knower and that which is 
known are one. And the knowledge of itself returns to 
itself as to that which is known. This knowledge, like 
wise, since it belongs to the knower, is a certain activity; 
but it is an activity of itself returning to itself, because 
it is able to know itself. Moreover, that it returns to it 
self essentially, if through activity, has been demon 
strated. For every nature which by action or energiz 
ing returns to itself has likewise an essence verging to 
and subsisting in itself. 

PROPOSITION LXXXIV. 
Every nature which always is possesses an infinite power. 

For if its hypostasis is never failing, the power 
likewise according to which it is that which it is, and is 
able to exist, is infinite. For if the power of existing 
was finite, it would sometime or other fail. But this 
failing, the existence also of that which possesses it 
would fail, and it would no longer be that which always 
is. It is necessary, therefore, that the power of that 
which always is, and which connects and contains it es 
sentially, should be infinite. 

PROPOSITION LXXXV. 

Every nature which is always becoming to be, possesses an 
infinite power of becoming to be. 

For if it is always rising into existence, the power 



66 

of generation in it is never failing. For if this power 
was finite, it would cease in an infinite time. But the 
power of becoming to be ceasing, that which is rising 
into being according to this power would cease, and 
thus it would no longer be always becoming to be. It is, 
however, according to the hypothesis, always becoming 
to be, and hence it possesses an infinite power of rising 
into existence. 

PROPOSITION LXXXVI. 

Every nature which is truly being isinfinite, neither through 
multitude nor through magnitude, but by power alone. 

For every infinite is either in discrete, or in con 
tinued quantity, or in power. But that which always is, 
is infinite, by reason of having an inextinguishable life, 
a never-failing hyparxis, and an undiminished activity. 
But it is neither infinite on account of magnitude, for 
that which is truly being is without magnitude, being 
self-subsistent, since every nature self-subsistent is im 
partible and simple, nor is it infinite on account of 
multitude, for it has in the most eminent degree the 
form of The One, because it is most proximate and most 
allied to it. But it is infinite according to power, and 
hence it is likewise impartible and infinite: and the 
more it is one and impartible, the more it is infinite. 
For the power which is divided becomes imbecile and 
finite, and powers which are entirely divided are in 
every respect finite. For ultimate powers, and which 
are most remote from The One, are in a certain respect 
finite, on account of their distribution into parts. But 
primary powers, on account of their impartibility, are 
infinite for a separation into parts divulses and dis 
solves the power of every thing but impartibility, com 
pressing and contracting that which it contains, renders 
it never-failing and undiminished in itself. 

Moreover, infinity according to magnitude, and 



6 7 

likewise according to multitude., is entirely a privation 
and falling off from impartibility. For that which is finite 
is most near to the impartible, but the infinite is most 
remote from it, because it entirely departs from The 
One. Hence that which is infinite according to power, 
is not infinite either according to multitude or magni 
tude, since infinite power subsists in union with impar 
tibility. But the infinite either in multitude or magni 
tude is most remote from the impartible. If, therefore, 
that which is truly being was infinite either in magni 
tude or multitude, it would not possess infinite power. 
But it has infinite power, and therefore is not infinite 
either according to multitude or according to mag 
nitude. 3 ^ 

PROPOSITION LXXXVII. 
Every eternal nature is being, but not every being is eternal. 

For the participation of being is present in a cer 
tain respect to generated natures, so far as each of these 
is not that which in no respect is. But if that which be 
comes is not entirely deprived of being, it is in a certain 
respect being. The eternal, however, is in no respect 
whatever present to generated natures, and especially not 
to those which do not even participate of the perpetuity 
which subsists according to the whole of time. Moreover, 
every thing eternal always is. For it participates of 
eternity, which imparts to the natures by which it is par 
ticipated to be always that which they are. Being, there 
fore, is participated by a greater number of things than 
eternity: and hence being is beyond eternity. For by 
those natures by whom eternity is participated, being is 
likewise participated: but not every thing which partic- 

33 For the sources of this Proposition, see the Philebus of 
Plato, especially pp. 24, 158; Aristot. Metaphys. X. 10.; Plotinus: 
En. II. 4. 14.; Porphyrii Sententt. cap. XXXIII et XXXVI.; and 
Proclus in Theol. Plat. II. 1. IV. 31 sqq. 



68 

ipates of being participates likewise of eternity. 

PROPOSITION LXXXVIII. 

Every nature ivhich is truly being is either prior to eternity, 
or in eternity, or participates of eternity. 

That there is true being prior to eternity, has been 
demonstrated. But true being is likewise in eternity: 
for eternity possesses the always in union with being. 
And every nature which is eternal has both the being 
and always by participation. Eternity, however, pos 
sesses the always primarily, but being by participation. 
But Being itself is primarily being. 

PROPOSITION LXXXIX. 

Every nature which is truly being consists of bound and in 
finity. 

For if it has infinite power, it is evident that it 
is infinite, and on this account is constituted of the in 
finite. If likewise it is impartible, and unical, through 
this it participates of bound: for that which participates 
of unity is bounded. Moreover, it is impartible, and 
therefore possesses infinite power. Hence every thing 
which is truly or primarily being is constituted of bound 
and infinity. 

PROPOSITION XC. 

The first bound and the first infinity subsist by themselves, 
prior to every thing which is constituted of bound and the 
infinite. 

For if beings which subsist by themselves are prior 
to those which are certain beings, because they are com 
mon to all essences and principal causes, and not the 
causes of certain, but in brief of all beings, it is neces 
sary that the first bound and the first infinity should be 
prior to that which is constituted of both of these. For 



6 9 

the bound in that which is mixed participates of infinity, 
and the infinite participates of bound. But of every 
thing that which is the first is no other than that which 
it is. It is not, therefore, proper that the first infi 
nite should have the form of bound, or that the first 
bound should have the form of infinity. These, there 
fore, are primarily prior to that which is mixed. 

PROPOSITION XCI. 

Every power is either fijiite or infinite. But every finite power 
emanates from infinite power: and infinite poiver ema 
nates from the first infinity. 

For the powers which exist at a certain time are 
finite, falling- from the infinity of existing always: but 
the powers of eternal beings are infinite, because they 
never desert their own hyparxis. 

PROPOSITION xcn. 

Every multitude of infinite powers depends on one first infin 
ity, which is not a participated poiver, nor does it subsist 
in things which are endued with power, but by and of it 
self ; not being the poiver of a certain participant, but the 
cause of all beings. 

For though the first being possesses power, yet it 
is not power itself: for it likewise has bound. But the 
first power is infinity: because infinite powers are infi 
nite through the participation of infinity. Infinity itself, 
therefore, will be prior to all powers, through which be 
ing likewise has infinite power, and all things participate 
of infinity. For infinity is not the first, or the ineffable 
principle of all, since that is the measure of all things, 
because it is The Good and The One. Nor is infinity 
being: for this is infinite, but not infinity itself. Hence 
infinity subsists between that which is first and being 
itself, and is the cause of all infinite powers and of all 
the infinity which is in beings. 



PROPOSITION XCIII. 

Every infinite which is in true beings is neither infinite to 
superior natures, nor is it infinite to itself. 

For that by which each thing- is infinite, by this 
likewise it exists uncircumscribed. But every thing 
which is in true beings is bounded by itself, and by all 
the things prior to it. It follows, therefore, that the in 
finite which is in true beings is infinite to subordinate 
natures alone, above which it is so expanded in power 
that it is incomprehensible by all of them. For in what 
ever manner they may extend themselves towards this 
infinite, yet it has something entirely exempt from 
them. And though all things enter into it, yet it has 
something occult and incomprehensible by secondary 
natures. Though likewise it evolves the powers which 
it contains, yet it possesses something on account of its 
union insurmountable, contracted, and surpassing the 
evolution of beings. Since, however, it contains and 
bounds itself, it will not be infinite to itself, nor much 
less to the natures above it, since it has a portion of the 
infinity which is in them. For the powers of more total 
or universal natures are more infinite because they are 
more universal, and rank nearer to the first infinity. 34 

34 The reader must not be surprised to find that among in 
finities some are more infinite than others. For as among beings 
some are truer than others, and possess more of real being in pro 
portion as they approach nearer to Being itself, at the same time 
that they are all in a certain respect beings so infinites possess 
more of infinity as they approach nearer to the Infinite itself. 
Thus, for instance, Eternity possesses infinity more truly than 
time, though time also is infinite; because the infinity of Eternity 
is a stable, indivisible life, but the infinity of time consists in an 
unceasing progression, or as it were an unwearied pursuit of in 
finity, which it can alone obtain in an extended and partible man 
ner. And this difference among infinites extends even to matter 
itself, which is the most degraded and abject of all infinities, be 
cause it is infinite only in the most dormant capacity. T. 



7 1 

PROPOSITION XCIV. 

Every perpetuity is indeed a certain infinity, but not every 
infinity is a perpetuity. 

For there are many infinities which have the infi 
nite not on account of the always, such, for instance, 
as the infinity according to magnitude, the infinity ac 
cording to multitude, and the infinity of matter: and 
whatever else there may be of the like kind which is in 
finite, either because it cannot be passed over, or 
through the indefiniteness of its essence. That perpe 
tuity, however, is a certain infinity is evident: for that 
which never fails is infinite. But this is that which al 
ways has an inexhaustible hypostasis or nature. In 
finity, therefore, is prior to perpetuity. For that which 
constitutes a greater number of effects, and is more uni 
versal, is more causal. Hence the first infinity is beyond 
eternity, and infinity itself is prior to eternity. 35 

PROPOSITION XCV. 

Every power which is more single is more infinite than that 
which is multiplied. 

For if the first infinity is nearest to The One, of 
powers that power which is more allied to The One is 
in a greater degree infinite than that which recedes 
from it. For, being multiplied, it loses its uniform na 
ture, abiding in which it possessed a transcendency with 
respect to other powers, because it was contained therein 
by reason of its impartibility. For in partible natures 
themselves the powers when congregated are united; 
but when divided they are increased in number, and be 
come obscured. 

35 On the Infinite and Infinity, see Plotinus: En. II. 4. 



PROPOSITION XCVI. 

The power of every finite body, which is infinite, is in 
corporeal. 

For if it was corporeal, if this body indeed is finite, 
the infinite will be contained in the finite. But if the 
body is infinite, it will not be power so far as it is body. 
For if so far as it is body it is finite, but power is infi 
nite, it will not be power so far as it is body. Hence 
the power which is infinite in a finite body is incorporeal. 

PROPOSITION XCVII. 

Every archicctl cause in each series or causal chain imparts 
to the whole series its characteristic; and that which the 
cause is primarily, the series is according to diminution.^ 

For if it is the leader of the whole series, and all 
co-ordinate natures are co-arranged with reference to it, 
it is evident that it imparts to all in the series the one 
idea according to which they are placed in that series. For 
either all things partake of similitude to this cause with 
out a cause, or that which is the same in all emanates 
from it. But that the participation should be without a 

36 "But as there are many genera of Gods emanating from 
the power of Zeus, the father of all, truly each is allotted a place 
in the Homeric chain, and all are referred to Zeus and all depend 
on him, who is a much more beautiful chain than that golden one, 
or any other which one may imagine." Aristides: Oration I. p. 6, 
Vol. I. ed. Dindorf. 

"Try me if such be your will: all ye Gods join together and prove me! 
Letting the golden chain that encompasses all from the heavens, 
Down; and with strength united, attempt, if ye can, to subvert me! 
Vain were the fruitless toil: strive all as ye may, ye succeed not: 
Zeus is the highest still despite your attempts to remove him! 
But, if I will to move, without effort I drag you before me; 
Drag you aloft with ease, wide earth and the depths of the ocean; 
Binding the links of the chain to a peak of the mighty Olympus: 
Leaving the chain, and all, in the firmament swinging before me. 
Such, and so strong, do I rule: over Gods as I rule over mortals. 
Homer: The Iliad, VIII. 18-26 (Dart s translation). 



73 

cause is impossible: for that which is without a cause is 
likewise fortuitous. But the fortuitous does not hap 
pen in things in which there is order, connection, and 
an invariable sameness of subsistence. From the prin 
cipal cause, therefore, every series receives the charac 
teristic of the hypostasis or nature of that cause. But if 
so, it is evident that it receives this characteristic with a 
descent and decrement adapted to secondary natures. 
For either the characteristic exists similarly in the 
leader, and the natures which are secondary, and in this 
case in what way would the principal cause be the 
leader, and the secondary natures be allotted an hypos 
tasis after the leader? Or, it exists dissimilarly. And 
if this be so, it is evident that sameness emanates to the 
multitude from one, but not vice versa: and that the 
characteristic of the series which primarily preexists in 
one (the leader), is secondary in the multitude. 

PROPOSITION XCVIII. 

Every separate cause is at one and the same time everywhere 
and nowhere. 

For by the impartance of its own power it is every 
where. For this is a cause which replenishes the na 
tures which are naturally adapted to participate of it, 
rules over all secondary beings, and is present to all 
things by the prolific progressions of its illuminations. 
But by an essence unmingled with things in place, and 
by its exempt purity, it is nowhere. For if it is sepa 
rate, it is established above all things. In a similar 
manner, likewise, it is in no one of the natures inferior to 
itself. For if it was alone everywhere, it would not in 
deed be prevented from being a cause, and from sub 
sisting in all its participants: but it would not be prior 
to all of them in a separate manner. If likewise it was 
nowhere without being everywhere, it would not indeed 
be prevented from being prior to all things, and from 



74 

being nothing pertaining to subordinate natures. But it 
would not be in all things, since causes are naturally 
adapted to be in their effects by the abundant and un- 
envying impartances of themselves. In order, therefore, 
that, existing as a cause it may be in all things which are 
able to partake of it, and that being separate in itself it 
may be prior to all the natures which are filled by it, it 
is everywhere and at the same time nowhere. 

And it is not indeed partly everywhere and partly 
nowhere. For thus it would be divulsed and separate 
from itself, if one part of it was everywhere in all things, 
but another was nowhere and prior to all things. But 
the whole of it is everywhere, and in a similar manner 
nowhere. For the things which are able to participate 
of it meet with the whole of it, and find the whole pres 
ent to themselves, while at the same time it is wholly 
exempt from them. For the participant does not place 
this separate cause in itself, but participates of it to the 
extent of its capacity. Nor by the impartance of itself 
does it become contracted by the multitude of the par 
ticipations of it: for it is separate. Nor do its partici 
pants participate of it defectively; for that which imparts 
is everywhere. 

PROPOSITION XCIX. 

Every imparticipable, so far as it is imparticipable, is not 
constituted by anotlier cause. But it is itself the prin 
ciple and cause of all its participants: and thus every 
principle in each causal chain is unbe gotten* 1 

For if it is imparticipable in its own series or chain 

37 Hence as all things proceed from the Ineffable that which 
is imparticipable proceeds also from it, yet not as from a cause, 
but as from that which is better than cause. The procession, 
therefore, of the imparticipable from the Ineffable is (ippt/ro$ 
f, an ineffable evolution into light T. 



75 

it is allotted the principality, and does not proceed from 
other things. For it would no longer be the first, if it 
received this characteristic, according to which it is im- 
participable, from another. But if it is inferior to 
other things, and proceeds from them, it does not pro 
ceed from them so far as it is imparticipable, but so far 
as it participates. For of the things from which it orig 
inates it doubtless participates, and these things do not 
exist primarily: but that which is imparticipable exists 
primarily. Hence it is not from a cause so far as it is 
imparticipable. For so far as it is from a cause it par 
ticipates, and is not imparticipable. But so far as it is 
imparticipable it is the cause of things which are par 
ticipated, and is not itself a participant of other things. 38 

PRO POSITION C. 

Every chain of wholes is extended to an imparticipable cause 
and principle: but all iinparticipables depend on the one 
principle of all things. sg 

For if each chain suffers a certain sameness, there 
is in each a certain leader, the cause of this sameness. 
For as all beings are from one, so every chain is from 
one. But, again, all imparticipable monads are referred 
to The One; because all of them are analogous to The 
One. So far, therefore, as they likewise suffer some 
thing which is the same through an analogy to The 
One, so far a reduction of them to The One is effected. 
And so far, indeed, as all of them are from The One, 
no one of these is a principle, but they emanate from 
that as from a principle: but so far as each is imparticip 
able, so far each is a principle. Hence, since they are the 
principles of certain things, they depend on the prin 
ciple of all things: for that is the principle of all 

38 See Plotinus: En. V. 5. 9 sq; En. VI. 9. 4 sq. 

39 See Plotinus: En. V. 3. 12 sq. 



7 6 

things of which all things participate. All things 
however alone participate of fhe first; but of other 
things not all but certain things participate. Hence 
likewise The One is simply the first, bnt other things 
are firsts with reference to a certain thing, but are not 
firsts simply. 

PROPOSITION CI. 

Iinparticipable intellect is the leader of all things ivhich 
participate of intellect, imp articip able life of all things 
which participate of life, and imp articip able being of all 
things which participate of being. And of these, being is 
prior to life, but life is prior to intellect. 

For because in each causal chain of beings impar- 
ticipables are prior to things which are participated, it is 
necessary that intellect should be prior to intellectuals, 
that life should be prior to vital natures, and that being 
itself should be prior to beings. Because however that 
which is the cause of more effects precedes that which 
is the cause of fewer, hence among these being will be 
the first; for it is present to all things to which life and 
intellect are present. For every thing which lives and 
participates of intelligence necessarily is\ but not vice 
versa. For many beings neither live, nor energize in 
tellectually. But life is the second. For all things 
which participate of intellect participate likewise of 
life, but not vice versa. For many things indeed live, 
but are destitute of knowledge. And intellect is the 
third. For every thing which is in any manner what 
soever gnostic, likewise lives and is. If therefore be 
ing is the cause of more effects, but life of fewer, and 
intellect of still fewer, being is the first in the causal 
order, life the second, and intellect the third. 40 

40 Compare Aristot. De Anima I. 5. III. 4. et Joan. Philoponi 
Com. Prooemium; Plotinus: En. V. 5. 1 sq., En. VI. 5. 5 sq.; 
Proclus in Plat. Theol. I. 25, II. 11.; Porphyrii Sententt. cap. XV. 
sqq.; lamblichus De Mysteriis Aegyptt. I. TetGaleus in notisp. 190. 



77 

PROPOSITION CII. 

All beings which exist in any manner whatsoever consist of 
bound and the infinite through that which is primarily 
being. But all living beings are motive or active of them 
selves through the first life. And all gnostic beings par 
ticipate of knowledge through the first intellect. 

For if that which is imparticipable in each causal 
chain imparts its own characteristic to all the natures 
under the same chain, it is evident that the first being 
likewise imparts to all things both bound and infinity, 
since it is itself primarily mixed from these. Life like 
wise imparts to all things the motion or activity which 
it possesses in itself. For life is the first progression 
and motion from the stable hypostasis or nature of be 
ing. And intellect imparts knowledge to all things: for 
the summit of all knowledge is in intellect, and intellect 
is the first gnostic nature. 

PROPOSITION cm. 
All things are in all, but each is appropriately in each. 

For in being there are life and intellect; and in life 
being and thought; and in intellect being and life. But 
in intellect, indeed, all things subsist intellectually, in 
life vitally, and in being all things are truly beings. For 
since every thing subsists either according to cause, or 
according to hyparxis, or according to participation; and 
since in the first the others are according to cause; in 
the second the first is according to participation, and the 
third according to cause; and in the third the natures 
prior to it are according to participation, this being the 
case, life and intellect have a prior or causal subsistence 
in being. Since, however, each thing is characterized 
according to hyparxis, and neither according to cause 
(for cause deals with effects,) nor according to participa 
tion (for that is external of which a thing participates,) 



78 

hence in being there are truly life and thought, essen 
tial life and essential intellect. And in life there is be 
ing indeed according to participation, but thought ac 
cording to cause. Each of these, however, subsists there 
vitally: for the hyparxis is according to life. And in in 
tellect life and essence subsist according to participa 
tion, and each of these subsists there intellectually. For 
the being or essence of intellect is gnostic, and life is 
knowledge. 

PROPOSITION CIV. 

Every thing which is primarily eternal has both an eternal 
essence and activity, 

For if it primarily participates of the perpetuitity of 
eternity, it does not partially participate of it, but en 
tirely. For either it participates of it in activity, but 
not in essence. This however is impossible: since in 
this case energy would be more excellent than essence. 
Or, it participates of it according to essence, but does 
not participate of it according to activity. In this case, 
however, that which is primarily eternal, and that which 
primarily participates of time, will be the same. And 
time, indeed, will primarily measure the essence of cer 
tain things, but eternity which is more excellent than all 
time will not measure the essence of any thing, if that 
which is primarily eternal is not essentially contained by 
eternity. Hence every thing which is primarily eternal 
has both an eternal essence and activity. 

PROPOSITION cv. 

Every thing immortal is perpetual; but not every thing per 
petual is immortal. 

For if the immortal is that which always participates 
of life, but that which always participates of life partici 
pates likewise of being, and that which always lives al- 



79 

ways is,-hence everything immortal is perpetual. But the 
immortal is that which is unreceptive of death, and al 
ways lives: and the perpetual is that which is unreceptive 
of non-being, and always is. If, however, there are many 
beings more or less excellent than life which are unre 
ceptive of death but exist always, -not every thing there 
fore which is perpetual is immortal. That, however, 
there are many beings not immortal which exist always, 
is evident. For there are certain beings, indeed, which 
are destitute of life, but which exist always and are in 
destructible. For as being is related to life, so is the 
perpetual to the immortal. For the life which cannot be 
taken away is immortal, and the being which cannot be 
taken away is perpetual. But being is more compre 
hensive than life, and therefore the perpetual is more 
comprehensive than the immortal. 41 

PROPOSITION cvi. 

Between every thing which is entirely eternal both in essence 
and activity, and every thing which has its essence in 
time, the medium is that ivhich is partly eternal and 
partly measured by time. 

For that which has its essence comprehended by 
time is entirely temporal, and by a much greater pri 
ority this will be allotted a temporal activity. But that 
which is entirely temporal is in every respect dissimilar 
to that which is entirely eternal. But all causal pro 
gressions are through similars. Hence there is some 
thing between these. The medium, therefore, is either 
that which is eternal in essence, but temporal in activity, 
or vice versa. This latter, however, is impossible: for 
in that case activity would be more excellent than es- 

41 See Aristot. Topicc. IV. 5. et VI. 3.; Plotinus En. III. 1. 1 
sq., En. III. 7. 1 sq.; Platonis Phaedon. p. 105 D, and annotation 
of Wyttenbach, p. 280 sqq. 



8o 

sence. It follows therefore that the medium is the 
former of these. 

PROPOSITION CVII. 

Every thing wJiicJi is partly eternal and partly temporal is 
at one and the same time being and generation. 



- 



For every thing eternal is being-, and that which is 
measured by time is generation : so that if the same 
thing participates of time and eternity, yet not accord 
ing to the same, it will be both being and generation, 
but not both according to one of these alone. 42 

Corollary. From these things it is evident that 
generation, indeed, having a temporal essence depends 
on that which partly partakes of being and partly of 
generation, participating at once of eternity and time. 
But this is related to that which is in every respect eter 
nal: and that which is in every respect eternal is related 
to being which is prior to the eternal. 

PROPOSITION CVIII. 

Every thing which is partial in each- order is able to partici 
pate in a twofold respect of the monad luhich is in the 
proximately superior order, viz. either through its own 
wholeness, or through that ivhich is partial in the supe 
rior order and co-ordinate with the thing according to 
an analogy to the whole causal chain. 

For if the return to all things is through sim 
ilitude, that which is partial in an inferior order is 
dissimilar to that which is monadic and a whole in a su 
perior order; and is as that which is partial to a whole, 
and as one order to another. But a partial nature is 
similar to a whole of the same causal chain through a 

o 

42 As to the argument, see Platonis Timaeum p. 27 sq.; 
Aristot. De Generat. et Corrupt. I. 3.; Plutarch, advers. Colotem, 
p. 547 sq. Wyttenb. et Porphyrii Sententt. cap. XIII. et XIV. 



Sr 

communion of characteristic, and to the proximately su 
perior co-ordinate characteristic through an analogous 
hypostasis or nature. It is evident,therefore,that through 
these media a return from one to the other is 
effected, as through similars to that which is similar. 
For the one is similar as the partial to that which is par 
tial, but the other as that which is the appropriate of the 
same chain. But the whole of the superior chain is dis 
similar in both these respects. 

PROPOSITION CIX. 

Every partial or particular intellect participates of the Pri 
mal Unity which is above intellect, both through the Uni 
versal Intellect and through the partial unity which is 
co-ordinate with it. And every partial soul participates 
of Universal Intellect through Universal Soul, and through 
a partial intellect. And every partial nature of body 
participates of Universal Soul through Universal Nature, 
and a partial soul. 

For every thing partial participates of the monad 
which is in a superior order, either through its charac 
teristic wholeness (universality) or through that which 
is partial in that order, and which is co-ordinate with 
the partial nature. 43 

PROPOSITION ex. 

Of all the things which are arranged in each causal chain, 
those which are first and are conjoined with their mo 
nad are able to participate of the natures which are 
proximately established in the superior causal chain 
through analogy. But those which are more imperfect 
and remote from their proper principle are not naturally 
adapted to enjoy these natures. 
For because the things which are first are allied to 

43 As to the argument, see Plotinus: En. VI. 2. 4. sqq., and 
Proclus in Plat. Theol. II. 1. 



82 

those in a superior series, being allotted a better and 
more divine nature in the order to which they belong, 
but the things which are more imperfect proceed further 
from their principle, and are allotted a secondary and 
ministrant but not a primary and leading progression 
in the whole causal chain, this being the case, the 
former are necessarily connascently conjoined to the 
things in a superior order; but the latter are unable to 
be conjoined with them. For all things are not of an 
equal dignity, though they may belong to the same or 
der. For neither is there one and the same ratio in all: but 
all things proceed from their proper monad as from one 
and return to one. Hence they are not allotted the 
same power. But some things are able to receive prox- 
imately the participations of superior natures; but others, 
by reason of their distant progressions from their prin 
ciples, are deprived of a power of this kind. 

PROPOSITION CXI. 

Of every intellectual causal chain some are divine intellects, 
receiving the participations of the Gods; but others are in 
tellects alone. And of every psychical chain some are in 
tellectual souls, which depend on their proper intellects; 
but others are souls alone. 44 And of every corporeal na 
ture some have souls supernally presiding over them, but 
others are natures alone, destitute of the presence of souls. 

For of each causal chain not the whole genus is 
naturally adapted to depend on that which is prior to 
itself, but only that which is more perfect in it, and fit 
to be connascent with superior natures. Neither, there 
fore, is every intellect attached to a deity, but those in 
tellects only which are supreme and most single: for 

44 See Plat. Phaedr. p. 247 sq.; Hermiae Commentar. p. 134 
sqq. ed. Couvreur; Aristot. De Anima III. 4. cum Jo. Philoponi 
Commentar.; Plotinus: En. IV. 1.; Proclus in Plat. Tim. p. 74 sq. 
et Porphyrii Sen ten tt. cap. I XI. 



these are cognate to the divine unities. Nor do all souls 
participate of participable intellect, but those only which 
are most intellectual. Nor do all corporeal natures en 
joy the presence of soul, and of the soul which is par 
ticipated, but those only which are more perfect, and 
possess in a greater degree the form of reason. And 
this is the mode of demonstration in all. 

PROPOSITION CXII. 

Of every order those things which are primal have the form 
of the natures prior to them. 

For the highest genera in each order are conjoined 
through similitude to the natures which are above them, 
and through the connexion of the progression of wholes 
the subject are conjoined to the superior natures. Hence 
such as the superior natures are primarily, such like 
wise is the form which these highest genera are allotted, 
and which is cognate to the nature of those in the su 
perior order. Likewise they appear to be, through the 
characteristic of their subsistence, such as the natures 
which are prior to them. 

PROPOSITION CXIII. 
Every divine number is unical- 

For if a divine number has a precedaneous cause, 
viz. The One, just as an intellectual number has intel 
lect, and a psychical number soul, and if multitude is 
every where analogous to its cause, it is evident that a 
divine number is unical, since The One is God. But 
this follows, since The One and The Good are the 
same: for The Good and God are the same. For that 
beyond which there is nothing, and which all things de 
sire, is God. And likewise that from which all things 
proceed, and to which all things tend, is The Good. If 
therefore there is a multitude of Gods, the multitude is 



S 4 

unical. But that there is a multitude of Gods (divine 
unities) is evident: for every archical cause is the leader 
of an appropriate multitude which is similar and cognate 
to the cause. 45 

PROPOSITION CXIV. 

Evei*y God is a self-perfect unity, and every self -perfect unity 
is a God. 

For if the number of unities is two fold, as has 
been demonstrated, and some are self-perfect, but others 
are illuminations from the self perfect unities, and if a 
divine number is allied to and connatural with The One 
and The Good, the Gods are self-perfect unities. And, 
vice versa, if there is a self-perfect unity it is a God. 
For as unity is in the most eminent degree allied to The 
One, and the self-perfect to The Good, so likewise ac 
cording to both of these the self-perfect participates of 
the divine peculiarity and is a God. But if a God was 
a unity, yet not a self-perfect unity, or a self-perfect hy- 
postasis, yet not a unity, he would be arranged in an 
other order, on account of the mutation of the pecu 
liarity. 

PROPOSITION CXV. 

Every God is super essential, supervital, and superintellec- 
tual. 

For if each is a self- perfect unity, but neither es 
sence, life, or intellect is a unity, but that which is unit 
ed, it is evident that every God is beyond each of these, 
viz., essence, life, and intellect. For if these differ from 
each other, but all are in all, each of these being all will 
not be one only. Further, if the first God is superes- 

45 See Plotinus: En. V. Lib, I. 5.; Porphyrii Sententt. cap. 
XXXVIII.; Proclus in Plat. Theolog. Lib. IV. 29; Theologumena 
Arithmeticae, p. 4 sq. ed. Ast.; Jo. Laur. LydusDe Mensibus, Lib. 
II. cap. 4., and Additional Notes. 



$5 

sential, but every God is of the primary causal chain, so 
far as it is a God, each will be superessential. But that 
the first God is superessential, is evident. 46 For essence 
is not the same with unity, nor is to exist the same thing 
as to be united. If, however, these are not the same, 
either the first God is both of these, and in this case he 
will not be one only, but something else besides The 
One, and will participate of unity, but will not be The 
One itself, or, he is one of these. But if indeed he 
is essence, he will be indigent of The One. It is, how 
ever, impossible that The Good and The First should 
be indigent. Hence he is one alone, and therefore 
superessential. But if each thing imparts the peculiar 
ity of that which it is primarily to the whole causal chain 
[of which it is the leader], every divine number is 
superessential; since every archical cause produces sim 
ilars prior to dissimilars. If, therefore, the first God is 
superessential, all the Gods will be superessential: for 
they will be entirely similar to the First. Since, how 
ever, they are likewise essences they will be produced 
from the first essence, as the monads of essences. 

PROPOSITION CXVT. 

Every deity except The One is participable. 

For that The One is imparticipable is evident, since 
if it was participated, and thereby related to another, it 
would no longer be similarly the cause of all things, of 
both primary and secondary beings. But that the other 
unities are participated, we shall thus demonstrate. For if 
there is another imparticipable unity after the First, in 
what will it differ from The One? For either it subsists 
in the same manner as that; and in this case how is the 
one the second, but the other first? Or it does not subsist 
in the same manner: and thus one of these will be The 

46 See Additional Notes. 



86 

One itself, but the other one and not one. This non-one, 
likewise, if it is no hypostasis whatever will be one 
alone. But if it is a certain hypostasis other than The 
One, in this case The One will be participated by the 
non-one: and that will be a self-perfect one which con 
joins the non-one with The One. So that again God 
will be this [viz. the one] so far as he is God. But that 
which is non-one will subsist in the participation of The 
One. Every unity, therefore, which subsists after The 
One is participable, and every God is participate. 47 

PROPOSITION cxvu. 
Every God is the measure of beings. 

For if every God is unical, he defines and measures 
all the multitude of beings. For all multitudes, since 
they are in their own nature indefinite, are bounded 
through The One. But that which is unical, measuring 
and determining the natures to which it is present, leads 
into bound that which by its own power is not bounded. 
For the unical has the form of The One by participa- 
pation. But that which is uniform recedes from indef- 
initeness and infinity: and the more uniform it is the 
less is it indefinite, and without measure. Every multi 
tude of beings, therefore, is measured by the divine 
unities. 48 

47 See Plotinus: En, V. 5. 12 sq., and Proclus in Plat. Theol. 
I. 19. II. 4. 

48 See the Theaetetus, p. 152 A; the Cratylus, p. 386 A; Aristot. 
Metaphys. III. 5., and Plotinus: En. VI. 8. 17. 

The basis of this Proposition is Plato De Legg. IV. p. 716: 
But God is specially to us the measure of all things much more 
indeed than any man, according to the opinion of the vulgar." 
Plato refers to the childish notion of Protagoras, which was an 
echo of the belief of the multitude, that "man is the measure of 
all things." Proclus acutely observes: "the argument of Protag 
oras is this: if such as things appear to be to every man such 
they are, the wise will not exist, but only the foolish. But the 



3? 

PROPOSITION CXVIII. 

Every thing which is in the Gods pre-exists in them according 
to their peculiarities. And the peculiarity of the Gods is 
unical and super essential. Hence all things are contained 
in them unically and superessentially. 

For if everything subsists in a three-fold manner, 
viz. either according to cause, or according to hyparxis, 
or according to participation, but the first number of all 
things is the divine number, nothing will be in the Gods 
according to participation, but all things will subsist in 
them either according to hyparxis, or according to 
cause. The things, however, which they antecedently 
contain because they are the causes of all things, they 
antecedently contain in a manner appropriate to their 
own union. For every being which is the leader of 
secondary natures causally, contains the cause of things 
subordinate in a way naturally adapted to itself. All 
things, therefore, are in the Gods unically and superes 
sentially. 49 

second assertion is not true, neither therefore is the first." 
(Scholia on the Cratylus, no. XXXVIII.) This and other equally 
irrational notions, such as "might makes right," ought to have 
sunk into utter oblivion by reason of their essential absurdity, 
inanity and weakness, but they reappear even in this enlight 
ened (?) century, branded as "new," "up-to-date," "scien 
tific thought," etc. The people who hold and disseminate these 
sensuous chimeras are ignorantly called "advanced thinkers." 
In truth they are neither "advanced" nor "thinkers." All their 
"thinking" is done on the animal plane. Unable to apprehend 
the eternal and immutable ideas, which are perennially fresh and 
ever valid, these philosophasters are reviving antiquated opinions 
which were exploded and refuted thousand of years ago. 

49 See Plotinus: En. VI. 8. 18 sqq.; Proclus in Plat. Theol. 1. 
24. III. 1.; Porphyrii Sententt. cap. XXXVIIL; lamblichus De 
Mysteriis Aegyptt. VIII. 2. 



PROPOSITION CXIX. 

Every God subsists through its own super essential goodness, 
and is good neither through participation, nor through 
essence, but superessentially ; since habits and essences 
are allotted a secondary and remote order from the Gods. 

For if the first God is The One and The Good, and 
so far as he is The One he is likewise The Good, and 
so far as he is The Good he is likewise The One, if this 
be the case, every causal chain of the Gods is uniform 
and boniform according to one peculiarity, and each of 
the Gods is not a unity and goodness according to any 
other thing. But each so far as he is a unity is a good 
ness, and so far as he is a goodness is a unity. To the 
degree, likewise, that the Gods posterior to the first 
God proceed from the the First they are boniform and 
uniform, since the First is The One and The Good: but 
as Gods they are all unities and goodnesses. 

As, therefore, the one of the Gods is superessen- 
tial, so likewise is their goodness, since it is no other 
than the one. For each of them is no other than the 
good, but is good alone; as neither is each any other 
than the one, but is one alone. 50 

On Providence. 

PROPOSITION CXX. 

Every God has in his own essence a providence of the whole 
of things. And a providential activity is primarily in 
the Gods. 

For all other things which are posterior to the 
Gods, act providentially through the participation of 
them: but providence is connascent with the Gods. For 

50 See Plotinus: En. I. 7. 1 sq.; Proclus in Plat. Theol. I. 15. 
I. 23. 



8 9 

if to impart good to the subjects of providential activity 
is the prerogative of the providential peculiarity, but all 
the Gods are goodnesses, either they do not impart 
themselves to anything, and thus nothing will be good 
in secondary natures. And whence will that be derived 
which subsists according to participation, except from 
those natures which primarily possess peculiarities? 
Or, if they do impart themselves they impart good, and 
because of this providentially attend to all things. Prov 
idence, therefore, subsists primarily in the Gods. For 
where is the activity which is prior to intellect, except 
in superessential natures? But providence (rrpovoia), 
as the name signifies, is an energy or activity prior to 
intellect (svepysza sffn Trpo voz;). The Gods, therefore, 
by reason of their essence, and because they are good 
nesses, provide for all tilings, filling all things with the 
goodness which is prior to intellect. 51 

51 We may further infer the necessity of Providence in the 
Gods from considering that as they are the productive causes of 
all things, so all things abide and are radically established in their 
natures. For where can any thing subsist, which is not contained 
in their unknown and all-pervading comprehensions? But if this 
be the case, since all things are in reality the offspring of the Gods 
they must continually be the objects of their providential exer 
tions. For as goodness is the characteristic of these divine natures, 
it is impossible that they should abandon their progeny, or cease 
to impart their beneficent, unenvying, and all-powerful communi 
cations. Nor must we think that these providential exertions are 
laborious to the Gods, since, as Proclus well observes, (Theol. 
Plat. p. 41), "that which is according to nature is not laborious to 
any thing: for neither is it laborious to fire to impart heat, nor to 
snow to refrigerate, nor to bodies themselves to energize accord 
ing to their peculiar powers. Nor, prior to bodies, is it laborious 
to natures themselves to nourish, or generate, or increase: for 
these are the works of natures. Nor again, prior to these, is it 
laborious to souls to exert their peculiar energies: for many of 
their energies are attended with delight, many are the result of 
their essence, and many motions are produced by their presence 
alone." Hence if the communication of good naturally belongs to 



9 

PROPOSITION CXXI. 

Every divine nature has for its essence goodness, but a unical 
power, and a knowledge arcane and incomprehensible by 
all secondary natures. 

For if it is provident of the whole of things, 
there is in it a power dominating the subjects of its 
providential activity; through which power, unsubdued 
and uncircumscribed by all things, divine natures fill all 
things with, and subject all things to, themselves. For 
every archical cause of other things, and which is dom- 
inative of them through abundance of power, rules and 
dominates according to nature. 

The first power, therefore, is in the Gods, not in 
deed dominating some things but not others, but equally 
comprehending in itself primarily the powers of all be 
ings, this power neither being essential nor much less 
unessential, but connascent with the hyparxis of the 
Gods, and superessential. Moreover, the boundaries of 
all cognitions presubsist uniformly in the Gods. For 
through divine knowledge, which is exempt from the 
whole of things, all other cognitions subsist; which di- 

the Gods, Providence also is natural to these divinities, which they 
exert tn a tranquil, unpolluted, and incorporeal manner. 

Should it be inquired in what manner Providence operates, 
the following beautiful passage from Proclus On the Parmenides, 
as cited by Ficinus in his commentary on that dialogue, will give 
us abundant satisfaction: "Let us conceive a ship agitated by the 
winds and waves, and let us suppose that the imagination of some 
one is so powerful that while he imagines the sea, the sea imme 
diately flows; that while he imagines the ship, the ship is construct 
ed; and that the winds and waves arise agreeable to his imagina 
tion, and as the consequences of its vehement energy. Now it is 
evident that such a one would not be compelled in surveying these 
particulars to employ a confused and distracted vision, but both 
his knowledge and operation would equally subsist in a uniform 
manner. And such is the simplicity of Divine Intelligence with 
respect to the intuition and fabrication of inferior concerns." T. 



9 1 

vine cognition is neither intellectual, nor much less a 
certain knowledge posterior to intellect, but is estab 
lished according to the divine characteristic above intel 
lect. If, therefore, there is a divine knowledge, this 
knowledge is arcane and uniform: and if there is a power 
uncircumscribed by all things, this power is in a simi 
lar manner comprehensive of all things. If, likewise, 
there is a divine goodness, this goodness defines the 
hyparxis of the Gods: since, if all things are in the Gods, 
knowledge, power, and goodness are likewise in them. 
But their hyparxis is characterized by that which is 
most excellent, and their hypostasis or nature likewise 
is according to that which is best. But this is goodness. 52 

PROPOSITION CXXII. 

Every divine nature provides for secondary natures, and is 
exempt from the subjects of its providential care, provi 
dence neither remitting the pure and unical transcend- 
e.ncy of that which is divine, nor a separate union abolish 
ing providence. 

For divine beings abiding in their unical nature, 
and in their own hyparxis, fill all things with the power 
of themselves. And every thing which is able to par 
ticipate of them enjoys the good which it is capable of 
receiving, according to the measures of its own hypos 
tasis; divine natures in the mean time illuminating all 
things by their very being, or rather prior to being. For 
since they are no other than goodness, they supply 
without envy all things with an abundance of good, by 
their very being, not making a distribution according 
to a reasoning process; things receiving indeed accord 
ing to their worth, and divine natures imparting ac 
cording to their hyparxis. Neither, therefore, in pro- 

52 Compare the Philebus, p. 64sqq.; the Timaeus, p. 29 sq.; 
Plotinus: En. I. 7. 1. sq., En. V. 9. 2.; Proclus in Plat. Theol. V. 17. 



9 2 

viding for other things do the Gods receive a habitude 
or alliance with the subjects of their providential care: 
for they benefit all things by being that which they are. 
But every nature which makes by its very essence, 
makes without habitude, [and with an unrestrained en 
ergy], since habitude is an addition to essence. Hence 
likewise it is preternatural. Nor because they are sep 
arate do the Gods withdraw their providential care: for 
thus they would subvert which it is not lawful to say 
their own hyparxis, the characteristic of which is good 
ness. For it is the province of goodness to extend it 
self to every thing which is able to participate of it. 
And the greatest is not that which is boniform, but 
that which is beneficent (the doer of good). Either, 
therefore, no being will possess this beneficent nature, 
or the Gods will possess this beneficent nature, or the 
Gods will possess it prior to beings. For it is not pos 
sible that a greater good should be present to the na 
tures which are good by participation, but a less good to 
those which are primarily good. 

PROPOSITION CXXIII. 

Every divine nature is itself, by reason of its superessential 
union, ineffable and unknown to all secondary natures; 
but it is comprehended and known by its participants. 
Hence that ivhich is First is alone entirely unknown, be 
cause it is imp articip able. 

For all knowledge which arises through reasoning 
deals with beings, and in beings possesses the appre 
hension of truth, since it comes into contact with con 
ceptions, and subsists in intellections. But the Gods 
are beyond all beings. Neither, therefore, is that which 
is divine the object of opinion, nor can it be appre 
hended by the dianoetic power, or by intellection. For 
every being is either sensible, and therefore the object 



93 

of opinion; or truly existing being, and therefore the 
object of intellect, or it is between these, existing as be 
ing and at the same time as generated, and therefore 
the object of the dianoetic power (discursive reason). 
If, therefore, the Gods are superessential, and subsist 
prior to beings, they cannot be apprehended by either 
opinion, or by science and discursive reason, or by in 
telligence. But the nature of their peculiarities is 
known by the beings which depend on them: and this 
by a necessary consequence. For the differences of 
participants are co-divided conformably to the peculiari 
ties of the participated natures. And neither does ev 
ery thing participate of every thing: for there is no co 
ordination of things perfectly dissimilar. Nor does any 
casual thing participate of that which is casual. But 
that which is kindred is conjoined to that which is kin 
dred, and proceeds from that to which it is allied. 53 

PROPOSITION CXXIV. 

Every God knows partible natures iinpartibly, temporal na 
tures without time, things which are not necessary neces 
sarily, mutable natures immutably; and, summarily, all 
things in a manner more excellent than the order of 
things known. 

For if every thing which is with the Gods is 
with them according to their characteristic, it is evident 
that the knowledge in the Gods of things inferior will 

O O 

not subsist according to the nature of the inferior 

53 Compare Plotinus: En. VI. 8. 7 sq.; Porphyrii Sententt. 
cap. XXVL; Proclus in Plat. Theol. V. 28., and Commentary of 
Olympiodorus on the First Alcibiades, p. 133, ed. Creuzer. 

The reader -must remember that the Gods are alone superes 
sential through their unities, which are the characteristics of their 
natures: for as irrationality is the essential signature of a brute, 
and rationality of a man, so a divine unity is the invariable 
characteristic of a God. T. 



94 

things, but according to the exempt transcendency of 
the Gods. Hence their knowledge of multiplied and 
passive natures will be uniform and impassive. If, 
therefore, the object of knowledge is partible, divine 
knowledge will be impartible. If the objects which are 
known are mutable, the knowledge of the Gods will be 
immutable; if they are contingent, they will be known by 
the Gods necessarily; and if they are indefinite, definitely. 
For that which is divine does not receive knowledge 
from subordinate beings in such a way that the knowl 
edge is. of the same nature as that of the thing known, 
But subordinate beings become indefinite and uncer 
tain about the definite nature of the Gods, are changed 
about their immutability, receive passively that which is 
impassive in them, and temporally that which in them is 
without time. For it is possible for subordinate to be sur 
passed by more excellent natures; but it is not lawful for 
the Gods to receive any thing from beings inferior to 
themselves. 54 

PROPOSITION CXXV. 

Every God, from that order from, which he began to unfold 
himself into light, proceeds through all secondary na 
tures, always indeed multiplying and dividing the im- 
partances of himself, but preserving the characteristic of 
his own hypostasis. 

For progressions becoming through diminution, first 
natures are every where in a certain manner multiplied 
into the decrements of secondary natures. But these 
proceeding according to a similitude to their producing 
causes receive their orderly distribution, so that the 
whole of that which proceeds is in a manner the same 

54 For an unfolding of the argument of this Proposition 
see the Phaedrus, p. 247 and the Commentary of Hermeias; the 
Philebus, p. 61; Plotinus: En. V. 8. 4., En. VI. 7. 36; and Proclus 
in Plat. Theol. pp. 54, 282, 294, 306, 308. 



95 

with and different from that which abides; through its 
diminution indeed appearing to be different, but 
through continuity with its cause not departing from 
sameness with it. But such as that which abides is 
among first, such as that which proceeds is among sec 
ondary natures; and thus an indissoluble communion of 
the causal chain is preserved. Each of the Gods, 
therefore, is unfolded into light appropriately in the or 
ders in which he makes his evolution. 55 But he proceeds 
from thence as far as to the last of things, through the 
generative power of primary natures. He is always, 
however, multiplied through a progression from unity 
into multitude. But he preserves identity in the pro 
gression, through the similitude of the things which pro 
ceed to the leader and primary cause of each causal 
chain. 

PROPOSITION CXXVI. 

Every God who is nearer to The One is more universal, but 
the God who is more remote from it is more particular. 

For the God who is the cause of more effects i.s 
nearer to that which produces all things; but he who is 
the cause of fewer is more remote from it. And he in 
deed who is the cause of many effects is more univer- 

55 The source of this is in the Phaedrus, p. 246: "Zeus, the 
mighty leader in heaven, driving a winged chariot, heads the di 
vine procession, disposing and presiding over all things; and after 
him follows an army of Gods and daemons, distributed into eleven 
divisions." Read the illuminating comment of Hermeias, and the 
notes of Ast, on this passage. Lamprias in Plutarch (Sympos. 
IX. 5.) says that Plato "calls the intelligible nature of the heaven 
a winged chariot, the harmonious revolution of the universe." 
Plotinus, (En. V. 8. 10.), says: "Wherefore Zeus himself, who is 
the most ancient of the other Gods, whom he leads, proceeds first 
to the contemplation of the intelligible world; and the other Gods, 
daemons and souls, who are able to perceive these transcendently 
lucid objects, follow him." Add Plotinus: En. III. 2. 1.; Proclus 
in Plat. Theol. IV. 16.; Damascius riepi A 



9 6 

sal; but he who is the cause of .fewer is more particular. 
And each, indeed, is a unity; but the one is greater and 
the other less in power. The more partial Gods like 
wise are generated from the more universal: the latter 
not being divided, since they are unities; nor changed 
in quality, because they are immovable; nor multiplied 
by habitude, for they are unmingled. But from them 
selves, through an abundance of power, they generate 
secondary progressions, which are the decrements of 
the natures prior to them. 

PROPOSITION CXXVII. 

Every divine nature, since it is simple, is specially primary, 
and on this account is most self-sufficient. 

For that it is simple is evident from its unity; since 
every divine nature is most unical. But a nature of 
this kind is transcendently simple. That it is likewise 
most sufficient to itself may be learned by considering 
that a composite nature is indigent, if not of other things 
to which it is external, yet of those things of which it is 
composed. But that which is most simple and unical, 
and which establishes itself in The Good, is most self- 
sufficient. Such, however, is every divine nature. 
Neither, therefore, is it indigent of other things, since 
it is goodness itself, nor of things requisite to composi 
tion, because it is unical. 

PROPOSITION CXXVIII. 

Every God, when participated by natures nearer to himself, 
is participated without a medium; but when participat 
ed by natures more remote from himself, the participa 
tion is through fewer or more media. 

For the former, since they are uniform and self-ex 
istent through their cognation, are able to participate 
immediately of the divine unities; but the latter, through 



97 

their diminution and extension into multitude require 
other things which are more united, in order that they 
may participate of the unities themselves, and not of 
things united. For united multitude subsists between 
unity itself and divided multitude; being indeed able to 
coalesce with unity, but allied in a certain respect to di 
vided multitude, through the appearance or image of 
multitude. 

PROPOSITION CXXIX. 

Every divine body is divine tlirough a divine soul: every soul 
is divine through a divine intellect: arid every intellect is 
divine through the participation of a divine unity. Unity 
indeed is of itself a Cod: intellect is most divine: soul is 
divine, but body is deiforni. 

For if every number of the Gods is above intellect, 
but participations are effected through cognate and 
similar natures, the impartible essence will primarily 
participate of the superessential unities: secondarily the 
nature which comes into contact with generation will 
participate of them; and, thirdly, generation. Each of 
these likewise participates of them through the proxi- 
mately superior natures: the peculiarity of the Gods in 
deed proceeding even to the last of things in its partici 
pants, but through media cognate to itself. For unity 
indeed imparts its transcendent power in divine concerns 
to the first intellect, and causes this intellect to be like 
itself according to unical multitude. But through intel 
lect it is likewise present to soul, conjoining soul with 
intellect and co-inflaming it [with divine fire], when this 
intellect is participable. And through soul it imparts 
even to body an echo or resonance of its own pecu 
liarity, if it is a body which participates in any respect 
of soul. And thus body becomes not only animated 
and intellectual, but likewise divine, receiving life and 



9 8 

motion from soul, indissoluble permanency from intel 
lect, and divine union from the unity which is partici 
pated. For each of these imparts its own hyparxis to 
the subsequent nature. 56 

PROPOSITION CXXX, 

In every divine order the things whieh are first are more ex 
empt from the natures proximately arranged under them, 
than these latter are from things subsequent. And secon 
dary natures are more dependent on their proximate su 
periors, than following natures are dependent on these. 

For the more unical and universal a nature is, the 
more is it allotted a greater transcendency with respect 
to subsequent natures. And the more diminished it is in 
power, the more is it connascent with the natures pos 
terior to itself. And the higher natures indeed are more 
united with their more principal causes; but inferior na 
tures are less united with them. For to be more exempt 
from subordinate natures, and to be more united to su 
perior, implies a greater power: on the contrary, to re 
cede in a greater degree from more excellent, and to be 
co-passive with subordinate natures, implies a diminution 
of power. And this happens to secondary, but not to 
primary natures, in every order of things. 

PROPOSITION CXXXI. 
Every God begins his own activity from himself. 

For he first exhibits in himself the peculiarity of his 
presence to secondary natures, because he likewise im 
parts himself to other things according to his own exu 
berant plentitude. For neither does deficiency belong 
to the Gods, nor plentitude alone. For every thing de- 

56 As to the argument, see the Timaeus, p. 30; Plotinus: En. 
IV. 3. 21., En. IV. 4. 9 sq.; Proclus in Plat. Theol. p. 126 sq,; Por- 
phyrii Sententt. cap. 1 VII. 



99 

ficient is imperfect, and it is impossible that the imper 
fect should make another thing perfect. But that which 
is full is alone self-sufficient, and is not yet prepared to 
impart itself. It is necessary, therefore, that the nature 
which fills other things, and which extends to other 
things the impartances of itself should be super-plenary 
or exuberantly full. Hence if a divine nature fills all 
things from itself with the good which it contains in it 
self, each deity is exuberantly full. And if this be so, 
primarily possessing in itself the peculiarity which it im 
parts to others, it will extend to them the communica 
tions of super-plenary goodness. 

PROPOSITION CXXXII. 
All the orders of the Gods are hound in union by a medium. 

For all the progressions of beings are effected 
through similars; and much more will the orders of the 
Gods possess an indissoluble continuity, because they 
subsist uniformly, and are defined according to the one, 
which is the archical cause of their existence. The 
decrements, therefore, are produced unitedly, and alone 
according to the similitude in beings of secondary to 
primary natures. And this is so, because the hyparxis 
of the Gods much more consists in union than the sub 
sistence of beings. All the divine genera, therefore, 
are bound together by appropriate media; arid primary 
natures do not proceed into progressions perfectly dif 
ferent without a medium, but through the genera com 
mon to each, from which they proceed and of which 
they are immediately the causes. For these congre 
gate the extremes into one union, being spread under 
some things connascently, but proximately exempt from 
others: and they preserve the well-ordered progeny of 
divine natures. 



too 



PROPOSITION CXXXIII. 

Every God is a beneficent unity or an unific (svortoioS) good 
ness; and each God so far as he is a deity has this hy- 
parxis. The first God, however, is simply good, and sim 
ply one: but each posterior to the First is a certain good 
ness, and a certain unity. 

For the divine peculiarity distinguishes the unities 
and goodnesses of the Gods, so that each of the Gods 
benefits all things, according to a certain peculiarity of 
goodness, such as that of perfecting, containing, or de 
fending: for each of these is a certain good, but not 
every good. But the First God pre-establishes a uni- 
cal cause, and hence is The Good, which constitutes all 
all goodness. For all the hyparxes of the Gods are not 
together equal to The One; so great a transcendency is 
the First God allotted with respect to the multitude of 
the Gods. 

PROPOSITION CXXXIV. 

Every divine intellect knows as intellect, but acts providen 
tially as a God. 

For it is the illustrious prerogative of intellect to 
know beings, and to have its perfection in intellections; 
but it is the province of a God to act providentially, and 
to fill all things with good. This impartance, however, 
and replenishing with good is accomplished through 
the union of the replenishing natures with the causes 
prior to themselves; which union intellect likewise imi 
tating passes into sameness with intelligibles. A divine 
intellect, therefore, so far as it acts providentially is a 
God; because providence is an activity prior to intellect. 
Hence as a God it imparts itself to all things, but as an 
intellect it is not present to all things: for a divine na 
ture extends to things into which the intellectual pecul 
iarity does not proceed. For beings which are without 



IOI 

intellect desire to act providentially, and to participate 
of a certain good. And the reason of this is because 
all things do not desire intellect, not even all which are 
able to participate of it, but all things desire good, and 
hasten to obtain it. 

PROPOSITION CXXXV. 

Every divine unity is participated by some being immedi 
ately; and every deified nature is extended to one divine 
unity. As many likewise as are the unities which are 
participated, so many are the genera of beings which 
participate. 

For neither two or more unities are participated by 
one being. For how, when the peculiarities in the uni 
ties are changed would that which is connascent with 
each unity remain unchanged, since contact becomes 
through similitude? Nor is one unity participated in a 
divided manner by many beings: for many beings are 
unable to be conjoined with unity, and as beings they 
are unconjoined with the unity which is prior to beings, 
and as many they are separated from unity. It is nec 
essary, however, that the nature which participates 
should be partly similar to that which is participated, 
and partly different and dissimilar. Since, therefore, 
that which participates is one of beings, but unity is su- 
peressential, and according to this they are dissimilar, 
it is necessary that the participant should be one that 
thereby it may be similar to the one which is participat 
ed, though of these the latter is one in such a manner as 
to be unity, but the former so as to be passive to the 
one, and to be united through the participation of unity. 



102 



PROPOSITION CXXXVI. 

Every God ivho is more universal and ranks nearer to the 
First, is participated by a more universal genus of beings. 
But the God who is more partial and more remote from 
the First, is participated by a more partial genus of be 
ings. And as being is related to being, so is unity to di 
vine unity. 57 

For if there are as many beings as there are unities, 
and vice versa, and one unity is participated by one be 
ing, it is evident that the order of beings proceeds ac 
cording to the order of the unities, being assimilated to 
the order prior to beings: and more universal beings 
are connascent with more universal unities, but more 
partial beings with more partial unities. For if this 
were not the case, again similars would be conjoined 
with dissimilars, and there would not be a distribution 
according to worth. These things, however, are impos 
sible: since from the divine unities the one and appro 
priate measure shines forth, and proceeds from them to 
all other natures. Much more, therefore, will there be 
an order of participation in these, similars depending on 
similars, according to power. 

PROPOSITION CXXXVII. 

Every unity with the one constitutes the being which partic 
ipates of it. 

For The One, since it constitutes all things, so like 
wise it is the cause of the unities which are participated, 
and of the beings which depend on these unities. But 
the unity of every being produces the peculiarity which 
shines forth in that particular being. And The One in 
deed is the cause of being simply; but unity is the 

57 The source of the argument is in the Parmenides. See 
Plotinus: En. VI. 6. 9 sqq.; Proclus in Plat, Theol. III. 1 sq.; III. 
13. 



io 3 

cause of alliance, because it is connascent with The One. 
Hence unity is that which of itself defines the being 
which participates of it, and essentially exhibits in it 
self a superessential peculiarity or characteristic. For 
everywhere, from that which is primary that which is 
secondary is that which it is. If, therefore, there is a 
certain superessential peculiarity of deity, this likewise 
belongs to the being which participates of it essentially. 

PROPOSITION CXXXVIII. 

Of all the deified natures ivhich participate of the divine 
peculiarity, the first and highest is Being itself. 

For if being is beyond intellect and life, as has been 
demonstrated, and if it is likewise after The One the 
cause of the greatest number of effects, being will be 
the highest deified nature. For it is more unical than life 
and intellect, and is on this account entirely more 
venerable. But there is no other prior to it except 
The One. For prior to unical multitude what else 
can there be than The One? But being is unical multi 
tude, because it consists of bound and infinity. And, uni 
versally, superessential being is prior to essence: 58 since 
in the illuminations which are imparted to secondary 
natures, The One alone is beyond Being itself, being im 
mediately after The One. For that which is being in 
capacity (power), but is not yet being in energy (ac 
tivity), is nevertheless according to its own nature one: 
and after this follows the being which is now being in 

58 For as Being itself is no other than the highest order of 
the Gods and the most uniform multitude, and as the character 
istic of every God is a divine unity, hence the characteristic of 
Being itself will be the unity proceeding from bound. But as all 
the divine unities are superessential, hence Being itself according 
to its characteristic will be superessential, T. 



104 

energy. Hence in the principles of things non-being 59 
is immediately beyond being, because it is something 
more excellent and no other than The One itself. 60 

PROPOSITION CXXXIX. 

All things which participate of the divine unities begin from 
being, but end in a corporeal nature. 

For being is the first of participants, but body the 
last: for we say that there are divine bodies. For the 
highest of all the genera of bodies, souls and intellects 
are attributed to the Gods, so that in every order things 
analogous to the Gods may connect and preserve sec 
ondary natures, and that each number may be a whole 
containing all things in itself, according to the whole 
which is in a part, and possessing prior to other things 
the divine peculiarity. The divine genus, therefore, 
subsists corporeally, psychically, and intellectually: and 
it is evident that all these are divine according to par 
ticipation. For that which is primarily divine subsists 
in the unities. Hence the participants of the divine 
unities originate indeed from being, but end in a corpo 
real nature. 

PROPOSITION CXL. 

All the powers of divine natures, having a supernal origin, 
and proceeding through appropriate media, extend even 
to the last of things and to the terrestrial regions. 6l 

For neither does any thing intercept these powers, 

59 For as matter is deservedly called non-being, because it is 
worse than all things; in like manner this appellation is proper to 
the First Cause, as he is better than all things. T. 

60 See the Parmenides, p. 157; the Philebus, p. 14 sq.; Ploti- 
nus: En. VI. 5. 1 sqq.; Proclus in Plat. Theol. III. 7., IV. 27.; Por- 
phyrii Sententt. cap. XXVII et XXXVIII. 

61 See Plotinus: En. IV. 3. 1 sq., En. IV. 4. 22 sq. En. VI. 7. 
11 sq.; Proclus in Plat. Theol. II. 1. II. 11. 



105 

and exclude their presence from all things. For they 
are not in want of places and intervals, on account of 
their unrestrained transcendency with respect to all 
things, and a presence every where unmingled. Nor is 
that which is adapted to participate of them, prohibited 
from participation. But as soon as any nature is pre 
pared for participation they also are present, neither 
then approaching nor prior to this absent, but always 
possessing an invariable sameness of subsistence. If, 
therefore, any terrene nature is adapted to the participa 
tion of these divine powers they are present with it, and 
fill all things with themselves: and with superior natures 
they are in a greater degree present, but they are 
present with the mediate natures according to their or 
der, and with the natures which are last in an ultimate 
degree. From on high, therefore, they extend them 
selves even to the last of things. Hence in last natures 
there are representations of those which are first, and 
all things sympathize with all? 2 secondary indeed pre- 
62 Thus too Hippocrates, ^vppoia /.na^v^ntroia jitia, Ttavra 
dvjitTtaOsa, z. e. "there is one conflux, one conspiration, and all things sym 
pathize with all " He who understands this will see that the magic 
cultivated by the ancient philosophers is founded in a theory no 
less sublime than rational and true. Such a one will survey the 
universe as one great animal, all whose parts are in union and 
consent with each other, so that nothing is foreign and detached; 
nothing, strictly speaking, void of sympathy and life. For though 
various parts of the world, when considered as separated from 
the whole, are destitute of peculiar life yet they possess some 
degree of animation, however inconsiderable, when viewed with 
relation to the universe. Life indeed may be compared to a 
perpetual and universal sound; and the soul of the world re 
sembles a lyre, or some other musical instrument, from which 
we may suppose this sound to be emitted, But from the un 
bounded diffusion as it were of the mundane soul every thing par 
ticipates of this harmonical sound, in a greater or less perfection, 
according to the dignity of its nature. So that while life every where 
resounds, the most abject of beings may be said to retain a faint 



io6 

existing in primary natures, but primary natures pre 
senting themselves to the view in those which are sec 
ondary. For every thing subsists in a three-fold man 
ner, either through cause, through hyparxis, or bypar- 
ticipation. 

PROPOSITION CXLI. 

Every providence of the Gods is twofold, one exempt from, the 
natures for which it provides, but the other co-ordinated 
with them. 

For some divine essences, through their hyparxis 
and the peculiarity of their order, are entirely expanded 
above the illuminated natures. But others, which are of 
the same order, provide for things subordinate of the 
same co-ordination; these likewise imitating the provi 
dential activity of the exempt Gods, and desiring to fill 
secondary natures with the good which they are able to 
impart. 63 

echo of melody produced by the mundane lyre. It was doubtless 
from profoundly considering this sympathy between the mundane 
soul and the parts of the world that the ancient philosophers 
were enabled to procure the presence of divinity, and performs 
effects beyond the comprehension of tne vulgar. And that this 
was the opinion of Plotinus, the following passage evinces: "It ap 
pears to me that the ancient wise men, who wished to procure 
the presence of the Gods by fabricating statues and performing 
sacred rites, directed their intellectual eye to the nature of the 
universe, and perceived that the nature of the soul was every 
where easy to be attracted, when a proper subject was at hand, 
easily passive to its influence. But every thing adapted to imita 
tion is readily passive, and is like a mirror able to seize a certain 
form, and reflect it to the view." Ennead 4. lib. 3. T. 

63 See Plotinus: En. IV. 8. 2. and Proclus in Plat. Theol. I. 15. 



107 

PROPOSITION CXLII. 

The Gods are present to all tilings in the same manner, but 
all things are not in the same manner present to the Gods. 
But every thing participates of their presence according 
to its own order and poiver. And this is accomplished by 
some things uniformly, but by others manifoldly ;by some 
eternally, but by others according to time; and by som^e 
incorporeally , but by others corporeally. 

For it is necessary that the different participation 
of the same things should become different either from 
the participant, or from that which is participated. But 
every divine nature always has the same order, and is 
free from any relation to all things, and is unmixed. It 
follows therefore that the mutation must arise and sub 
sist from the participants, and that in these there is that 
which is not invariably the same, and that at different 
times they are differently present to the Gods. Hence 
though the Gods are present to all things with invariable 
sameness, all things are not in the same manner present 
to them. But other things are present to them to the 
extent of their capacity, and according to the manner in 
which they are present they enjoy their illuminations. 
For the participation of the Gods is according to the 
measure of their presence. 

PROPOSITION CXLIII. 

All inferior natures yield to the presence of the Gods, though 
the participant may be adapted to participation. Every 
thing alien recedes from the divine light, but all things 
are illuminated at once by the Gods. 

For divine natures are always more comprehensive 
and more powerful than the things which proceed from 
them. But the inaptitude of the participants is the 
cause of the deprivation of divine illumination: for 
this inaptitude obscures it by its own imbecility. And 



io8 

this being obscured, a certain other appears to receive 
dominion, not according to its own power, but accord 
ing to the imbecility ot the participant, which seems to 
rise against the divine form of the illumination. 

o 

PROPOSITION CXLIV. 

All beings, and all the distributions of beings, extend as far 
in their progressions as the orders of the Gods. 

For the Gods produce beings with themselves, nor 
is it possible for any thing to subsist, and to receive 
measure and order external to the Gods: for all things 
are perfected, disposed and measured by the power of 
the Gods. Prior therefore to the last genera in beings 
the Gods preexist, who likewise adorn these genera, and 
impart to them life, form and perfection, and convert 
them to The Good. In a similar manner, likewise, the 
Gods are prior to the middle and firstgenera of beings :and 
all things are bound and rooted in the Gods, and through 
this cause are preserved. But when any thing aposta 
tizes from and becomes destitute of the Gods, it entirely 
departs into non-entity and vanishes, because it is 
wholly deprived of those natures by which it was 
contained. 

PROPOSITION CXLV. 

The peculiarity of every divine order pervades through all 
secondary natures, and imparts itself to all the subor 
dinate genera of beings. 

For if beings proceed as far as the orders of the 
Gods extend, in every genus of beings there is a sup- 
ernally-illuminated peculiarity of the divine powers. 
For every thing receives from its proximate appropriate 
cause the peculiarity according to which that cause is 
allotted its hypostasis. I say, for instance, if there is a 
certain purifying deity, there is likewise a purification in 
souls, in animals, in plants, and in stones. And, in a 



similar manner, if there is a guardian, a convertive, a 
perfective, and a vivific power. And a stone indeed par 
ticipates of the divine purifying power corporeally only; 
but a plant participates it more clearly, through life. An 
animal has this form according to impulse or desire: the 
rational soul, rationally; intellect, intellectually; and the 
Gods superessentially and unically. The whole causal 
chain likewise has the same power from one divine 
cause. And there is the same mode of reasoning with 
respect to the peculiarities of the other divine powers. 
For all things depend on the Gods. And different na 
tures are illuminated by different Gods; every divine 
causal chain extending even to the last of things. And 
some things indeed depend on the Gods immediately, 
but others through a greater or less number of media. 
Truly t all things are full of Gods , and whatever each 
thing naturally has, it receives from the Gods. 04 

PROPOSITION CXLVI. 

The ends of all the divine progressions are assimilated to 
their principles, preserving a circle without a beginning 
and without an end, through the return of all to their 
principles.^ 

64 As to the argument, see Plotinus: En. III. 8. 1 sqq.; lam- 
blichus De Myster. I. 8. and notes of Gale, p. 191; Porphyrii Sen- 
tentt. XXVIII-XXX; Proclus in Plat. Theol. IV. 8. IV. 16; and 
Damascius icspi r&gt;/s a&lt;pojuoiaorixi/s di(XKo6i.u}(5EGa$, in his work HE pi 
, p. 199 sq., Vol. II. ed. Ruelle. 



65 Plotinus, (En. I. 7. 1.), says: "For it is necessary to posit 
The Good, on which all things depend, but it depends on 
nothing. Thus the absolute principle is The Good itself, which 
all things desire. It is requisite, therefore, that it abide immut 
ably, converting all things to itself, just as the circle revolves 
about the centre, from which all the lines flow and to which they 
tend. An example to us is the Sun, which is as it were a centre 
to light, which emanates from it and at the same time is attached 
to it. Indeed light everywhere co-exists with the Sun, and is no- 



no 

For if every thing which has proceeded returns to its 
own principle from which it proceeded, much more will 
universal orders having proceeded from their summit 
again return to it. But the return of the end to the be 
ginning renders the whole order one, definite, and 
tending to itself, and exhibiting through this tendency 
or inclination to itself the uniform which is in the mul 
titude. 

PROPOSITION CXLVII. 

The summits of all the divine orders are assimilated to the 
ends of the natures which are proximately above them. 

For if it is necessary that there should be a con 
tinuity of the divine progression, and that each order 
should be bound together by appropriate media, it is 
necessary that the summits of secondary should be con 
joined with the ends of primary orders. But this con 
tact becomes through similitude. Hence there will be a 
similitude of the principles of an inferior to the ends of 
a proximately superior order. 

PROPOSITION CXLVIII. 

Every divine order is united to itself in a threefold manner, 
viz. by the summit which is in it, by its middle, and by 
its end. 

For the summit having a power which is most uni- 
cal transmits union to all the causal chain, and unites 
the whole of it, supernally abiding in itself. But the 
middle, extending to both extremes, binds together the 
whole order about itself; transmitting indeed the gifts 
of primary divine natures, but extending the powers of 
those which are last and inserting communion in all of 

where separated from it: even if you should wish to sunder it into 
parts, nevertheless light will remain concentred in the Sun." See, 
further, En. II. 2. 1., En. VI. 9. 8. 



them, and a conjunction with each other. For thus the 
whole order becomes one from natures which replenish 
and those that are filled, converging to the middle as to 
a certain center. And the end again returning to the 
beginning, and recalling the proceeding powers, imparts 
similitude and convergency to the whole order. And 
thus the whole order is one through the unific power of 
primary natures, through the connexion existing in the 
middle, and through the return of the end to the prin 
ciple of the progressions. 

PROPOSITION CXLIX. 

Every multitude of the divine unities is bounded by number. 
For if it is most proximate to The One it will not 
be infinite: for the infinite is not connascent with The 
One, but alien to it. Indeed, if multitude of itself or 
essentially departs from The One, it is evident that infi 
nite multitude is perfectly destitute of it. Hence it is 
powerless, and inefficacious. The multitude of the Gods 
therefore is not infinite. Hence it is uniform and finite, 
and is more finite than every other multitude: for it is 
nearer to The One than all other multitude. If there 
fore the principle of things was multitude, it would be 
necessary that every thing which is nearer to the prin 
ciple should be a greater multitude than that which is 
more remote from it: for that which is nearer to any 
thing is more similar to it. Since, however, that which 
is first is The One, the multitude which is conjoined 
with it is a less multitude than that which is more 
remote from it. But the infinite is not a less, but the 
greatest possible multitude. 



112 



PROPOSITION CL. 

Every nature which proceeds in the divine orders is not nat 
urally adapted to receive all the powers of its producing 
cause. Nor in brief are secondary natures able to receive 
all the powers of the natures prior to themselves, but these 
have certain powers exempt from things in an inferior 
order, and incomprehensible by the beings posterior to 
themselves.^ 

For if the peculiarities or characteristics of the 
Gods differ from each other, those of the subordinate 
preexist in the superior divinities; but those of the su 
perior, since they are more universal, are not in the su 
bordinate. But more excellent natures impart indeed 
some powers to their progeny, but antecedently assume 
others in themselves, in an exempt manner. For it has 
been demonstrated that those Gods who are nearer to 
The One are more universal; and those more remote 
from it more partial. But if the more universal have 
powers comprehensive of the more partial, those that 
have a secondary and more partial order will not com 
prehend the power of the more universal Gods. In the 
superior therefore there is something incomprehensible 
and uncircumscribed by the inferior orders: for each of 
the divine orders is truly infinite. Nor is that which is 
infinite, as has been demonstrated, infinite to itself, nor 
much less to things above itself, but to all the natures 
posterior to itself: but infinity in these last is incapacity 
or power. The infinite, however, is incomprehensible 
by those natures to which it is infinite. Subordinate 
natures, therefore, do not participate of all the powers 
which more excellent natures antecedently comprehend 
in themselves: for the latter are incomprehensible by 

66 See the Phaedrus, p. 246 sq., and Commentary of Her- 
meias, p. 134 sq., ed Couvreur; Plotinus: En. V. 8. 3.; Proclus in 
Plat. Theol. II. 11. IV. 3. 



the former. Hence things of a secondary nature, 
through their more partial subsistence, will neither pos 
sess all the powers of more excellent beings, nor will 
they possess the powers which they do contain in the 
same manner as superior natures, on account of that 
infinity through which the latter transcend the former. 

PROPOSITION CLI. 

Every paternal order or genus in the Gods is primary, and 
pre-exists in tlie rank of The Good, according to all the 
divine orders. 

For the paternal genus produces the hyparxes of 
secondary natures, and total powers and essences, 
through one ineffable transcendency. Hence likewise 
it is denominated paternal, by reason of exhibiting the 
united and boniform power of The One, and the cause 
which constitutes secondary natures. And in each or 
der of the Gods the paternal genus ranks as the leader, 
producing all things from itself, and adorning them, be 
cause it is arranged analogous to The Good. And of 
the divine fathers some are more universal, but others 
are more partial, just as the orders themselves of the 
Gods differ according to a more universal or particular 
nature, through a causal reason. As many therefore as 
are the universal progressions of the Gods, so many 
likewise are the differences of the fathers. For if there 
is that which is analogous to The Good in every order, 
it is necessary that there should be a paternal genus in 
all the orders, and that each order should proceed from 
the paternal union. 07 

67 On the paternal order of the Gods, and the paternal Gods, 
consult lamblichus On the Mysteries, VIII. 2. 3. and the Notes of 
Gale, p. 297; and Proclus in Plat. Theol. V. 3. VI. 6 



PROPOSITION CLII. 

Every thing which is generative in the Gods proceeds ac 
cording to the infinity of divine power, multiplying 
itself, proceeding through all things, and transcendently 
exhibiting a never-failing power in the progressions of 
secondary natures. 

For to multiply things which proceed, and to pro 
duce things into progeny from the occult comprehen 
sion in causes, of what else is it the prerogative than of 
the infinite power of the Gods, through which all divine 
natures are filled with prolific good? For every thing 
which is full produces other things from itself through 
a super-plenary power. The domination of power 
therefore is the peculiarity of generative deity, which 
multiplies the powers of the things generated, renders 
them prolific, and excites them to generate and consti 
tute other things. For if every nature imparts the ap 
propriate peculiarity which it has primarily to other 
things, every nature which is prolific will impart to na 
tures posterior to itself a prolific progression, and will 
adumbrate the infinity which is the primary leader of 
wholes, from which every generative power proceeds, 
and which in an exempt manner pours forth the peren 
nial progressions of divine natures. 

PROPOSITION CLIIJ. 

Every thing perfect in the Gods is the cause of divine per 
fection. 

For as the hypostases of beings are of one kind, but 
those of superessential natures of another, so likewise 
of perfections those of the Gods themselves are in 
their hyparxis, but those of beings are secondary and 
posterior to them. And the former are self-perfect and 
primary, because The Good subsists primarily in them; 
but the latter possess perfection through participation. 



1*5 

Hence the perfection of the Gods is one thing-, and that 
of deified natures is another. The perfection however 
which is primarily in the Gods is not only the cause of 
perfection to deified natures, but likewise to the Gods 
themselves. For if every nature so far as it is perfect 
returns to its own principle, that which is the cause of 
all divine return is the perfective genus of the Gods. 

PROPOSITION CLIV. 

Every thing which is of a guardian nature in the Gods pre 
serves every thing in its proper order, and is uniformly 
exempt from secondary and established in primary na 
tures. 

For if a guard immutably preserves the measure of 
the order of every thing, and connectedly contains all 
the natures which are guarded in their appropriate per 
fection, it will impart to all things an excellence supe 
rior to subordinate beings, and will firmly establish each 
thing unmingled in itself, existing as the cause of unde- 
filed purity to the natures which are guarded, and fixing 
them in superior beings. For every thing is perfect 
which adheres to primary natures, is in itself alone, and 
is expanded above all things subordinate. 

PROPOSITION CLV. 

Every thing vlvific in the Gods is a generative cause, but 
every generative cause is not vivific. 

For a generative is more universal than a vivific 
cause, and is nearer to the principle of all things. 
For generation manifests a cause which produces beings 
into multitude: but vivification represents to us the deity 
who is the supplier of all life. If therefore the former 
multiplies the hypostases of beings, but the latter the 
progressions of life, if this be the case, as being is to 
life so is the generative order to the vivific causal chain. 
Hence the former will be more universal and the cause 



of a greater number of effects, and therefore will be 
nearer to the principle of all things. 

PROPOSITION CLVI. 

Every cause of purity is contained in the guardian order: 
but on the contrary every genus of a guardian order is not 
the same with the purifying genus. 

For purity imparts to all the Gods the unmingled 
with things inferior, and the undefiled in the providence 
of secondary natures. But a guardian power likewise 
effects this, contains all things in itself, and firmly in 
serts them in superior natures. The guardian therefore 
is more universal than the purifying genus. For, in 
brief, the peculiarity of the guardian power is to pre 
serve the order of every thing the same with reference 
to itself, and to the natures prior and posterior to itself: 
but the peculiarity of purity is to keep more excellent 
natures exempt from those which are subordinate. 
These powers however are primarily in the Gods. For 
it is necessary that there should be one cause preceding 
that which is in all things, and, in brief, that there 
should be uniform measures of all good causally com 
prehended by the Gods. For there is no good in sec 
ondary natures which does not pre-exist in the Gods: 
for what other origin or cause can this have? Hence in 
the divinities purity is likewise a primary good, guardi 
anship, and every thing of this kind. 

PROPOSITION CLVII. 

Every paternal cause is the supplier of being to all tilings, 
and constitutes the hyparxes of beings. But every nature 
which is fabricative of the production of form exists prior 
to composite natures, and precedes their order and divi 
sion according to number, and is likewise of the same co 
ordination with the paternal cause in the more partial 
genera of things. 

For each of these is of the order of bound; since 



hyparxis, number and form have all of them the form 
of bound: so that in this respect they are co-ordi 
nate with each other. But the demiurgic cause pro 
duces fabrication into multitude; and the uniform sup 
plies the progressions of beings. And the one is the 
artificer of form, but the other produces essence. So 
far therefore as form and being differ from each other, 
so far likewise does the paternal differ from the de 
miurgic cause. But form is causal. 68 Hence the paternal 
cause is more universal and causal, and is beyond the 
demiurgic genus, in the same manner as being is be 
yond form. 

PROPOSITION CLVIIT. 

Every elevating cause in the Gods differs both from a purify 
ing cause and from- the revertive genera. 

For it is evident that this cause has necessarily a 
primary subsistence in the Gods; since in these all the 
causes of total good pre-exist. But it subsists prior to 
the purifying cause: for the one liberates from things of 
a subordinate nature, but the other conjoins with more 
excellent natures. The elevating however has a more 
partial order than the revertive cause, because every na 
ture which returns, returns either to itself, or to that 
which is more excellent than itself. But the work of 
the elevating cause is characterized by a return to that 
which is more excellent, because it leads that which re 
turns to a superior and more divine cause. 69 

68 See Proclus in Platonis Tim. p. 269 sq. Vol. III. ed. Diehl. 

69 See lamblichus De Mysteriis, VIII. 8.; Porphyrii Sententt. 
cap. XXXIV.; Proclus in Plat. Tim. p. 165 Vol. III. ed. Diehl: 
Proclus in Plat. Theol. IV. 9, IV 19. V. 18. 



PROPOSITION CLIX. 

Every order of the Gods consists of the first principles, Bound 
and Infinity. But one order is caused more by Bound, 
and another by Infinity. 

For every order proceeds from each of these prin 
ciples, because the impartances of first causes extend 
through all secondary natures. But in some things 
bound predominates in the mixture [of bound and infin 
ity,] and in others infinity. And thus the genus 
which has the form of bound is perfected in which the 
powers of bound dominate: and so too the genus which 
has the form of the infinite is perfected in which the 
powers of infinity dominate. 70 

On Intellect. 

PROPOSITION CLX. 

Every divine intellect is uniform and per feet. And the first 
intellect is from itself, and produces other intellects- 

For if it is a God it is filled with divine unities, and 
is uniform. But if this be so, it is likewise perfect, be 
cause it is full of divine goodness. And if this be ad 
mitted, it is likewise primarily intellect, since it is united 
to the Gods: for deified intellect is better than every 
intellect. But since it is primarily intellect, it likewise 
imparts an hypostasis to other intellects. For all sec 
ondary natures receive their hyparxis from the primary 
natures. 71 

70 Consult Plotinus: En. III. 8. 8. sq., En. VI. 6. 18.; Proclus 
in Plat. Theol. II. 4.; Damascius Us pi 



71 For further information about Intellect, see Plotinus: En. 
I. 3. 5., En. V. 1. 8., En. V. 9., En. VI. 2. 4., En. VI. 7. 35.; Pro 
clus in Plat. Theol. p. 53; Aristot. De Anima I. 5. 



PROPOSITION CLXI. 

Every thing ivhich is truly being, and because it depends on 
the Gods, is divine and imp articip able. 

For since that which is truly being is the first of 
the natures which participate of the divine union, 
as has been demonstrated, it likewise fills "intellect 
from itself. For intellect is being, because it is fill 
ed with being, and true being is therefore a divine 
intelligible: as that which is deified it is divine, but 
as that which fills intellect, and is participated by it, it 
is intelligible. Intellect likewise is being through that 
which is primarily being. But that which is primari 
ly being itself is separate from intellect, because in 
tellect is posterior to being. But imparticipables sub 
sist prior to things which are participated: hence being 
which subsists by itself and is imparticipable is prior to 
the being which is conjoined with intellect. For it is 
intelligible, not as co-arranged with intellect, but as 
perfecting intellect in an exempt manner, because it im 
parts being to it, and fills it with truly existing essence. 

PROPOSITION CLXII. 

Every multitude of unities which illuminates truly exist 
ing being is arcane and intelligible; arcane since it is 
conjoined with The One, but intelligible because it is par 
ticipated by being. 

For all the Gods are denominated from the things 
which depend on them; because from these it is possi 
ble to know their different hypostases, which are [of 
themselves] unknown. For every thing divine is of it 
self ineffable and unknown, because it is connascent 
with the Ineffable One. 72 From the difference, how- 

72 Compare lamblichus, (On the Mysteries, VIII. 2.): "Prior 
to truly existing beings and universal principles there is one God 
prior even to [that deity who is generally believed to be] the first 
God and king, abiding immovable in the solitude of his own 



I2O 

ever, of the participants it happens that the peculiarities 
of divine natures become known. The Gods, therefore, 
which illuminate truly existing being are intelligible; be 
cause true being is a divine intelligible, and impartici- 
pable, subsisting prior to intellect. For this would not 
depend on the first Gods, unless they likewise possessed a 
primary hypostasis, and a power perfective of other 
Gods, since, as participants are to each other, so like 
wise are the hyparxes of the things which are partici 
pated. 

PROPOSITION CLXIII. 

Every multitude of unities which is participated by impar- 
ticipable intellect is intellectual. 

For as intellect is to truly existing being, so are 
these unities to the intelligible unities. If, therefore, the 
latter which illuminate being are intelligible, hence the 
former which illuminate a divine and imparticipable in 
tellect are intellectual. Yet they are not intellectual in 
such a way as if they subsisted in intellect, but as caus 
ally existing prior to intellect, and generating intellect. 

PROPOSITION CLXIV. 

Every multitude of unities which is participated by every 
imparticipable soul is supermundane. 

For because imparticipable soul is primarily above 
the world, the Gods also which are participated by it are 
likewise supermundane, having the same analogy or 
proportion to the intellectual and intelligible Gods 
which soul has to intellect, and intellect to truly exist 
ing being. As, therefore, every soul depends on intel 
lect, and intellect returns to the intelligible, thus like 
wise the supermundane are dependent on the intellect- 
unity. For neither is the intelligible, nor any other nature, con 
nected with him .... he is worshipped by silence alone." And 
Damascius n^pi Apx&&amp;gt;v (p. 324 Vol. I.): "The Egyptians in certain 
discourses celebrate the One Principle of all as an Unknown Dark 
ness, and this thrice pronounced as such." 



121 

ual, in the same manner as the intellectual on the intel 
ligible Gods. 73 

PROPOSITION CLXV. 

Every multitude of unities ivhichis participated by a certain 
sensible body is mundane, 

For it illuminates the parts of the world through 
the medium or intervening" of intellect and soul. 74 For 
neither is intellect present to any mundane body with 
out soul, nor are deity and soul conjoined immediately, 
because participations and conjunctions become through 
similars. Intellect itself likewise according to its intel 
ligible and summit participates of unity. Unities, there 
fore, are mundane, because they give completion to the 
whole world, and deify visible bodies. For each of 
these is divine, not through soul, for soul is not pri 
marily a God, nor through intellect, since intellect is 
not the same with The One. But each of these visible 
bodies is animated, indeed, and moved of itself, through 
soul: and it possesses a perpetual sameness of sub 
sistence, and is moved in the most excellent order 
through intellect: but it is divine through union. And if 
it possesses a providential power, it possesses it through 
this cause. 

PROPOSITION CLXVI. 

Every intellect is either imp a rti dp able or participable* And 
if participable, it is either participated by supermun 
dane or by mundane souls. 

For imparticipable intellect, having a primary hy- 

73 On the Gods, supermundane, intellectual, intelligible, etc., 
see Proclus in Plat. Theol. pp. 8. 38. 59. 97. 107. 191194, 270. 328., 
and Damascius FTtpi 



74 Compare Aristotle De Anima III. 4.: Plotinus: En. IV. 3. 3 
sq.; Proclus in Plat. TheoL pp, 17, 36. 42. 128, 141. 259. 469. 



parxis, is the leader of every multitude of intellects- 
But of participable intellects some illuminate the super 
mundane and imparticipable soul, but others the mun 
dane soul. For the mundane multitude does not im 
mediately emanate from the imparticipable, if progres 
sions become through similars. But that which is sep 
arate from the world is more similar to the impartic 
ipable than that which is divided about it. Nor does 
a supermundane multitude alone exist, but there 
are likewise mundane multitudes; since there is a mun 
dane multitude of Gods, and the world itself is animated 
and at the same time intellectual. The participation 
likewise of the supermundane Gods by mundane souls, 
is through the medium of mundane intellects. 

PROPOSITION CLXVIL 

Every intellect thinks itself: but the Primal Intellect thinks 
itself only, and in this intellect Thought and the object of 
thought (the intelligible) are one numerically. But each of 
the subsequent intellects thinks itself and the natures prior 
to itself. And the intelligible to each of these is partly that 
which it is (itself) and partly that from which it ema 
nates. 

For every intellect either thinks itself, or that 
which is above itself, or that which is posterior to itself. 
But if it thinks that which is posterior to itself, since it 
is intellect, it will turn to that which is less excellent 
than itself; and thus will not know that to which it 
turns, because the object of its thought is not in itself, 
but external to itself: and it will only know the image 
of this thing, which was generated in itself from it. For 
that which it has it knows, and that which it experi 
ences, but not that which it does not possess, and by 
which it is not affected. 

But if it thinks that which is above itself, if indeed 
this is done through the knowledge of itself, it will at 



one and the same time both know itself and that super 
ior nature. But if it knows that alone it will be ig 
norant of itself, even though it is intellect. In brief, by 
knowing that which is prior to itself, it will know that it 
is a cause, and will likewise know the things of which 
it is the cause. For if it is ignorant of these, it will 
likewise be ignoraut of that which is the cause of them, 
not knowing that which produces what it produces by 
its very being, and what the things are which it does 
produce. Hence by knowing the things of which the 
nature which is superior to it is the cause, it will like 
wise know itself, because it emanates from thence. By 
knowing, therefore, that which is prior to itself, it will 
likewise entirely know itself. Hence if there is a cer 
tain intelligible intellect, this knowing itself will likewise 
know the intelligible, since it is itself the intelligible. 
But each of the intellects which are subsequent to the 
First will think the intelligible which is in itself, and at 
the same time that which is prior to itself. Hence the 
intelligible is in intellect, and intellect is in the intelligi 
ble. But one intellect is the same with the intelligible; 
and another is the same with the thought which is in 
itself, but is not the same with the intelligible prior to 
itself. 75 For one is that which is simply intelligible, and 
another is the intelligible in that which thinks. 

PROPOSITION CLXVIII. 

Every intellect in activity knows that it thinks, and it is not 
the peculiarity of one intellect to think, and of another to 
know that it thinks. 

75 Thus, for instance, Intellect in being itself, which com 
prehends the highest order of intelligibles, is vovs ror/ro? or an in 
telligible intellect, because it is the object of intelligence to all 
subordinate natures, and because its vision is transcend ently sim 
ple and occult. But every intellect is indeed the same with the 
intelligible in its own nature, but is subordinate to the Intelligible 
itself. T. 



T24 

For if it is intellect in activity, and thinks itself to 
be no other than the object of thought, it will know it 
self, and see itself. 76 But seeing that which thinks, and 
knowing that which sees, it will know that it is intellect 
in activity. But knowing this, it will know that it thinks, 
and will not alone know the objects of its thinking. 
Hence it will simultaneously know the intelligible and 
that it thinks it, and by thinking itself it will know it 
self. 

PROPOSITION CLXIX, 

Every intellect has its essence, power and action in eternity. 

For if intellect thinks itself, and intellect and the 
intelligible are the same, thought likewise is the same 
as intellect and the intelligible. For, since thinking is 
the medium between that which thinks and the object 
of thought, and these are the same, thinking likewise 
will be the same with each. But that the essence of in 
tellect is eternal is evident for the whole of it subsists 
at once and thinking is likewise eternal, since it is the 
same with the essence of intellect. For if intellect is 
immovable, it will not. be measured by time, neither ac 
cording to its being nor its activity: but since these sub 
sist with invariable sameness, the power likewise of 
intellect will be eternal. 

76 Intellect in energy, or in the act of understanding", is the 
same with the object of its intellection. For the object of its per 
ception must be resident in its essence, or it would perceive ex 
ternally like sense; and thus wouid not behold the thing itself, but 
only its image. But if that which is intelligible is seated in the 
essence of intellect, it will in no respect differ from intellect: for 
it will be essential to its nature, and will consequently be intel 
lectual as well as intelligible, T. 

But the intellect itself is likewise intelligible, in the same 
manner as other intelligible natures are; and in those beings which 
are wholly separated from matter that which thinks and that 
which is thought are the same. Aristotle: De Anima III. 4. 



PROPOSITION CL.XX. 

Every intellect thinks all tilings together. l&gt;u.i i 

pable intellect tliinlcs all things together simply: and each 
of the intellects subsequent to it thinks oil things acrord- 
i n.g to one or under the form of the singular, 

For if every intellect establishes its essence in eter 
nity, and together with its essence its activity, it will 
think all things together: but to every nature which is 
not established in eternity the successive objects of its 
perception subsist according to parts or severally. For 
every thing which is successive is in time; the success 
ive consisting of prior and posterior, but the whole of it 
not existing together. If therefore all intellects simi 
larly think (know) all things, they will not diher from 
each other. For if they think all things similarly they 
are similarly all things, since they are the very things 
which they think. But if all intellects are similarly all 
things, one intellect will not be imparticipable and an- 
nother not. For their essences are the same tilings as 
the objects of their thought; since the thinking of each 
intellect is the same with the being of each, and each is 
both thought and essence. It follows, therefore, either 
that each intellect does not similarly think all things, 
but one thing, or more than one, but not all things to 
gether; or that it thinks (knows) all things according to 
one (under the form of the singular). 77 To assert how 
ever that each intellect does not know all things, is to 
make intellect to be ignorant of some particular being. 
For if it is transitive in its activity, and thinks (knows) all 
things not together but according to prior and posterior, 
(/. e. knows one thing first and another subsequently), 

77 By an intellectual perception of all things according- to the 
one, Proclus means a perception of all things in one. For all in 
tellectual forms are in each; so that a perception of one is a per 
ception of all forms, and therefore of all things. T 



126 

at the same time having an immovable nature, it will be 
inferior to soul, which knows all things in and by activ 
ity: because intellect on this hypothesis will only know 
one thing on account of its immovability. It will there 
fore know all things according to one. For it either knows 
all things together, or one thing only, or all things ac 
cording to one: for in all intellects there is always the 
thought or knowledge of all things, which bounds all 
things in one of all. Hence there is something dom 
inant in thought, and the objects of thought; since all 
things are apprehended together as one only through 
the domination of one, which characterizes all things by 
itself. 

PROPOSITION CLXXI. 
Krery laid led is an iniparticipable essence, 

For if it is without magnitude, incorporeal and im- 
immovable, it is impartible. For every thing which in 
any way whatsoever is partible, is either partible by 
reason of magnitude, or multitude, or of activities which 
function in time. But intellect is eternal in all things, and 

O 

is beyond bodies,and the multitude which is in it is united. 
It is, therefore, impartible. That intellect likewise is 
incorporeal, the return to itself evidences: for no body re 
turns to itself. But that it is eternal, the identity of its ac 
tivity with its essence shows. For this has been before 
demonstrated. And that the multitude in it is united is 
evident from the continuity of intellectual multitude 
with the divine unities: for these are the first multitude, 
but intellects are next to these. Hence though every 
intellect is a multitude, yet it is an united multitude. 
For prior to that which is divided that which is collected 
into profound union, and is nearer to The One, subsists. 



I2 7 
PROPOSITION C I. XX II. 

Every intellect is proxiniately the producing cause of na 
tures perpetual and immutable in essence. 

For every nature which is produced by an immov 
able cause, is immutable in essence. But immovable 
intellect being all things eternally, and abiding in eter 
nity, produces by its very being that which it produces. 
If therefore intellect always is, and is invariably the 
same, it always produces, and in the same manner. 
Hence it is not the cause of things which at one time 
exist and at another time not, but it is the cause of 
things which always exist. 

PROPOSITION CI.XXII!. 

, Every intellect is intellectual, and the things which arc prior 
and posterior to itself are Hkeivise intellectual. 

For the things which are posterior to itself are in 
tellectual through cause, but the things which are prior 
to itself through participation: but intellect is the same, 
and is allotted an intellectual essence. Hence it de 
fines all things according to its essence; both the things 
which are through cause, and those which are through 
participation. For every thing participates of more excel 
lent beings in the way that it is naturally adapted to part 
icipate, and not according to the subsistence of the 
more excellent: for otherwise they would be similarly 
participated by all things. Participations therefore are 
according to the peculiarity and power of the partici 
pants. Hence in intellect the natures prior to it subsist 
intellectually; but intellect is likewise intellectually the 
things posterior to itself. For it does not consist of its 
effects, nor does it contain these but the causes of these 
in itself. But intellect is by its very being the cause of 
all things: and the very being of it is intellectual. Hence 
it contains intellectually the causes of all things, and 



12$ 

therefore every intellect contains all things intellect 
ually, both those which are prior and those which are 
posterior to it. As therefore every intellect contains 
intelligibles intellectually, so likewise it contains sen- 
sibles intellectually. 

PROPOSITION CLXXIY. 

Every intellect constitutes the tilings posterior to itself by 
thinking, and its creation is in thinking, and its thought 
in creating. 

For if intelligible and intellect are the same, the es 
sence likewise of every intellect will be the same with 
the thinking in itself. But intellect does that which it does 
through its essence, and produces according to the very- 
being which it is, and by thought therefore it will pro 
duce the things which are produced. For in intellect 
being* and thought are one. For intellect is the same 

?&gt; o 

with every being which it contains. If therefore it 
makes by its very being, but its very being is thought, 
it makes by thinking. The activity of thought consists 
in thinking, and this is the same with the essence of in 
tellect, and the function of the essence of intellect is to 
produce. For that which produces immovably, always 
has its very being in producing: the thought of intellect 
therefore consists in producing. 



Krerij Iniellecl \x prinio ritij part id paled bit those nut lire a 
ivhieli are i ittel ! i ctiial both in exsenc,?, and in activity, 

For it is necessary that every intellect should 
either be participated by those, or by other natures 
which have indeed an intellectual essence but do not al 
ways think, it is however impossible that it should be 
participated by the latter. For the activity of intellect 
is immovable. Ane hence the natures by which it is 



participated always participate of intellectual activity, 
which always causes the participants of it to become in 
tellectual. For that which possesses its activity in a 
certain part of time is unadapted to be conjoined with 
an eternal activity. But as in essences so in the muta 
tions and varieties of activities, between every eternal 
activity and that activity which is perfected in a certain 
time is that activity which has its perfection in the 
whole of time. For progressions never become with 
out a medium, but throuo-h connate and similar natures, 

c&gt; O 

according to the hypostases and perfections of energies. 
In a similar manner, therefore, every intellect is primar 
ily participated by those beings which are able to think 
during the whole of time, and who always think, though 
their thinking is in time, and is not eternally in activity. 
Corollary. From this therefore it is evident that 
it is impossible for the soul which at one time thinks 
and at another does not to participate proximately of 
intellect. 

PROPOSITION CI.XXVI. 

All intellectual forms are in each other, and each, is at the 
same time per se and distinct from the others. 

For if every intellect is impartible, and the multi 
tude which is in it is united through intellectual imparti- 
bility, all things in it will be in one, impartibles will be 
united to each other, and all intellectual forms will per 
vade through all. But if all intellectual forms are im 
material and incorporeal they are unconfusecl with each 
other and separate, and each preserving its own purity 
remains that which it is. The peculiar participation 
however of each participating in a separate man 
ner manifests the unconfused nature of intellectual 
forms. For unless the forms which are participated 
were different and apart from each other, the partici- 



pants of each of them would not participate in a sepa 
rate manner, but in the subordinate natures \i. e. in the 
participants] there would be a much greater indistinct 
confusion, because in rank they are inferior. For 
whence would there be a separation of these, if the 
natures which constitute and perfect them were con 
fused and indistinguishable? But, further, the impart 
ible hypostasis and uniform essence of that which con 
tains forms evince their united nature: for things which 
have their hyparxis in the impartible and the uniform 
are impartibly in the same thing. For how can you 
divide the impartible and The One? Hence they are 
simultaneously existent, and are in each other, each 
wholly pervading through the whole of each, without in 
terval. For that which comprehends them is not ex 
tended with interval, nor is one of them in this thing, 
but another elsewhere, as in that which has interval, 
but every thing is together in the impartible and in one: 
so that all intellectual forms are in each other, and are 
in each other unitedly, and at the same time each is dis 
tinctly apart from each. 

Corollary, But if any one, in addition to these 
demonstrations, needs examples, he may consider the 
theorems which exist in one soul. For all these are in 
the same soul, an essence which is truly without magni 
tude, and are united to each other. For that which is 
without magnitude does not locally contain the things 
which are in it, but impartibly and without interval, and 
the natures which it contains are united and separated. 
For the soul of itself draws forth all the propositions, 
each apart from each, drawing nothing to itself 
from the rest which, unless they were always separated 
in habit, would not be separated by the action of the 
soul. 



PROPOSITION CLXXVII. 

Evry intellect being a plenitude of forms, one intellect con 
tains more universal but another more partial forms. 
And the superior intellects contain more universally the 
things which those posterior to them contain more par 
tially. But tire inferior intellects contain more par 
tially the things which, those that are prior to them con 
tain more universally. 

For the superior intellects use greater powers, be 
cause they are more unical than secondary intellects. 
But the inferior intellects, since they are more multi 
plied, diminish the powers which they contain. For 
things which are more cognate to The One, because they 
are contracted in quantity are superior in power to 
the natures which are posterior to them. And, on the 
contrary, things more remote from The One because 
they are increased in quantity are inferior to the na 
tures which are nearer to The One. Hence the supe 
rior intellects, since they are essentially greater in power 
but less in multitude, through forms which are quanti 
tatively less produce more effects; but the intellects pos 
terior to them produce fewer effects through forms 
which are quantitatively more by reason of a deficiency 
in power. If therefore the former produce more effects 
through fewer forms, the forms in them are more uni 
versal: and if the latter produce fewer effects through 
a greater number of forms, the forms in them are more 
partial. 

Corollary. Hence it happens that the natures which 
are generated from superior intellects through one form 
are produced divisibly from secondary intellects through 
many forms. And, again, those natures which are pro 
duced by inferior intellects through many and distinct 
forms, are produced by superior intellects through 



132 

fewer but more universal forms. And that which is 
universal and common to all its participants accedes su- 
pernally: but that which is divided and peculiar accedes 
from secondary intellects. Hence secondary intellects 
by the more partial separation of forms distinctly unfold 
in a certain way and subtly differentiate the productions 
of primary intellects. 

PROPOSITION CLXXVIII. 
Every intellectual form constitutes eternal natures. 

For if every intellectual form is eternal and immov 
able, it is essentially the cause of immutable and eternal 
hypostases, but not of those which become and are cor 
ruptible: so that every thing which subsists by reason 
of an intellectual form is an eternal intellectual nature. 
For if all forms produce things posterior to themselves 
by their very being, but their being has an invariable 
sameness of subsistence, the things produced by them 
will likewise be invariably the same, and will be eternal. 
Neither therefore do the genera which are only in time 
subsist from a formal cause, nor have corruptible na 
tures as such a pre-existent intellectual form. For 
they would be incorruptible and unbegotten, if they de 
rived their hypostasis from intellectual forms. 

PROPOSITION CI.XXIX. 
Every intellectual number is finite. 

For if there is another multitude posterior to this, 
essentially inferior to it, and thus more remote from 
The One, but the intellectual number is nearer to The 
One, and if that which is nearer to The One, is quanti 
tatively less, but that which is more remote from it is 
quantitatively more. if this be the case, the intellectual 
number likewise will be less than every multitude pos 
terior to it. Hence it is not infinite. The multitude 



1 33 

of intellects therefore is finite. For that which is 
less than a certain thing is not infinite, because the in 
finite so far as it is infinite is not less than any thing. 78 

PROPOSITION Cl.XXX. 

Every intellect is a whole, oeeau.se each consists of parts, and 
is at once united to other intellects and differentiated 
from them. But iinparticipable Intellect is a whole sim 
ply, since it has in itself all 1he parts totally or under 
the form of the whole: bat each partial intellect contains 
the whole as in a part , and tlius is nil things partially. 

For if a partial intellect is all things according to 
one, and a subsistence according to one is nothing else 
than a subsistence partially, the whole is in each of 
these intellects partially, being defined according to a 
certain one particular thing which dominates in all of 
them. 



Krery participated intellect is either (Urine because it de 
pends on the Gods, or is intellectual only. 

For if there is a divine and iinparticipable intellect 
primarily, the intellect which is cognate to this is not 
that which differs from it in both respects, viz. which is 
neither divine nor imparticipable. For things which are 
dissimilar in both these respects cannot be conjoined 
to each other. It is evident therefore that the me 
dium between these is partly similar to that which is 
primarily intellect, and partly dissimilar to it. Either, 
therefore, it is imparticipable and not divine; or it is par 
ticipated and divine. But every nature imparticipable 
is divine, because it is allotted an order in multitude 
analogous to The One. Hence there will be a certain 

78 See Plotinus: En. VI. 6. 8 sq,; Proclus in Plat. Theol. IV. 
.29,; Hermiae Scholia in Plat. Phaedrum, p. 167 sq., ooi. Couvreur, 



134 

intellect which is divine and at the same time participat 
ed. It is necessary however that there should be an 
intellect which does not participate of the divine unities, 
but thinks them only. For in each causal chain the 
things which are first, and which are conjoined with 
their monad, are able to participate of the things which 
are proximately in a superior order: but those which 
are far distant from the primary monad cannot depend 
on the natures that proximately belong to a higher or 
der. There is therefore both a divine intellect and an 
intellect which is intellectual only: one subsisting ac 
cording to an intellectual peculiarity which it has from 
its own monad, and from imparticipable intellect; but the 
other subsisting according to the union which it receives 
from the participated monad. 

PROPOSITION CLXXXII. 

Every divine participated intellect is participated by divine 
souls. 

For if participation assimilates the participant to 
that which is participated, and renders the former con- 
nascent with the latter, it is evident that the participant 
of a divine intellect must be a divine soul, and depend 
ent on a divine intellect, and that through intellect as 
a medium it must participate of the deity which it con 
tains. For deity conjoins the soul which participates of 
it with intellect, and binds the divine to the divine. 

PROPOSITION CLXXXIII. 

Every intellect which is participated indeed but is intellec 
tual alone is participated neither by divine souls nor by 
those which experience a mutation from intellect into a 
privation of intellect. 

For neither are divine souls of this kind, nor those 
which participate of intellect. For souls participate of 
the Gods through intellect, as has been demonstrated. 



135 

Nor are souls which admit of mutation of this kind. For 
every intellect is participated by natures which are al 
ways intellectual, both in essence and in activity. And 
this is evident from what has previously been proven. 

On Soul. 

PROPOSITION CLXXXIV. 

Every soul is either divine, or is that which changes from in 
tellect into a privation of intellect, or that which always 
remains as a medium between these, but is inferior to di 
vine souls. 

For if divine intellect indeed is participated by di 
vine souls, but that intellect which is intellectual alone 
by those souls which are neither divine, nor receive a 
mutation from intelligence into a privation of intellect, 
for there are souls of this kind which at one time think 
and at another do not, if this be the case, it is evident 
that there are three genera of souls. And the first of 
these are divine; but the second are not divine, yet al 
ways participate of intellect; and the third are those 
which at one time change into intellect, and at an 
other into a privation of intellect. 

PROPOSITION CLXXXV. 

All divine souls are Gods psychically. But all those which 
participate of an intellectual intellect are the perpetual 
attendants of the Gods. And all those which are the re 
cipients of mutation are only occasionally the attendants 
of the Gods. 

For if upon some souls the divine light supernally 
shines, but others always think, and others again only 
occasionally participate of this perfection, if this be 
the case, the first of these among the multitude of souls 
will be analogous to the Gods: and the second will al- 



736 

ways follow the Gods, by reason of always energizing 
according to intellect, and will depend on divine souls, 
having the same relation or proportion to them as that 
which is intellectual to that which is divine. And the 
souls which only occasionally energize intellectually and 
follow the Gods neither participate of intellect in a man 
ner always the same, nor are always able to return [to 
the intelligible] in conjunction with divine souls. For 
that which only occasionally participates of intellect, can 
in no way whatsoever be always conjoined with the 
Gods. 79 

PROPOSITION CLXXX VI. 

Every soul is an incorporeal, essence and separable from the 
body, 
For if it knows itself, but every thing which knows 

79 Consult Plat. De Legg. X. p. 897; Protrepticus of lam- 
blichus, cap. 8; Cicero De Officiis III. 10. The last words of Plo- 
tinus, "great and uncommon, admirable and sublime," 
were: "and now the god within me is striving to return 
to the God of the universe." The following emphatic reminder 
by Epictetus, (Discourses II. 8.), that the soul is a divinity is ap 
posite: "But you are a superior nature; you are a portion sepa 
rated from the Deity; you have in yourself a certain portion of 
him. Why then are you ignorant of your own noble descent? 
Why do you not know whence you came? Will you not remember 
when you are eating, who you are who eat and whom you feed? 
. . . When you are in social intercourse, when you are exercising 
yourself, when you are engaged in discussion, know you not that 
you are nourishing a god, that you are exercising a god? 
Wretch! you are carrying about a god with you, and you 
know it not. Do you think that I mean some God of silver or 
of gold, and external? You carry him within yourself, and you 
perceive not that you are polluting him by impure thoughts and 
dirty deeds. And if an image of God were present, you would 
not dare to do any of the things v/hich you are doing: but 
when God himself is present within and sees all and hears all, 
you are not ashamed of thinking such things and doing such 
things, ignorant as you are of your own nature and subject to 
the anger of God." 



37 

itself returns to itself, and that which returns to itself is 
neither body, since every body is incapable of returning 
to itself, nor is inseparable from body, since that which 
is inseparable from body is not naturally adapted to 
revert to itself as it would thereby be separated from 
body, hence every soul is neither a corporeal essence, 
nor inseparable from body. But that the soul knows 
itself is evident. For if it knows the natures which 
are above itself, and is naturally able to know it 
self, much more will it know itself through the causes 
prior to itself. 80 

PROPOSITION CLXXXVIII. 

Every soul is indestructible ami incorruptible. 

For every thing which can in any way whatso 
ever be dissolved and destroyed is either corporeal and 
composite, or is allotted its hypostasis in a subject. And 
that indeed which is dissolved is corrupted because it 
consists of a multitude of divisible parts: and that of 
which it is the nature to exist in another vanishes into 
non-entity when separated from its subject. But the 
soul is incorporeal and external to every subject, sub 
sisting in itself, and returning to itself. Hence it is 
indestructible and incorruptible. 81 

80 For inferiors are comprehended in superiors, and particulars 
in universals; so that he who knows universals knows particulars 
also, though the reverse of this is not true. The soul therefore by 
possessing a natural capacity of knowing herself, and things superior 
to her own nature, will from the illuminations attending her 
knowledge of the latter know herself in a much more eminent 
and perspicuous manner. T. 

See Hermeias Commentary on the Phaedrus, p. 114 sq. 
ed. Couvreur. A translation of his Platonic Demonstration of 
the Immortality of the Soul may be read in my Opuscula Pla- 
tonica. This Commentary is a very valuable work, and is full of 
profound thought. 

81 See the Phaedo, p. 106; Hermeias in Phaedrum, p. 101 sq.; 
Proclus in Plat. Theol. I. p. 66 sq.; Nemesius De Natura Hominis, 
cap. II. et III. 



PROPOSITION CLXXXVIII. 
Every souL is both life and vital.. 

For that to which soul accedes necessarily lives, 
and that which is deprived of soul at once becomes des 
titute of life. Either therefore it lives through soul, or 
through something else, and not through soul. It is 
however impossible that it should live through some 
thing else alone. For every thing which is participated 
either imparts itself, or something of itself, to its partic 
ipant. But if it experiences neither of these, it will not 
be participated. Soul however is participated by that 
to which it is present, and that which participates of 
soul is said to be animated. If therefore that which is 
participated introduces life to animated natures it is 
either life, or vital alone, or both life and vital. If 
however soul is alone vital, but not likewise life, 
it will consist of life and non-life, and will not 
therefore know itself, nor return to itself. For 
knowledge is life, and the gnostic power so far as it 
is suck is vital? 1 If therefore there is any thing in 
soul without life, this will not possess essentially the 
power of knowing. But if soul is life alone it will no 
longer participate of the intellectual life. For the par 
ticipant of life is vital and is not life alone, i. e. the first 
and imparticipable life; but the life which is posterior 
to this is both vital and life. Soul however is not im 
participable life. And hence it is at the same time 
both life and vital. 83 

82 This truly divine sentence is derived from the most pro 
found theory, and can alone be understood by those who have 
deeply studied the six books of Proclus on Plato s Theology. T. 

83 Consult the Phaedo, cap. 26, and the Disputatio of Wyt- 
tenbach on Immortality, prefixed to his edition of the Phaedo; 
the Phaedrus, p. 246; Plotinus: En. I. 1. 4 sq.; Porphyrii Sententt. 
cap. XVI. XVIII.; Hermeias In Plat. Phaedr. p. 118 sq.; Astii Com. 
in Phaedr. p. 118, 293; Nemesius De Natura Hominis, p. 95 sqq. 



139 

PROPOSITION CLXXXIX. 
Every soul is self-vital. 

For if it is able to return to itself, but every thing 
which returns to itself is self-subsistent, the soul there 
fore is self-subsistent, and constitutes itself. But it is 
likewise life and vital, and its hyparxis is in vitality, 
For the soul imparts life by its very being to the na 
tures to which it is present. And if the participant is 
fit for participation it immediately becomes animated 
and vital; soul in effecting this not reasoning nor acting 
from deliberate choice, nor vivifying by cogitation and 
judgment, but by its very essence and by that which it 
is imparting life to the participant. Hence the being 
of soul is the same as to live. If therefore the soul pos 
sesses being from itself and this is the same as to live, 
and it has life essentially, it will impart life to itself, and 
will possess it from itself. But if this be admitted, soul 
will be self-vital. 

PROPOSITION CXC. 

Every soul is a medium, between impartible natures and the 
natures which are divisible about bodies. 

For if soul is self-vital and self-subsistent, and has 
an hyparxis separable from bodies, it is exempt from 
and more excellent than all the natures which are divis 
ible about body: for the corporeal natures are entirely 
inseparable from their subjects, because they are co-dis 
tributed with divisible bulks, depart from themselves, 
and their own impartibility, and are co-extended with 
bodies. And though they subsist in lives, these are 
not the lives of themselves but of participants: and 
though they exist in essence and in forms, yet they are 
not the forms of themselves but of those things which 
are constituted by forms. If therefore soul is none of 
these, it is a self-subsistent essence, a self-vital life, and 



a knowledge gnostic of itself. Hence, by reason of these 
characteristics, it is entirely separable from bodies, but 
is a participant of life; if this be so, it likewise partici 
pates of essence. But it likewise participates of 
knowledge through other causes. It is evident there 
fore that the soul is inferior to impartible natures, be 
cause it is filled with life externally: and if with life, it 
is plain that is likewise externally filled with essence. 
For prior to life and soul are imparticipable life 
and imparticipable essence. / That soul however is not 
primarily gnostic is evident: since every soul so far as 
it is soul is life, but not every soul so far as it is soul 
has knowledge. For a certain soul while it remains 
soul is ignorant of [real] beings. Soul therefore is 
not primarily gnostic, nor does it possess knowledge 
from its very being. Hence it has an essence secondary 
to those natures which are primarily and by their very 
being gnostic. ] And since the essence of soul is divided 
from its knowledge, soul does not belong to natures 
[entirely] impartible. But it has been demonstrated 
that neither does it rank among the natures which are 
divisible about bodies. Hence it is a medium between 
the two. 

PROPOSITION CXCI. 

Every partioipable soul has an eternal essence, but its action 
is temporal. 

For either it possesses each eternally, or each tem 
porally; or the one eternally, but the other temporally. 
It cannot however possess each eternally: for it would 
be an impartible essence, and the nature of soul would 
in no respect differ from an intellectual hypostasis, viz. 
a self-motive from an immovable nature. Nor can it 
possess each temporally: for thus it would be generated 
only, and would neither be self-vital, nor self-subsistent. 
For nothing which is essentially measured by time is 



self-subsistent: but soul is self-subsistent. For that 
which returns to itself through activity likewise essential 
ly returns to itself, and proceeds from itself. It follows 
therefore that every soul is partly eternal, and partly 
participates of time. Either therefore it is essentially 
eternal, but participates of time through its action, or 
vice versa. The latter however is impossible. Hence 
every participable soul is allotted an eternal essence, 
but a temporal action or activity. 

PROPOSITION CXCII. 

Every participable soul ranks among the number of truly 
existing beings, and is the first of generated natures. 

For if it is essentially eternal it is truly being 
through its hyparxis, and always is. For that which 
participates of eternity participates likewise of perpetual 
existence. But if it is in time according to action, it is 
generated. For every thing which participates of 
time, since it is always becoming to be, according to 
the prior and posterior of time, and is not at once 
that which it is, is wholly generated. But if every soul 
is in a certain respect generated through its action, it 
will be the first of generated natures. For that which 
is in every respect generated is more remote from eter 
nal natures. 

PROPOSITION CXCXIII. 
Every soul subsists proximately from intellect. 

For if it has an immutable and eternal essence, 
it proceeds from an immovable essence. For that 
which proceeds from a movable cause, is essentially 
changed in every respect. The cause therefore of 
every soul is immovable. But if it proximately sub 
sists from intellect, it is perfected by and returns to in 
tellect. And if it participates of the knowledge which 



142 

intellect imparts to the natures which are able to par 
take of it for all knowledge emanates from intellect 
to all natures in which it is, and all things have their 
progression essentially from that to which they 
naturally return if this be the case, every soul pro 
ceeds from intellect. 

PROPOSITION CXCIV. 

Every soul contains all the forms which intellect primarily 
possesses. 

For if soul proceeds from intellect, and intellect 
constitutes it; and if intellect subsisting immovably pro 
duces all things by its very being, it will likewise im 
part to soul which it constitutes the essential reasons or 
productive principles of all things which it contains. 
For every thing which produces by its very being im 
parts secondarily to the thing generated by it that 
which it is itself primarily. The soul therefore con 
tains secondarily the representations of intellectual 
forms. 84 

PROPOSITION CXCV. 

Every soul is all things, containing sensibles paradigmal- 
ically, but intelligibles iconically .&gt; 

For subsisting as a medium between impartible na 
tures and those which are divisible about body, it pro 
duces and constitutes the latter of these, but pre-estab 
lishes in itself the causes from which it proceeds. Those 

84 See Plato De Repub. VI. p. 500, X. p. 613; Legg. IV. p. 
716; Theaetetus, p. 176. 

85 Aristotle, (De Anima III. 8.), says; "Now, however, sum 
marily recapitulating what has been said about the soul, we re 
peat that the soul is in a certain respect all beings: for all beings 
are either objects of Sense or objects of Thought; and ktowledge 
and sense are in a certain way the same with their respective ob 
jects." Compare Porphyrii Sententt. cap. XVII. 



143 

things, therefore, of which it is the pre- existent cause 
it antecedently comprehends paradigmatically or in their 
pre-formed models. But it has by participation, and as 
the progeny of first natures, the causes of its subsist 
ence. Hence it antecedently comprehends according to 
cause all sensible natures, and contains the productive 
principles of material things immaterially, the principles 
of corporeal things incorporeally, and without interval 
the principles of things which are apart in space. But 
it contains intelligibles and the forms of them through 
images; so that it receives partibly the forms of those 
which are undivided, by multiplication the forms of 
those which are unical, and by self-motion the forms of 
things which are immovable. Hence the soul is all 
beings, containing those which are primary by partici 
pation, but paradigmatically those which are posterior 
to its own nature. 

PROPOSITION CXCVI. 

Every participable soul primarily uses a perpetual body, f 
which has an unbe gotten and incorruptible hypo stasis. B6 

For if every soul is essentially eternal, and by its 
very being primarily animates some particular body, it 
will always animate this body: for the essence of soul is 
immutable. But if this be the case, that which is ani 
mated by it is always animated, and always participates 
of the life of soul: and that which always lives by a much 
greater priority always exists. But that which always 
is, is perpetual. Hence that which is primarily attached 
to every soul is perpetual. But every participable soul 
is primarily participated by a certain body, since it is 
participable and not imparticipable, and animates its par 
ticipant by its very being. Every participated soul 
therefore uses a body which is primarily perpetual, and 

86 Consult Plotinus: En. II. 9.16 sq.; Proclus in Plat. Theol. 
II. 11. 



144 
essentially unbegotten and incorruptible. 

PROPOSITION CXCVII. 

Every soul is an essence vital and gnostic, and a life essen 
tial and gnostic, and is knowledge, essence, and life. All 
these, the essential, the vital, and the gnostic, subsist in it 
together; and all are in all, and each is apart from the 
others.^ 1 

For if it is the medium between impartible forms 
and those which are divided about bodies, it is neither 
so impartible as all intellectual natures, nor so partible 
as corporeal forms. Since, therefore, essences, lives 
and cognitions are divided in corporeal natures, these 
subsist in souls impartibly, unitedly, and incorporeally, 
and all of them exist together, through their immateri 
ality and impartiality. Since, likewise, in intellectual 
natures all things subsist in union, they are distinguish 
ed and divided in souls. All things, therefore, subsist 
together and at the same time apart in these. But if all 
impartibles subsist together and in one they pervade 
through each other, and if they are separate they are 
again divided without confusion; so that each subsists 
by itself, and all are in all. For in the essence of soul 
there are both life and knowledge; since every soul 
would not know itself, if the essence of it was of itself 
deprived of life and knowledge. And in the life of the 
soul there are both essence and knowledge: for life with 
out essence and without knowledge belongs to material 
lives, which are neither able to know themselves, nor 
are genuine essences: and knowledge which is unessen 
tial and without life does not of itself subsist. For all 
knowledge belongs to that which is vital, and which is 
of itself allotted an essence. 

87 Compare Porphyrii Sententt. cap. XVIII. et cap. XXXIX. 



145 

PROPOSITION CXCVIII. 

Every nature which participates of time, and is always 
moved, is measured bi/ circuits. 

For since it is measured by time, the motion of it 
likewise participates of the measure and bound of time, 
and proceeds according" to number: but because it is 
always moved, and this always is not eternal but tem 
poral, it is necessary that it should use circuits. For 
motion is a mutation from some things to others. But 
beings are bounded by multitudes and magnitudes. 
These however being finite, there can neither be a 
mutation to infinity according to a right line, nor can 
that which is always moved make its transitions 
finitely. Hence that which is always moved will pro 
ceed from the same to the same, and thus will proceed 
periodically. 

PROPOSITION CXCIX. 

Every mundane soul uses circuits of its proper life, and res 
titutions to its pristine state. 

For if it is measured by time, it acts transitively 
and has a peculiar motion. But every nature which is 
moved and participates of time, if it is perpetual uses 
circuits, periodically revolves, and proceeding from the 
same to the same is restored to its former state. And 
every mundane soul having motion, and energizing in 
time, will have circuits of motions, and restitutions to 
its pristine state. For every period of perpetual na 
tures is apo cat astatic or restorative to a former con 
dition. 88 



88 See Plotinus: En. VI. 9. 8.; Proclus in Plat. Theol. IV. 16. 
V. 10.; Olympiodorus in Plat. Alcibiadem Prior, p. 37, ed. Creuzer. 



PROPOSITION CC. 

Every circuit of soul is measured by time. The circuit of 
other souls is measured by a certain time, but the circuit 
of the first soul measured by time is measured by the 
whole of time. 89 

For if all motions have prior and posterior, so 
likewise have circuits, and on this account they partici 
pate of time. That also which measures all the cir 
cuits of souls is time. But indeed if there were the 
same circuits of all souls, and they were about the same 
things, the time of all would be the same. If, how 
ever, the restitutions of different souls are different, the 
periodic time likewise which is restorative to a pristine 
state is different in different souls. 

That the soul, therefore, which is primarily mea 
sured by time is measured by the whole of time, is 
evident. For if time is the measure of all motion, that 
which is primarily moved will participate of all time, 
and will be measured by the whole of time. For if 
the whole of time did not measure its first partici 
pant, it would not measure anything else, according to 
the whole of itself. That all other souls however are 
measured by certain measures which are more partial 
than the whole of time, is evident from what has been 
demonstrated. For if these souls are more partial than 
the soul which primarily participates of time, neither 
can they adapt their circuits to the whole of time. 
But the multitude of their restitutions will be parts of 
the one circuit and restitution through which the soul 
that primarily participates of time returns to its pristine 
state. For a more partial participation belongs to an 
inferior power, but a more total to a greater power. 
Other souls, therefore, are not naturally adapted to 

89 On the first soul see Aristotle: De Anima II. 4.: Plotinus: 
En. II. 9, 4.; Proclus in Plat. Theol. I. 12. 



receive the whole temporal measure in one life, because 
they are allotted an order inferior to that of the soul 
which is primarily measured by time. 

PROPOSITION CCI. 

All divine souls have triple energies: one as souls, another as 
receiving a divine intellect, and another as attached to 
the Gods. And they provide for the whole of things as 
Gods, but know all things through an intellectual life, 
and move bodies through a self -motive essence. 

For because they psychically participate of the na 
tures which are superior to them, and are not simply 
souls but divine souls, and have an order in the psych 
ical extent analogous to the Gods, they energize not 
only psychically but likewise divinely, being allotted a 
divine summit of their essence, and because they like 
wise have an intellectual hypostasis, through which 
they are placed under intellectual essences. Hence 
they not only energize divinely, but likewise intellectu 
ally: constituting one action according to the one which 
they contain, but the other according to intellect. A 
third action (activity) is present to them according 
to their own hyparxis, which is motive indeed of things 
naturally alter-motive, but is vivific of those which pos 
sess an adventitious life. For this is the characteristic 
work of every soul; but the activities which are intel 
lectual and providential they have through participation. 

PROPOSITION CCII. 

All souls attending upon and always following the Gods are 
inferior to divine, but are developed, above partial souls. 

For divine souls participate of intellect and deity, 
and hence are at the same time intellectual and divine, 
and the leaders of other souls, just as the Gods likewise 
are the leaders of all beings. But partial souls are de- 



148 

prived of an attachment to intellect, because they are 
not able to participate proximately of an intellectual es 
sence. Nor would they fall from intellectual energy, if 
they essentially participated of intellect, as has been 
demonstrated. Hence the souls which always follow 
the Gods are of a mediate condition: for though they 
receive a perfect intellect, and through this surpass par 
tial souls, yet they are not attached to the divine unities. 
For the intellect which they participate is not divine, 

PROPOSITION CCIII. 

Of every psychical multitude, divine souls are greater in 
power than, other souls, but less in number. But those 
which always follow divine souls have a,- mediate order 
among all souls, both in power end quantity. And par 
tial souls are inferior in power to the others, but proceed 
into a greater number. 

For divine souls are more allied to The One, on 
account of a divine hyparxis, but souls of a mediate 
rank through the participation of intellect, and those of 
the last order are essentially dissimilar to both those of 
the mediate and those of the first rank. Among per 
petual natures, however, those which are nearer to The 
One are more single in number, and more contracted 
in multitude, than those which are more remote from it. 
But those which are more remote from The One are more 
multiplied. The powers therefore of superior souls are 
greater, and have the same ratio to those of souls in the 
second rank which the divine has to the intellectual, and 
the intellectual to the psychical peculiarity. And the 
quantities of inferior souls likewise are more in number. 
For that which is more remote from The One is a 
greater multitude and that which is nearer to it is a less 
multitude. 



PROPOSITION CCTV. 

Every divine soul is a Leader of many souls which always 
follow the Gods, and of a still Breeder number of those 
which occasionally receive this order. 

For since it is divine it is necessary that it should 
be allotted an order which is the leader of all things, 
and which has a primary rank among souls. For in all 
beings that which is divine is the leader of wholes. It is 
likewise requisite that every divine soul should neither 
alone preside over the souls which perpetually follow the 
Gods, nor over those alone which are occasionally their 
attendants. For if any divine soul should alone pre 
side over those which occasionally follow the Gods, 
how can there be a contact between these and a divine 
soul, since they are entirely different from it, and 
neither proximately participate of intellect, and much 
less of the Gods? But if it only presides over those 
which always follow the Gods, how is it that the causal 
chain proceeds as far as to these [alone]? For thus in 
tellectual natures would be the last, and un prolific, and 
unadapted to perfect and elevate. It is necessary, there 
fore, that the souls which follow the Gods, and ener 
gize through intellect, and which are elevated to intel 
lects more partial than divine intellects, should primar 
ily depend on every divine soul: and that second to 
these it is necessary that there should be the partial 
souls, which through the divine souls as media are able 
to participate of intellect and a divine life. For through 
those which always participate of a superior condition 
those which only occasionally participate of it are per 
fected. And again it is necessary that about every di 
vine soul there should be more souls which only occa 
sionally follow the Gods than those which always attend 
on them. For the power of the monad always pro 
ceeds into multitude, through diminution; deficient in 



power, but redundant in number. And every soul like 
wise of those which always follow the Gods is the 
leader of a multitude of partial souls, imitating in this a 
divine soul; and elevates many souls to the primary 
monad of the whole causal chain. Every divine soul, 
therefore, is the leader of many souls which always fol 
low the Gods, but presides over a still greater number 
of those which only occasionally receive this order. 

PROPOSITION CCY. 

Every partial soul Juts the same ratio to the soul under w/tic/t 
it is essentially arranged, as the vehicle of t lie one has to 
the vehicle of the other. 

For if the distribution of vehicles to all souls is ac 
cording to nature, it is necessary that the vehicle of ev 
ery partial soul should have the same ratio to the ve 
hicle of the soul which ranks as a whole, as the essence 
of the one has to the essence of the other. The dis 
tribution, however, is according to nature. For the 
things which primarily participate are spontaneously 
conjoined with the natures which they participate. If, 
therefore, as a divine soul is to a divine body, so like 
wise is a partial soul to a partial body, each soul essen 
tially participating, therefore that which was first as 
serted is true, that the vehicles of souls have the same 1 
ratio to each other, as the souls themselves of which 
they are the vehicles/ 10 

90 See Porphyrii Sententt. VII. VIII.; Nemesius De Natura 
Hominis cap. III.; lamblichus in Stobaeus, Eclog. I. cap. 52. 
(These excerpts are from lamblichus lost book, UF/JI V?;^//?). On 
the oxwia or vehicle of the soul, consult Proclus Commentary on 
the Timaeus, p. 265 sq. Vol. III. ed. Diehl. On the Universal Soul 
and the particular soul, see Plotinus: En. IV. I., En. IV. 2. 2.; and 
the Timaeus, p. 34, which is the fount of all subsequent insights 
on the subject. 



15 r 

PROPOSITION CCVI. 



Every partial soul is able to descend infinitely into genera 
tion, and to reascend from generation, to real 



91 Genesis, v yF.vttii^. Generation; creation; nativity; rank; a per 
iod of time; philosophically used to denote the transition-sphere between 
the state of ov6ia or essence, from the nouinenal state to the phenomenal Into 
the world of nature The movement toward phenomenal existence; 
the fiF.TaXr}4&gt;i$ or sharing of dual life by a change in mode of 
being; a becoming as distinguished from real/// being; relative existence; 
the passing of the soul or spiritual essence from eternity into nature. 
On the ninth day of the Eleusinian Mysteries, the worship 
pers placed two vessels of wine, one at the East and the other 
at the West, and emptied them in turn, pronouncing the words 
vi F [son] and rouz [genitrix], as implying that man was the 
offspring of eternity, and nature his mother. The whole para 
phernalia and ceremonial of the Mysteries related to the coming 
of man into the natural world, and his effort to go hence. "1 
think we ought to define what that is which is ever-existent 
and has no genesis ; and that which is in a state of transition 
(ysi Ktiis) or becoming, but never really is. There are three 
distinct modes that preceded the establishing of this cosmical 
universe: being, space, and transition" (yevE&s). PLATO: Tiniaeiix, 
IX, XXVII. "Others of the heavenly faculties go forth from 
them into the nature-sphere of the universe, and into the cos 
mical universe itself, passing in due order through the sphere 
of transitionand therefrom pervading every part." IAMBLICHUS: 
Mysteries, I., XVIII. From yiyvo/i&lt;u,to become. 

This gradation, as here set forth, is sufficiently intelligible 
to the expert philosophical reader; but it should not be regarded 
as profaning or popularizing the subject unduly, to attempt an 
explanation for the convenience of the novitiate, who may not 
have well learned this mode of speaking and classification. The 
cosmical universe is here treated as being in two provinces or 
departments: nature or tpvtiis, the maternal or producing sphere, 
which includes all things in the visible universe, and genesis , 
which Mr. Taylor and the other writers render by the term 
genera t ion. The word, owing to its common meaning in the En 
glish language, becomes often an unnecessary cause of obscurity 
when appearing in philosophical discourses. The Greek word 
is from the verb to become; to exist as an objective en 
tity; to engender. Hence it means the sphere of transition 



152 

For if it at one time follows the Gods, but at an 
other falls from the striving upwards to the divine nature 
[and an abiding with it], and participates alike of intellect 
and the privation of intellect, it is evident that it is al 
ternatively conversant with generation and the Gods. 
For since it is not for an infinite time with the Gods, it 
will not for the whole of the succeeding" time be con- 

o 

versant with bodies. For that which has no temporal 
beginning will never have an end, and that which has 

or changing; and is here represented as deriving potencies 
from the astral and divine world and communicating them 
to the natural. This idea pervades the whole Platonic phi 
losophy. Thus we have the illustration of Plutarchus, that 
the three Fates, or Weird Sisters, supervise all: one, in the 
sun, giving the genetic principle; the second, in the moon, mingling 
it with the lower elements; and the third, in the earth, ordering 
the results. The divine essence is ?/ &lt;&gt;v6ia or that which is. Di 
vine essences, as the preceding discourse has shown, are there 
fore permanent, and of course aTraOst, impassible or unsusceptible 
of change. It may have been noticed that they are often mentioned 
in the neuter gender, as including both energy and potency in 
themselves undivided, like the old androgynous divinities of Myth 
ology. The genesis of the philosophers was the becoming object 
ive and individual; externalization, "becoming;" existence as dis 
tinguished from being or essence; transition from the unconditioned 
to the conditioned; from the Real or noumenal to the phenomenal; 
from the permanent to the variable: from the eternal to the 
temporal. The contrast between the two forms, existence or 
transition, and real being, is very distinctly exhibited in the re 
markable utterance of Jesus in the Gnostic Gospel according to John : 
"Before Abraham came into the transition-sphere, I was the ever- 
being." 

The ilwtii* (ji/uisis} or department of nature is the ulterior, the 
outgrowing; and receives the potencies of life from the world of 
causation through the intermediary sphere of transition. Some 
times the departments of transition and production, "nature" 
and "generation," appear to be treated as one the Cosmos, or uni 
verse. The lower orders which belong there are denominated 
jttpitiro? or partible, as being divided and apart from Real Being. 
Dr. Alexander Wilder: in his Platonic Technology, (published in 
The Platonist), and in notes to his translation of lamblichus. 



153 

no end is necessarily without a beginning". It follows, 
therefore, that every partial soul makes circuits of as 
cents from and of descents into generation, and that 
this must be unceasing through infinite time. Every 
partial soul, therefore, is able to descend and reascend 
infinitely. And this experience all souls must undergo. 92 

PROPOSITION CCVII. 

The vehicle of every partial soul is fabricated by an immov 
able cause. 

For if it is perpetually and connascently attached to 
the soul which uses it, and by cognation is immutable 
in essence, it is allotted its hypostasis from an immov 
able cause. For every thing which is generated from 
movable causes is essentially changed. Moreover, ev 
ery soul has a perpetual body, which primarily partici 
pates of it. Hence the cause of a partial soul, and 
therefore of its vehicle, is immovable, and on this ac 
count supermundane. 

PROPOSITION CCVIII. 

The vehicle of every parti ff I soul is immaterial, essentially 
indivisible, and impassive. 

For if it proceeds from an immovable fabrication, 

92 On the descent and reascent of souls from and to the In 
telligible World, see the Phaedrus, p. 248, and the Commentary of 
Hermeias; Prolegomena of Stallbaum to his edition (1820) of the 
Philebus, p. XXV sq.; Plotinus: En. IV. 8., (On the descent of the 
Soul into bodies); Nemesius De Natura Hominis, p. 45 sqq., p. 91 
sqq., p 111 sqq., ed. Matthaei. 

One of the greatest intellectual misfortunes which has be 
fallen mankind is the loss of Porphyry s work, On the return of 
the Soul (llEpi arodov rys Wvxvs), several quotations from which 
St. Augustine has preserved in his De Civitate Dei. Among the 
principal propositions maintained by Porphyry in this book was, 
"that we must fly from all body, in order that the soul may abide 
in felicity with the Deity." 



and is perpetual, it will have an immaterial and impas 
sive hypostasis. For the things which are naturally pas 
sive in essence are all mutable and material, and because 
they subsist differently at different times are attached to 
movable causes. Hence, likewise, they receive an all-vari 
ous mutation, since they are moved in conjunction with 
their principal causes. But that the vehicle of every 
partial soul is indivisible, is manifest. For every thing 
wnich is divided, so far as it is divided is corrupted, 
because it departs from the whole, and from its continuity. 
If, therefore, the vehicle is essentially immutable and 
impassive, it will be indivisible. 93 

PROPOSITION CCIX. 

The vehicle of every partial soul descends indeed with the ad 
dition of more material vestments, but becomes united to 
the soul by an ablation of every thing material, and a re 
currence to its proper form, analogous to the soul which, 
uses if. 94 

93 See Plotinus: En. III. 6. 1 sqq; Porphyrii Sententt. XIX. 

94 The phraseological fount of this is in the Gorgias, p. 523; 
"Now many, said he, whose souls are poor and wicked are clothed 
with fair bodies and nobility and wealth," etc. Proclus (Com. on 
the First Alcibiades, p. 138, ed. Creuzer): "And hence Plato calls 
the last vestment of souls the love of fame/ Athenaeus records 
(XL 116.), on the authority of Dioseorides, in his Memorabilia, 
that Plato said "the last vestment, the desire of fame, we put off 
in death itself." Athenaeus, who was a scurrilous ignoramus and 
calumniator, incredible as it may seen, quotes this to prove that 
Plato was very ambitious and vainglorious! Porphyry, in his 
treatise On Abstinence, a book which cannot be too highly praised, 
says (I. 31,): "We must therefore put off our many vestments, 
both this visible and corporeal garment and those with which we 
are internally clothed, which are proximate to our physical gar 
ments; and we must enter the course free and unclothed, striving 
for [the most glorious of all prizes] the Olympia of the soul." 

The descent of the soul into bodv separates it from more di- 



155 

For the soul indeed descends irrationally, assuming 
Irrational lives; but it ascends, laying aside all the gen 
eration-producing powers, with which it was invested 
in its descent, and becoming pure returns to the pris 
tine condition of its nature. For the vehicle imitates 
the lives of the souls which use it, and since they are 
every where moved it is moved in conjunction with 
them. By its circulations it likewise represents the in 
tellections of some souls, but the falling of others 
through their inclinations into generation, and the pur 
ifications of others through the circumcluctions which 
lead to an immaterial nature. For because it is vivified 
by the very essence of souls, and is connascent with 
them, it is ail-variously changed in conjunction with 
their energies; follows them every where, becomes co- 
passive with them, is restored to its pristine state to 
gether with them when they are purified, and is ele 
vated when they are elevated, and desires its own per 
fection. For every thing is perfected when it obtains 
its proper perfection. 

vine souls, from whom it was filled with thought and power and 
purity, and conjoins it to generation and nature and material 
things, from which it is filled with oblivion and wandering and 
ignorance. For in descending multiform lives and manifold vest 
ments grow upon or adhere to the soul from the universe, draw 
ing it down into a mortal composition, and darkening its vision of 
real being. It is requisite therefore that the soul which is about 
to be led rightly from hence to that ever-vigilant nature should 
amputate those secondary and tertiary powers which are attached 
to its essence, in the same manner as weeds, stones and shells are 
attached to the marine Glaucus; should restrain its impulses from 
externally proceeding, and recollect true beings and a divine es 
sence, from which it descended, and to which it is right that the 
whole of our life should hasten. Proclus: Commentary on the 
First Alcibiades, (p. 75, Vol. III. ed. Cousin.) 



56 

PROPOSITION CCX. 

Every connascent vehicle of the soul always has the same fig* 
ure and magnitude. But it appears to be greater and 
less and of a dissimilar figure through the additions and 
ablations of other bodies. 

For if it derives its essence from an immovable 
cause, it is evident that both its figure and its magni 
tude are defined by this cause, and each is immutable 
and invariable. But at different times it appears to be 
different, as likewise greater and less. Hence through 
other bodies, added from the material elements, and 
again taken away, it exhibits a different appearance 
both in quantity and form. 

PROPOSITION CCXI. 

Kvery partial soul descending into generation descends as a 
whole; nor does one part of it remain on high, and an-&gt; 
other part descend. 

For if part of the soul remains in the Intelligible 
World it will always think, either without transition, or 
by a transitive process. But if without transition it will 
be pure intellect and not a part of the soul, and the par 
tial soul will directly participate of intellect. This how 
ever is impossible. f But if it thinks by a transitive 
process, then out of that which always thinks and 
that which occasionally thinks one essence will be 
formed. This however is likewise impossible. For these al 
ways differ,as has been demonstrated. Moreover, it is ab 
surd to suppose that the highest part of the soul which 
is ever perfect does not rule over the other powers, and 
cause them to be perfect. Every partial soul, therefore, 
descends as a whole. 95 

fBecause only the Universal Soul participates directly of 
Intellect. 

95 Creuaer wrongly asserts that the Platonists did not agree 



157 

about the descent of the soul, and that one point on which 
they were at variance was, whether the soul descends as a whole or 
only a part of it. On all the fundamental principles of Platonic 
Thought the genuine successors of Plato are at one, though on 
many propositions, viewed from different standpoints, they may 
differ, for they were independent thinkers. On the question, as 
to whether the soul descends as a whole, or a part of it remains 
in the Intelligible World, the difference is only superficial. Da- 
mascius held that the whole soul descends, and yet he says (lie pi 
Apxcor,p. 254, Vol. II. ed. Ruelle): "Moreover, as the self-mov 
able (self-active) nature always uses its self-active power it 
changes, descending and ascending, It acts essentially, therefore, 

because the self-active nature moves and is moved essentially 

Further the eternal essence is absolutely immutable, nor does it at one 
time descend into generation, and at another ascend from genera 
tion: it is always on high. If so, its action will always be on high. 
So in a certain respect the notion of Plotinus that the whole 
soul does not descend is true, but he does not clearly express or 
develop this thought. For how is it possible that, one part of 
the soul remaining in the Intelligible World, another part would 
be in the ultimate evil? Hence the essence of the soul descends, 
becoming more partial instead of unical, and genesiurgic instead 
of essential." 

Damascius further informs us (p. 259) that, according to the 
great lamblichus, in his book On the Migration of the Soul from 
Body, "there is one genus of souls, the highest through partici 
pation, which descends into generation, but does not altogether 
(&lt;&gt;//&lt;) descend." 

There were also seasons, and these not unfrequent, during 
this period of my initiation, when I found myself in a condition of 
the real nature of which I seemed to find an explanation only 
when I came upon the writings of the foremost of all the great 
Neoplatonic school of mystics, Plotinus. This was a condition in 
which the enhancement of power, physical and mental, was so ex 
traordinary, as to make it seem that it was only necessary to will 
or to speak to work some great miracle, whether of healing or 
of destroying. It was not in the least as if one were pos 
sessed and filled by something other than one s proper self; 
but as if that self, instead of but partially animating the 
organism, had descended into it in plenitude, completely suf 
fusing it with the spirit, to the indefinite enhancement of every 
faculty, one effect of which was to suggest the idea that the spir 
itual part of man does not, as a rule, reside within the man, ex- 



1 5 8 

eept to a very limited extent, but hovers over him, descending- 
into him in varying measure according to circumstances." Life 
of Anna Kingsford by Edward Maitland, (p. 132, Vol. I.) Mait- 
land was one of the writers of The Perfect Way, the most mysti 
cal book of modern times, and a work of rare interest and value 
to all students of Occult Science. 

"But just as we have seen the supreme Nous resolving itself 
into a multitude of individual intelligences, so also does the 
Cosmic Soul produce many lesser or partial souls of which our own 
is one. Now these derivative souls cannot all be equal, for that 
would be to defeat the purpose of creation, which is to realize all 
the possibilities of creation from the highest to the lowest. Thus 
each has an office corresponding to her place in the scale of 
perfectiont 

f" Readers of Pope s Essay on Man will recognize this argument. It 
was, in fact, borrowed from Piotinus by Leibnitz, and handed on through 
Bolmgbroke to Pope. There is no better introduction to Neo-Platonism 
than this beautiful poem." 

Unquestionably there is much Piatonism in Pope s Essay, and the 
poem is worthy of study, but neither Bolmgbroke nor Pope had any 
comprehensive knowledge of the Philosophy of Plato, and had probably 
never even heard of Piotinus and the other Platonists, falsely called 
"Neo-Platonists." 

We may say of the human soul that she stoops to conquer. 
Her mission is to cope with the more recalcitrant forms of matter. 
It is to the struggle with their impurities that the troubles and 
passions of our life are due. By yielding to earthly temptations 
we suffer a second fall, and one much more real than the first; by 
overcoming them, as is perfectly in our power to do, we give scope 
and exercise to faculties which would otherwise have remained 
dormant and unknown. Moreover, our soul retains the privilege 
of returning to its former abode, enriched by the experience ac 
quired in this world, and with that clearer perception of good 
which the knowledge of its opposite alone can supply. Nay, par 
adoxical as the assertion may seem, she has not entirely descended 
to earth, but remains in partial communication with the noetic 
world by virtue of her reasoning faculty; that is to say, when its 
intuitions are not darkened and disturbed by the triumph of sen 
suous impressions over the lower soul/ Benn: The Greek Philos 
ophers, (Vol. II, PP 306-7. This passage is quoted as fairiy illus 
trative, but Mr, Benn s interpretation as a whole of the thought 
of Plotinus is glaringly misleading and notably erroneous. 



* 59 

.Additional JVotes and Elucidative 
Excerpts. 

i. 

P. 20. The truth of this may be exemplified in 
light. Thus for instance we may see many species of 
light; one kind emanating from the sun, another from 
fire and the stars, another from the moon, and another 
from the eyes of many animals. But this light though 
various is everywhere similar, and discovers in its oper 
ations a unity of nature. On account of its uniformity, 
therefore, it requires one principle and not different 
principles. But the sun is the only principle of all mun 
dane light: and though there are many participants of 
light posterior to the solar orb, yet they scatter their 
uniform light through one solar nature, property and 
power. But if we again seek for the principle of light 
in the sun, we cannot say that the solar orb is the prin 
ciple; for the various parts of it diffuse many illumina 
tions. There will therefore be many principles. But 
we now require one first principle of light. And if we 
say that the soul of the sun generates light, we must ob 
serve that this is not effected by her psychical multi 
plicity, or she would diffuse different lights. Hence we 
must assert that she generates visible by intellectual 
light. But again this production does not subsist through 
intellectual variety, but rather through the unity of in 
tellect which is its flower and summit. This unity is a 
symbol of that simple unity which is the principle of the 
universe. And to this principle the solar intellect is 
united by its unity, and through this it becomes a God. 
This divine unity of the sun therefore is the principle of 
the uniform light of the world, in the same manner as 
simple unity and goodness is the source of intelligible 
liVht to all intelligible natures. T. 



i6o 

II. 

P. 40. The truth of this reasoning may be evinced by 
the following considerations. Every thing which is 
measured by time, and such is every corporeal nature, 
depends on time for the perfection of i:s being. But 
time is composed of the past, present and future. 
And if we conceive that any one of these parts is 
taken away from the nature with which it is connected, 
that nature must immediately perish. Time therefore 
is so essentially and intimately united with the natures 
which it measures that their being such as it is depends 
on the existence of time. But time, as it is evident, is 
perpetually flowing, and this in the most rapid manner 
imagination can conceive. It is evident therefore that 
the natures to which it is essential must subsist in a 
manner equally transitory arid flowing; since, unless 
they flowed in conjunction with time, they would be 
separated from it, and would consequently perish. 
Hence as we cannot affirm with propriety of any part of 
time that it is since even before we can form the as 
sertion the present time is no more so, with respect to 
all corporeal natures, from their subsistence in time, 
before we can say they exist they lose all identity of 
being. 

Such then is the unreal condition of every thing ex 
isting in time, or of every thing corporeal and entangled 
with matter. But this shadowy essence of body is 
finely unfolded by Plotinus, in the 6th. book of his 3rd. 
Ennead, as follows: "Being properly so called is neither 
body, nor is subject to corporeal affections; but body 
and its properties belong to the region of non- entity. 
But you will ask, how is it possible that visible matter 
should possess no real being; that matter in which 
stones and mountains reside, the solid earth, and bodies, 
which mutually resist, since bodies, which impel 



each other, confess by their collision the reality 
of their existence? You will likewise ask, in what 
manner things which neither strike against nor re 
sist each other, which neither externally act nor in 
ternally suffer, nor are in any respect the objects of 
sight, viz. soul and intellect, are to be reckoned true 
and real beings? We reply, that on the contrary things 
more corpulent are more sluggish and inert, as is evi 
dent in bulky masses of earth. But whatever is less 
ponderous is more movable, and the more elevated the 
more movable. Hence fire, the most movable of all 
the elements, flies as it were from a corporeal nature. 
Moreover, as it appears to me, whatever is more suffi 
cient to itself disturbs others less and brings less incon 
venience; but such things as are more ponderous and 
terrene, unable from their defect of being to raise them 
selves on high, and becoming debile and languid, strike 
and oppress surrounding bodies by their falling ruin 
and sluggish weight. Since it is evident that bodies 
destitute of life fall with molestation on any proximate 
substance, and more vehemently impel and pain what 
ever is endued with sense. On the contrary animated 
beings, participating more of entity, by how much the 
more of being they possess by so much the more harm 
less they impinge their neighboring bodies. Hence 
motion, which is a kind of life or soul, or an imita 
tion of life in bodies, is more present to whatever is less 
corpulent; as if more of body was necessarily produced, 
where a defect of being happens in a greater degree. 
Again, it will more manifestly appear from passiv 
ity that whatever is more corpulent is more passive, 
earth in a greater degree than the other elements, and 
the rest in a similar proportion. For some things when 
divided suddenly return to their former union, when no 



162 

obstacle prevents their conjunction. But from the sec 
tion of a terrene body the divided portions always re 
main separate, as if destitute of natural vigor, and with 
out any inherent desire of union and consent. Hence 
they are ready by every trifling impulse to remain as 
they are impelled; to rush from the embraces of bound, 
and hasten into multitude and non-entity. So that 
whatever becomes corporeal in an eminent degree, as 
falling fast into non -entity, has but little power of re 
calling itself into one. And on this account ponderous 
and vehement concussions are attended with ruin, when 
by mutual rushing one thing impels another. But 
when debility runs against debility, the one is valid 
against the other, in the same manner as non-entity 
rushing on non-entity. And this we think a sufficient 
refutation of their opinion who only place being in the 
genus of body, persuaded by the testimony of impulses 
and concussions, and the phantasms perceived through 
the senses, which testify that sense is the only standard 
of truth. Such as these are affected in a manner simi- 
las to those in a dream, who imagine that the percep 
tions of sleep are true. For sense is alone the employ 
ment of the dormant soul; since as much of the soul as 
is merged in body so much of it sleeps. But a true ele 
vation and a true vigilance are a resurrection from and 
not with the dull mass of body. For a resurrection 
with body indeed is only a transmigration from sleep to 
sleep, and from dream to dream, like a man passing in 
the dark from bed to bed. But that elevation is per 
fectly true, which entirely rises from the dead weight 
of bodies, For these, possessing a nature repugnant 
to soul, possess something opposite to essence. And 
this is further evident from their generation, and their 
continual flowing and decay, which are properties en 
tirely foreign from the nature of being substantial and 
real." T. 



i6 3 

III. 

P. 84. To such as understand these Elements this 
argument for the existence of a multitude of Gods is per 
fectly demonstrative and clear. Indeed as every produc 
tion of nature possesses the power of generating its similar, 
it is much more necessary that the First Cause of all 
should generate a multitude the most similar to him 
self that can possibly be conceived. For every being 
produces that which is similar prior to the dissimilar; as 
indeed a contrary mode of proceeding would be absurd 
and impossible. The immediate or first productions 
therefore of the First God must be a multitude of 
Gods or otherwise his first progeny would not be per 
fectly similar to himself. Nor does this doctrine in 
any respect derogate from the dignity of the Supreme 
God, as the ignorant suppose, but on the contrary 
tends to exalt his majesty and evince the ineffable be 
neficence and perfection of his nature. For though it 
establishes a multitude of Gods, yet it teaches that they 
are dependent on the First, who is perfectly incompre 
hensible and without participation. So that it leads us 
to consider the subordinate Deities as so many lesser 
luminaries shining before the presence of the Sun of 
good, and encircling with awful grandeur his ineffable 
radiance and occult retreats. And that this doctrine 
fully displays his superlative goodness is sufficiently 
manifest, since by a contrary assertion we must ascribe 
imperfection to the fountain of excellence, and leave 
Deity impotent and barren. T. 

I rejoice in the opportunity which is afforded me 
of presenting the truly philosophic reader, in the pres 
ent work, with a treasure of Grecian theology; of a 
theology which was first mystically and symbolically 
promulgated by Orpheus, afterwards disseminated enig 
matically through images by Pythagoras, and in the 



164 

last place scientifically unfolded by Plato and his gen 
uine disciples. The peculiarity, indeed, of this theology 
is, that it is no less scientific than sublime; and that by 
a geometrical series of reasoning, originating from the 
most self-evident truths, it develops all the deified pro 
gressions from the Ineffable Principle of things, and ac 
curately exhibits to our view all the links of that golden 
chain of which Deity is the one extreme, and body the 
other. 

That, also, which is most admirable and laudable 
in this theology is, that it produces in the mind prop 
erly prepared for its reception the most pure, holy, ven 
erable, and exalted conceptions of the Great Cause of 
all. For it celebrates this immense Principle as some 
thing superior even to being itself; as exempt from the 
whole of things, of which it is nevertheless ineffably 
the source, and does not therefore think fit to connum- 
erate it with any triad, or order of beings. Indeed, it 
even apologizes for attempting to give an appropriate 
name to this Principle, which is in reality ineffable, and 
ascribes the attempt to the imbecility of human nature, 
which, striving intently to behold it, gives the appella 
tion of the most simple of its conceptions to that which 
is beyond all knowledge and all conception. Hence it- 
denominates it The One, and The Good; by the former 
of these names indicating its transcendent simplicity, 
and by the latter its subsistence as the object of desire 
to all beings. For all things desire good. At the 
same time, however, it asserts that these appellations 
are in reality nothing more than the parturitions of the 
soul, which, standing as it were in the vestibules of the 
adytum of Deity, announce nothing pertaining to the 
ineffable but only indicate her spontaneous tendencies 
towards it, and belong rather to the immediate offspring 
of the first God than to the First itself. Hence as the 
result of this most venerable conception of the Supreme, 



when it ventures not only to denominate the ineffable 
but also to assert something of its relation to other 
things, it considers this as pre-eminently its peculiarity, 
that it is the Principle of Principles; it being necessary 
that the characteristic property of principle, after the 
same manner as other things, should not begin from 
multitude, but should be collected into one monad as a 
summit, and which is the Principle of all principles. Con 
formably to this Proclus, in the second book of this 
work, says, with matchless magnificence of diction, 
"Let us as it were celebrate the First God, not as es 
tablishing the earth and the heavens, nor as giving sub 
sistence to souls, and the generations of all animals; for 
he produced these indeed but among the last of things; 
but prior to these let us celebrate him as unfolding into 
light the whole intelligible and intellectual genera of 
Gods, together with all the supermundane and mundane 
divinities as the God of all Gods, the unity of all uni 
ties, and beyond the first adyta as more ineffable than 
all silence, and more unknown than all essence, as holy 
among the holies, and concealed in the intelligible 
Gods." 

The scientific reasoning from which this dogma is 
deduced is the following: As the Principle of all things 
is The One, it is necessary that the progression of be 
ings should be continued, and that no vacuum should 
intervene either in incorporeal or corporeal natures. It 
is also necessary that every thing which has a natural 
progression should proceed through similitude. In 
consequence of this it is likewise necessary that every 
producing principle should generate a number of the 
same order with itself, viz. Nature, a natural number; 
Soul, one that is psychical; and Intellect, an intellect 
ual number. For if whatever possesses a power of 
generating generates similars prior to dissimilars, every 
cause must deliver its own form and characteristic pe- 



1 66 

culiarity to its progeny; and before it generates that 
which gives subsistence to progressions far distant and 
separate from its nature, it must constitute things prox 
imate to itself according to essence, and conjoined with 
it through similitude. It is therefore necessary from 
these premises, since there is one unity the Principle of 
the universe, that this unity should produce from itself 
prior to every thing else a multitude of natures charac 
terized by unity, and a number the most of all things 
allied to its cause; and these natures are no other than 
the Gods. 

According to this theology, therefore, from the im 
mense Principle of Principles, in which all things caus 
ally subsist, absorbed in superessential light, and in 
volved in unfathomable depths, a beauteous progeny of 
principles proceeds, all largely partaking of the Ineffable, 
all stamped with the occult characters of Deity, all pos 
sessing an overflowing fullness of good. From these 
dazzling summits, these ineffable blossoms, these divine 
propagations, Being, Life, Intellect, Soul, Nature and 
Body depend; Monads suspended from Unities, deified 
natures proceeding from Deities. Each of these 
Monads, too, is the leader of a series which extends 
from itself to the last of things, and which while it pro 
ceeds from at the same time abides in and returns to its 
leader. And all these principles and all their progeny 
are finally centered and rooted by their summits in the 
First, great, all-comprehending One. Thus all beings 
proceed from and are comprehended in the First Being; 
all intellects emanate from one First Intellect; all souls 
from one First Soul; all natures blossom from one First 
Nature; and all bodies proceed from the vital and 
luminous Body of the world. And, lastly, all these 
great monads are comprehended in the First One, from 
which both they and all their depending series are un- 



i6 7 

folded into light. Hence this First One is truly the 
Unity of unities, the Monad of monads, the Principle 
of principles, the God of Gods, one and all things, and 
yet one prior to all. 

No objections of any weight, no arguments but 
such as are sophistical, can be urged against this most 
sublime theory, which is so congenial to the unper- 
verted conceptions of the human mind that it can only 
be treated with ridicule and contempt in degraded, bar 
ren, and barbarous ages. Ignorance and priestcraft, 
however, have hitherto conspired to defame those ines 
timable works, 1 in which this and many other grand 
and important dogmas can alone be found; and the 
theology of the Greeks has been attacked with all the 
insane fury of ecclesiastical zeal, and all the imbecile 
flashes of mistaken wit, by men whose conceptions on 
the subject, like those of a man between sleeping and 
waking, have been t2irbid and wild, phantastic and con 
fused, preposterous and vain. 

Indeed, that after the great incomprehensible 
Cause of all a divine multitude subsists, co operating 
with this Cause in the production and government of 
the universe, has always been and is still admitted by 
all nations and all religions, however much they may 
differ in their opinions respecting the nature of the sub 
ordinate deities, and the veneration which is to be paid 
to them by man; and however barbarous the concep 
tions of some nations on this subject may be when com 
pared with those of others. T. 

P. 85. That the Principle of all things is some 
thing beyond Intellect and Being itself was asserted by 
the most ancient Pythagoreans, as well as by Plato and 

1 Viz. the present and other works of Proclus, together with 
those of Plotinus, Porphyry, lamblichus, Syrianus, Ammonius, 
Damascius, Olympiodorus, and Simplicius, 



i68 

his best disciples, as the following citations will 
abundantly evince. 

And in the first place this is evident from a frag 
ment of Archytas, a most ancient Pythagorean, On the 
Principles of things, preserved by Stobaeus, Eclog. 
Phys., l in which the following extraordinary passage 
occurs: coo~r avayna rpeiS ei/u8v raS ap^a*. ray re 
8GTGO TG)V TrpayjuaTcoy nai rav juoppcd nai TO e% avTco 
Hivannov nai TtpaTov ra dvvajui. TO 6s TOIOVTOV ov 
yoov juovoy ZIJJIEV dei, ah\a nai yoco TI npsGGoy. yoooSe 
npe(J(Joy evTi, oTrep oyojua^ojuey Oeov, cpavepov. i. ^ 
"So that it is necessary that there be three principles, 
viz. that which is the substance of things (or matter^, 
form, and that which is of itself motive, and primal in 
power. With respect to the last of which it is not only 
necessary that it should be intellect, but something bet 
ter than intellect. But that which is better than intel 
lect is evidently the same with that which we denomi 
nate God." It must here however be observed that by 
the word god we are not only to understand the first 
cause but every god: for, according to the Pythagoric 
theology every deity, considered according to the char 
acteristic of his nature, is superior to intellectual es 
sence. Agreeably to the above passage is that also of 
Brotinus, as cited by Syrianus in Arist. Metaphys., 2 who 
expressly asserts that the first cause vov TravToS nai 
ovffias Svvajusi nai 7tpeG/3eia vTtepsxei "surpasses 
every intellect and essence both in power and dignity." 
Again, according to the same Syrianus, p. 168 (ed. 
Kroll), we are informed "that the Pythagoreans called 

X P, 280 Vol. I. ed, Wachsmuth, 

Taylor used an imperfect text. I have given the original of 
the passage as it appears in the latest and best edition, and cor 
rected his translation accordingly, 

a P. 166 ed t Kroll, Berol, 1902. 



God the one, as the cause of union to the universe, and 
on account of his superiority to every being, to all life, 
and to all-perfect intellect. But they denominated him 
the measure of all things, on account of his conferring 
on all things through illumination essence and bound; 
and containing and bounding all things by the ineffable 
supereminence of his nature, which is extended beyond 
every bound." And, again, this is confirmed by Clinius 
the Pythagorean, as cited by Syrianus, p. 168 (ed. 
Kroll): "That which is the one and the measure of all 
things is not only entirely exempt from bodies and 
mundane concerns, but likewise from intelligibles them 
selves, since he is the venerable principle of beings, the 
measure of intelligibles, ingenerable, eternal, and alone 
(ywoKor), possessing absolute dominion (nvpiGode^, and 
himself manifesting himself (oe.vro savro dr/Aovr)." This 
fine passage I have translated agreeably to the manu 
script corrections of the learned Gale, the original of 
which he has not inserted. To this we may likewise 
acid the testimony of Philolaus who, as Syrianus informs 
us, p. 1 66, knew that cause which is superior to the two 
first elements of things, bound and infinite. For, says 
he, "Philolaus asserts that the deity established bound 
and infinite: by bound indeed exhibiting every co-ordi 
nation, which is more allied to the one\ but by infinity a 
nature subjected to bound. And prior to these two 
principles he places one, and a singular cause, separated 
from the universality of things, which Archainetus de 
nominates a cause prior to cause; but which, according 
to Philolaus, is the principle of all things." To all these 
respectable authorities for the superessential nature of 
the first cause, we may add the testimony of Sextus 
Empiricus himself. For in his books against the Math 
ematicians (p. 425) he informs us "that the Pythago 
reans placed the one as transcending the genus of 
things which are essentially understood." In which 



7/0 

passage by things which are essentially understood 
nothing more is meant than intelligible essences, as is 
obvious to every tyro in the Pythagoric philosophy. 

But in consequence of this doctrine of the ancients 
concerning The One or the first principle of things, we 
may discover the meaning and propriety of those ap 
pellations given by the Pythagoreans to unity, accord 
ing to Photius and others: such as aAajuTria, GuoToodia, 
aju?;ia, fiapaQpov VTtoxOoviov, ATTO\XGDV, etc., viz. ob 
scurity or without illumination, darkness, without mix 
ture, a subterranean profundity, Apollo etc. For, con 
sidered as ineffable, incomprehensible, and superes- 
sential, he may be very properly called obscurity, dark 
ness, and a subterranean profundity : but, considered as 
perfectly simple and one, he may with no less propriety 
be denominated without mixture and Apollo\ since 
Apollo signifies a privation of multitude. "For (says 
Plotinus) the Pythagoreans denominated the first God 
Apollo, according to a more secret signification, imply 
ing a negation of many." (Ennead. 5, lib. 5). To 
which we may add, that the epithets darkness and ob 
scurity wonderfully agree with the appellation of a 
thrice unknown darkness, employed by the Egyptians, 
according to Damascius, in their most mystical invo 
cations of the first God; and at the same time afford 
a sufficient reason for the remarkable silence of the 
most ancient philosophers and poets concerning this 
highest and ineffable cause. 

This silence is indeed remarkably obvious in 
Hesiod, when in his Theogony he says: 

it-v 7TpK)TiC&gt;Ta Xao? 



That is, Chaos was the first thing which was gene 
rated" and consequently there must be some cause 
prior to Chaos, through which it was produced; for 
there can be no effect witnout a cause. Such, how- 



ever, is the ignorance of the moderns, that in all the 
editions of Hesiod ye-vsro is translated fuit, as if the 
poet had said that Chaos ivas the first of all things , and 
he is even accused by Cud worth on his account as lean 
ing to the atheistical system. But the following- testimonies 
clearly prove, that in the opinion of all antiquity ysvsro 
was considered as meaning zt as generated, and not was 
simply. And in the first place, this is clearly asserted 
by Aristotle in lib. 3, De Coelo. 3 "There are certain 
persons who assert that there is nothing unbegotten, but 
that all things are generated. . .and this is especially the 
case with the followers of Hesiod." And again, by 
Sextus Empiricus in his treatise Adversus Mathemat. p. 
383, edit. Steph. who relates that this very passage 
was the occasion of Epicurus applying himself to phi 
losophy. For (says he) when Epicurus was yet but a 
young man, he asked a grammarian, who was reading 
to him this line of Hesiod, "Chaos of all thing s was 

o 

the first produc d," from what Chaos was generated, if 
it was the first thing generated. And upon the gram 
marian replying that it was not his business to teach 
things of this kind, but was the province of those who 
are called philosophers. To those, then, says Epi 
curus, must I betake myself, since they know the truth 
of things." 

Simplicius, too, in commenting on the passage 
above cited from Aristotle, beautifully observes as fol 
lows: "Aristotle ranks Hesiod among the first physiolo 
gists, because he sings Chaos was first generated. He 
says, therefore, that Hesiod in a particular manner 
makes all things to be generated, because that which 
is first is by him said to be generated. But it is prob 
able that Aristotle calls Orpheus and Musaeus the first 
physiologists, who assert that all things are generated, 

3. P. 288, Oxford Edition. 



172 

except the first. It is, however, evident that those the- 
ologists, singing in fabulous strains, meant nothing 
more by generation than the procession of things from 
their causes; on which account all of them consider 
the First Cause as unbegotten. For Hesiod also, when 
he says that Chaos was first generated, insinuates that 
there was something prior to Chaos, from which 
Chaos was produced. For it is always necessary that 
every thing which is generated should be generated 
from something. But this likewise is insinuated by 
Hesiod, that the first cause is above all knowledge and 
every appellation." 

Though the First Cause or The One itself con 
fers on every thing a proper symbol of his ineffable 
nature, yet this occult unity or impression is not di 
vine in things subject to generation and decay but in 
true essences alone, in the number of which rational 
souls must be ranked. Such of these however as are 
of a partial nature, and on this account are not the im 
mediate progeny of the First One, do not contain a 
unity which can be called a god, because they are con 
nected with motion, and are in a certain respect com 
posite essences. But where there is a most true es 
sence, as in separate intellects and celestial souls, the 
unity of each is a god. And indeed on account of 
these unities, which are as it were expressive characters 
of the First Unity, the essences of the Gods contain all 
things and extend their providential care to every part 
of the universe, with unbounded beneficence and im 
maculate power. But these divine unities are per 
petually united to the First One, like rays to light, and 
lines to a center. They likewise subsist in the most 
perfect union with each other. For since union in other 
natures is effected through the power of unity, these di 
vine unities must be much more closely united through 

4 (Com. De Coelo, p. 251, ed. Karsten.) 



73 

their subsisting much nearer to the First and most perfect 
One. Every divine unity, therefore, though it is neither 
essence nor obnoxious to essential multitude, yet abides 
in essence, or is rather the summit and as it were blos 
som of essence. And as every thing is established in its 
proper species through form, and as we derive our being 
through soul, so every god is a deity from the secret 
unity which he contains. Hence these divine unities 
subsist in the Intelligible World and in the essences of 
the Gods like so many splendid lamps in diaphanous 
spheres, mingling their rays with an ineffable union, en 
ergy and consent. And situated in most admirable 
order in the vestibule of The Good they occultly sig 
nify divine silence and solitary beauty, and perspicu 
ously announce to posterior natures the awful sanc 
tuary of their incomprehensible Cause. T. 

IV. 

P. 137. Plotinus, (En. IV. 7. 8.), says: "But that 
thought is not possible, if the soul is a body in any re 
spect or of any kind, may be demonstrated as follows. 
For if sensation is the soul s perceiving sensible objects 
by the aid or use of the body, thought cannot be appre 
hension through the aid of the body, since in that case 
thought and sensation would be the same. Hence if 
thought is apprehension without the body, much more 
is it necessary that the thinking nature should not be 
body. Further, if sensation is the perception of sen 
sible objects, thought is the perception of intelligible 
objects. If they are not willing to admit this, they 
must at least concede that we have thoughts of certain 
intelligible objects, and apprehensions of things without 
magnitude (extension). How, therefore, will the soul, 
if it is a magnitude, think that which is not magnitude, 
and by its divisible nature think the indivisible? Will it 
think it by a certain indivisible part of itself? But if 



this be so, that which thinks will not be a body. For 
in this case there will be no need of the whole for the 
contact of thought with its object, since contact by one 
part will be sufficient. If therefore they admit, which 
is true, that the primary thoughts are of those things 
which are entirely free from the body, that is, of abso 
lutes, it is necessary that the nature which thinks, only 
as being or becoming free from the body, can know 
them. But if they say that thoughts are of forms inherent 
in matter, yet these are only apprehended by abstract 
ing them from bodies, and this is the work of intellect. 
For the abstraction, for instance, of a circle, a triangle, 
a line, and a point, is not effected in conjunction with 
flesh, or matter at all. Hence it is requisite that the 
soul, in a work of this kind, should abstract herself 
from the body. And it follows therefore that she her 
self cannot be body. I think, likewise, that beauty and 
justice are without magnitude, and hence the thought of 
these is similarly without magnitude. Wherefore, when 
these approach the soul, she will apprehend them by 
the indivisible part of herself, and, indivisible them 
selves, they will abide in her indivisible self. How, 
moreover, if the soul is body, can temperance, justice, 
fortitude, and other virtues, which preserve it so far as 
they are received by it, belong to it?" 

Plotinus refutation of the materialists in this book, 
On the Immortality of the Soul, is final. He strikes 
out the foundation of every materialistic argument. 
The whole book will richly repay a thorough study. 
Taylor s translation of it appears in his Select Works of 
Plotinus, (London, 1817), which was reprinted in Bonn s 
Philosophical Library, in 1895. Copious extracts from 
it, admirably translated by Prof. B. A. G. Fuller, one 
of the rare students of Plotinus in this country, are 
published in Dr. Bakewell s excellent Source Book in 
Ancient Philosophy, (New York, 1907). 



V. 

On the Way and Means Whereby the Slscent of 
the Soul is Effected. 

Alcibiades. But perhaps I did not answer rightly when I de 
clared that I had myself discovered that knowledge. 

Socrates. How, then, did you obtain it? 

Alcib. I learned it, I think, like others. 

Soc. We come again to the same reason. From whom did 
you learn it? 

Alcib. The multitude." First Alcibiades, p. 315. 
Intellectual Discipline (MaOijGis} has a two- fold 
nature: at one time proceeding from superior to infer 
ior causes according to which the Demiurgus, in the 
Timaeus, says to the subordinate deities, "learn now 
what, revealing my will, I declare to you"- at another 
issuing from a cause externally moving according to 
which we are accustomed to designate certain persons 
as instructors. Between these two progressions of Dis 
cipline (mathesis) is arranged Discovery (Evpsffi?), for 
it is inferior to the psychical knowledge imparted by 
the divinities, and more perfect than reminiscence, 
which is external, and derived from other things. Con 
cerning the superior progresion of Mathesis, Alcibiades 
had no notion, except so far as he looked to the science 
which is essentially existent. in us, which was given by 
the Gods, and according to which he thought that he 
accurately knew the Just. Coming to Discovery, 
which is a medium, and is in the soul, likewise a medium, 
and it having been demonstrated that he had neither 
investigated nor knew the time of the beginning of his 
ignorance, which knowledge it is necessary should 
preexist investigation, he now returns to the second 
progression of Mathesis; and, doubting as to who is 
a truly scientific instructor of just things, flies to the 
multitude and the unstable life of the many, and con 
siders this as the leader of the knowledge of just 
things. 



i 7 6 

Here therefore Socrates, like a certain Heracles 
exterminating heads of the Hydra, demonstrates that 
every multitude is unworthy of belief respecting the 
knowledge of things just and unjust. This discourse 
apparently seems to contribute but little to the purifi 
cation of the young man; but if one accurately con 
siders it, he will find that it is directed to the same end. 
Primarily, Alcibiades being ambitious, drew his opinion 
from the multitude, and about it was filled with aston 
ishment. Socrates therefore shows him (i) that the 
opinion of the multitude has no authority in the judg 
ment and knowledge of things, and that he whose 
view is directed to the beautiful ouefht not to adhere 

o 

to it; (2) that the multitude is the cause of false opin 
ions, producing in us from our youth depraved imagi 
nations and various passions. Scientific reasoning, 
therefore, is necessary in order to give a right direc- 
tion to that part of us which is perverted by an as 
sociation with the multitude, to apply a remedy to our 
passive part, and to purify that which is filled with im 
purity; for thus we shall become adapted to a recovery 
of science. (3) Socrates shows that there is in each of 
us, as he says, a many -headed wild beast, which is anal 
ogous to the multitude: for this is what the people is in 
a city, viz., the various and material form of the soul, 
which is our lowest part. The present reasoning, 
therefore, exhorts us to depart from boundless desire, 
and to lay aside the multitude of life, and our inward 
people, as not being a judge worthy of belief respecting 
the nature of things, nor a recipient of any whole 
science; for nothing irrational is naturally adapted to par 
take of science, since the inferior part of irrational 
things, which likewise has multitude in itself, is conten 
tious, and at war with itself. (4) We therefore say that 
the present reasoning does not think right to admit into 
a wise and intellectual life an apostacy and flight from 



the one, together with diversity and all- various divi 
sion; but indicates that all these should be rejected as 
foreign from intellect and divine union. For it is 
requisite to fly from not only external multitude but 
likewise from that which is in the soul, nor this 
alone, but likewise to abandon multitude of every kind. 
Beginning therefore from beneath, we must shun 
the "multitude of men going along in a herd," as the 
Oracle says, and must neither participate of their lives 
nor of their opinions. We must fly from the manifold 
desires which divide us about body, and which impel us 
to pursue first one external object and then another at 
one time irrational pleasures, and at another indefinite 
and conflicting actions: for these fill us with penitence 
and evils. We must likewise fly from the senses 
which are nourished with us, and which deceive our di- 
anoetic part: for they are multiform at different times, 
are conversant with different sensibles, and assert 
nothing sane, nothing accurate, as Socrates himself says. 
We must likewise shun imaginations, because they are 
figured and divisible, and thus introduce infinite variety, 
and do not suffer us to return to that which is impart 
ible and immaterial; but, when we are hastening to ap 
prehend an essence of this kind, draw us clown to pas 
sive (sensuous) intelligence. We must likewise avoid 
opinions, for these are various and infinite, tend to that 
which is external, are mingled with phantasy and sense, 
and are not free from contrariety ; since our opinions 
likewise contend with each other in the same manner 
as imaginations with imaginations, and one sense with 

o ^ 

another. But, flying from all these divisible and va 
rious forms of life, we should run back to science, and 
there collect in union the multitude of theorems, and 
comprehend all the sciences in one harmonious bond. 
For there is "neither sedition nor contrariety of the 
sciences with each other; but those which are secondary 



i 7 8 

are subservient to those that are prior, and derive from 
them their proper principles. At the same time it is 
requisite here for us to proceed from many sciences to 
one science which is unhypothetical and the first 1 
and to extend to this all the others. But after science, 
and the exercise pertaining to it, we must abandon com 
positions, divisions, and multiform transitions, and 
transfer the soul to an intellectual life, and simple intui 
tions. 2 For science is not the summit of knowledge, but 
prior to this is intellect. I do not merely mean that in 
tellect which is exempt from soul, but an illumination A 
from thence which is infused into the soul, and concern 
ing which Aristotle says, that it is intellect by which 
we know terms," 4 and Timaeus that "it is ingenerated 
in nothing else than soul." 

Ascending therefore to this intellect, we must con 
template together with it an intelligible essence; with 
simple and indivisible intuitions surveying the simple, 
accurate, and indivisible genera of beings. But, after 
much-honored intellect, it is necessary to excite the 
supreme hyparxis or summit of the soul, according to 
which we are one, and under which the multitude we 
contain is united. For as by our intellect we partici 
pate the divine intellect, so by our unity and as it were 
the flower of our essence we may participate the First 

1 By this first of sciences is meant the Dialectic of Plato. 

2 Intellectual vision is intuitive; and hence intellect, by an 
immediate projection of its visive power, apprehends the objects 
of its knowledge. Hence, too, the visive energies of intellect are 

called by the Platonists voe.pm f.nifto\m, /. ?., intellectual intuitions. 
Y 

3 This illumination is the summit of the dianoetic part. T, 

4 /. e., simple, indemonstrable propositions. T, 



79 

One, the source of union to all things. And by our 
one we are especially united to the Divine Nature. For 
the similar is everywhere to be comprehended by the 
similar, objects of science by science, intelligibles by 
intellect, and the most unical measures of beings by 
the one of the soul, which is the very summit of our 
energies. According to this we become divine, flying 
from all multitude, verging to our own union, becom 
ing one, and energizing uniformly. And Socrates, 
previously preparing this felicitous life for us, exhorts 
us not to proceed in any respect to external multitude. 
Moreover, we must abandon coordinate (internal) 
multitude, so that we may thereby reach the flower and 
hyparxis of our intellect. And thus proceeding accord 
ing to the gradations of knowledge, you may see the 
correctness of the Socratic exhortation. But if you 
desire to likewise consider the admonition according to 
the objects of knowledge, fly from all sensible things: 
for they are divulsed from each other, are divisible, and 
perfectly mutable, and therefore, elude an accurate ap 
prehension. From these, therefore transfer yourself to an 
incorporeal essence, for every sensible nature has an 
adventitious union, and is essentially dissipated, and full 
of infinity. Hence likewise its good is divisible and 
adventitious, is distant from itself and discordant, and 
its hypostasis has a foreign basis. Having therefore 
ascended thither, and being established among incor- 
poreals, you will behold the psychical order above 
bodies, self-motive and self -energetic, and having its 
hypostasis in and for itself, but at the same time multi 
plied, and anticipating in itself a certain representation 
of an essence divisible about bodies. There likewise 
you will see an all-various multitude of habitudes of 
reason, analogies, bonds, wholes, parts, physical circles, 
a variety of powers, and a perfection neither eternal 
nor at once wholly stable, but evolved according to 



i8o 

time, and subsisting in discursive energies for such is 
the nature of soul. After the multitude in souls elevate 
yourself to intellect, and the intellectual dominions, in 
order that you may apprehend the union of things, and 
become a spectator of the nature of intellect. There 
behold an essence abiding in eternity, a fervid life and 
sleepless intellection, to which nothing of life is wanting, 
and which does not need the periods of time for its 
perfction. When you have surveyed these, and like 
wise seen how much superior they are to souls, in 
vestigate whether there is any multitude in these na 
tures; and if intellect, since it is one is likewise the 
whole, and since it is uniform is likewise multiform. 
For it thus subsists. Having, therefore, learned this, 
and beheld intellectual multitude, indivisible and 
united proceed to another principle, and prior to in 
tellectual essences survey the unities of intellects, and 
an union exempt from wholes. Here abiding relinquish 
all multitude, and you will arrive at the fountain of 
Good. You see then that the present reasoning, in ex 
horting us to fly from the multitude, affords us no small 
assistance in our ascent; and you further see how it 
contributes to the perfect salvation l of the soul, if we 
direct our attention to the multitude which pervades 
through all things. The most beautiful beginning, 
therefore, of our perfection is the separation of our 
selves from external multitude, and from the multitude 
in the desires of the soul, and in the indefinite motions 
of opinions. 

Hence likewise it is evident that souls do not 
collect their knowledge from sensibles, nor from things 
partial and divisible discover the whole and the one, but 
call forth discipline (juaQrjGz?) from their own nature, 



1 The term salvation is not peculiar to the Christian religion, 
since long before its establishment the Heathens had their savior 
Gotis.T. 



and correct the imperfection of phenomena. For it is 
not right to think that things which have in no respect 
a real subsistence should be the primary causes of 
knowledge in the soul; that things which oppose each 
other, which require the reasonings of the soul, and are 
ambiguous, should precede science, which has a same 
ness of subsistence; that things which are variously 
mutable should be generative of reasons which are es- 

o 

tablished in unity; and that things indefinite should be 
the causes of definite intelligence. It is not right, 
therefore, that the truth of things eternal should be 
received from the many, nor the judgment of universals 
from sensibles, nor a decision respecting what is good 
from irrational natures; but is requisite that the soul 
entering within herself should there seek for the true 
and the good, and the eternal reasons of things. For 
the essence of soul is full of these, but fhey are con 
cealed in the oblivion produced by generation. 1 Hence 
the soul in searching for truth looks to externals, though 
she herself essentially contains it and, deserting her own 
nature, explores the good in things foreign to its nature. 
Thence, therefore, is produced the beginning of self- 
knowledge. For if we look to the multitude of men 
we shall never see the one form of them, because it is 
overshadowed by the multitude, division, discord, and 
all -various mutation of its participants; if, however, we 
convert ourselves to our own essence we shall there 
survey without trouble the one reason and nature of 
men. Very properly, therefore, does Socrates separate 
far from a survey of the multitude the soul which is 
about to know what man truly is, and previous to a 
speculation of this kind purifies the soul from impeding 
opinions. For multitude is an impediment to a con- 

1 Generation signifies, according to Plato and his best disciples, 
the whole of a sensible nature. T. 



version of the soul to herself, and to a knowledge of 
the one form of things. Hence in material things va 
riety obscures unit) , difference sameness, and dissimili 
tude similitude; since forms here do not subsist without 
confusion, nor are the more excellent un mingled with 
the baser natures. Proclus: Commentary on the First 
Alcibiades, pp. 99 i 10 Vol. III. eel. Cousin, 

VI. 

The nature of the soul is essentially unical and 
simple, but while in the sensuous sphere she develops 
certain temporary characteristics, forms or parts, viz. 
Rational, Passionate, and Appetent. As Hermeias, in 
his valuable Commentary on the Phaedrus, truly says, 
the soul here is moulded into different forms, and there 
fore the energies of the soul in connection with the 

o 

body are not the same as when she dwells among intel- 
ligibles. Mr. Archer- Hind well expresses this thought 
in the Introduction to his edition of the Phaedo: "The 
three eiftrj (forms) of the soul are not different parts or 
kinds, but only different modes of the soul s activity 
under different conditions. The two lower eidrf (forms) 
are consequent upon the conjunction of soul with mat 
ter, and their operation ceases at the separation of soul 
from matter. Soul as such is simple, she is pure 
thought; and her action, which is thinking, is simple. 
But soul immanent in matter has a complex action; 
she does not lose, at least in the higher organisms, 
all the faculty of pure thought; but she has another ac 
tion consequent on her implication with matter: this 
action we call perception or sensation. The main di 
vision is, as we have seen, dual: Xoyi6TiKov(t\\e rational) 
expressing the action of the soul by herself, aXoyov 
(the irrational) her action through the body. The naQri 
(passions) belonging to akoyov (the irrational) Plato 
classifies under the heads of QVJ.IOKI$KS (the passionate) 



,8 3 

and 7riOv/j.ijTiHov (the appetent). We see too that the 
terms of the Timseus, Oeiov (divine) and OVIJTOV (mortal), 
are abundantly justified. Soul is altogether imperish 
able: but when she enters into relation with body she 
assumes certain functions which are terminable and 
which cease when the relation comes to an end. Qvrfrov 
(mortal) then is the name given to soul acting under 
certain material conditions; and soul may in that sense 
admit the appellation, not because she ever ceases to 
exist qua soul, but because she ceases to operate qua 
emotional and appetitive soul. Soul exists in her own 
essence eternally, in her material relations but for a 
time." 1 

The celestial or aetherial soul was represented in 
symbolical writing by the butterfly; an insect which 
first appears from the egg in the shape of a grub, 
crawling upon the earth, and feeding upon the leaves of 
plants. In this state it was aptly made an emblem of 
man in his earthly form; when the aetherial vigor and 
activity of the celestial soul, the divinae particula 
mentis, was clogged and encumbered with the material 
body. In its next state, the grub becoming a chrysalis 
appeared by its stillness, torpor and insensibility a 
natural image of death, or the intermediate state be 
tween the cessation of the vital functions of the body, 
and the emancipation of the soul in the funeral pile: and 
the butterfly, breaking from this torpid chrysalis, and 
mounting in the air. afforded a no less natural image of 
the celestial soul bursting from the restraints of matter, 
and mixing again with its native aether. Like other 
animal symbols it was by degrees melted into the 
human form; the original win&lt;js only beino- retained, to 

c^&gt; J &lt;^l 

mark its meaning. So elegant an allegory would na- 

1 The English equivalents of the Greek words I have inserted, 
in parentheses. 



turally be a favorite subject of art among a refined and 
ingenious people; and it accordingly appears to have 
been more diversified and repeated by the Greek 
sculptors than almost any other which the system of 
emanations, so favorable to art, could afford. Being, 
however, a subject more applicable and interesting to 
individuals than communities, there is no trace of it 
upon any coin, though it so constantly occurs upon 
gems. R. P. Knight: An Inquiry into the Symbolical 
Language of Ancient Art and Mythology, Sec. 169. 

VII. 

And changing will never be free from toils and transforma 
tions until, by following the revolution of the same and the simi 
lar within him, he shall vanquish by reason the mob of accretions, 
tumultous and irrational, adhering to him externally and after 
wards from fire, water, air and earth, and shall return to the 
form of his first and best condition. Plato: Timasus, 42 C. 

The one salvation of the soul herself, which is ex 
tended by the Demiurgus, and which liberates her from 
the circle of generation, from abundant wandering, and 
an inefficacious life, is her return to the intellectual 
form, and a flight from every thing which naturally ad 
heres to us from generation. For it is necessary that 
the soul, which is hurled like seed into the realms of 
generation, should lay aside the stubble and bark as it 
were which she obtained from being disseminated into 
these fluctuating realms; and that, purifying herself from 
every thing circumjacent, she should become an intel 
lectual flower and fruit, delighting in an intellectual life 
instead of doxastic nutriment, and pursuing the uniform 
and simple energy of the circuit of the Same instead of 
the abundantly wandering motion of the circuit of the 
Other. For she contains each of these circles, and 
two-fold powers. And of her horses one is good, but 
the other the contrary. And one of these leads her to 
generation, but the other from generation to True Being-: 



the one likewise leads her round the genesiurgic, but 
the other round the intellectual, circle. For the circuit 
of the Same and the similar elevates to intellect and an 
intelligible nature, and to the primary and most excel 
lent habit. But this habit is that according to which the 
soul being winged governs the whole world, becoming 
assimilated to the Gods themselves. And this is the 
universal form of life in the soul, just as that is the par 
tial form when she falls into the last body, and becomes 
something belonging to an individual instead of belong 
ing to the universe. The middle of these, likewise, is 
the partial universal when she lives in conjunction with 
her middle vehicle as a citizen of generation. Dis 
missing therefore her primary habit which subsists ac 
cording to an alliance with the whole of generation, and 
laying aside the irrational nature which connects her 
with generation, likewise governing her irrational part 
by reason and leading opinion to intellect, the whole 
soul will be circularly led to a happy life from the 
wanderings about the regions of sense, which life 
those who are initiated by Orpheus in the Mysteries of 
Dionysus (Bacchus) and Kore (Proserpine) pray that 
we may obtain, to 

"Cease from the Wheel and breathe again from ill" 1 

1 Orphica: Frag 1 . 226, translated by Miss Harrison, in her 
Prolegomena to the Study of Greek Religion, p. 592, a book of 
extraordinary value and interest. The attention of the student 
of the Orphic dogmas, which are essentially the same with those 
of Pythagoras and Plato, is specially called to the text and inter 
pretation of the Orphic Tablets, which appear in this work. 

Referring to Ixion, Simplicius says, (Com. Arist. De Coelo. p. 
168, ed. Karsten), that "Zeus bound him to a wheel so that he re 
volved unceasingly with it. The fable perhaps indicates that 
Ixion undertook to acquire for himself a certain social and lofty 
powerfor this form of life is Herean but, showing him 
self unworthy of it, by the judgment of Hera he fell into an un 
real, material, and turbid form of such a power, which the cloud 



But if our soul necessarily lives well when living- ac 
cording to the circle of the Same, much more must 
this be the case with the divine souls which the Demi- 
urgus placed in the circle of the Other on account of 
their abounding in thoughts providential of the sensible 
world. It is however possible for our soul to live ac 
cording to the circle of the Same when purified, as 
Plato says. Purifying virtue, therefore, alone must 
be called the saviour of souls, since this cuts off and 
utterly obliterates material natures, and the passions 
which adhere to us from generation; separates the soul 
and leads it to intellect; and causes it to leave on earth 
the garments with which it became invested during its 
descent. For souls in descending receive from the ele 
ments different vehicles, bodies or vestments, aerial, 
aquatic, and terrestrial; and thus at last enter into this 
gross bulk. For how, without a medium, could they 
proceed into this body from immaterial spirits? Hence 
before they came into this body they possess the ir 
rational life, and its vehicle, which is prepared from 
the simple elements, and from these they become in 
vested with the mob of accretions (the genesiurgic 
body), which is so called because it is foreign to the 
connate vehicle of souls, and is composed of all-various 
vestments, which burdens souls heavily. 

signifies, he being a turbid and materialistic man. Embracing 
this phantom Ixion produced a nature (the Centaur) compounded 
of rational and irrational energies. But he was bound by Zeus 
the Demiurgus, who distributes every person according to his 
desert (worth) to the wheel of fate and generation, from which, 
according to Orpheus, it is impossible for him to be liberated, un 
less he has propitiated those Gods whom Zeus appointed to re 
lease human souls from the circle of generation, and to recover 
them from evil. * 

"The propitiation" of the Gods and the release of the soul 
follow automatically, so to speak, from repentance, the paying of 
"the penalty for deeds unrighteous," and purification, 



i8 7 

The word adhering likewise manifests the ex 
ternal circumposition of such a vehicle, and the colli 
gation to the one nature contained in it; after which 
this last body, consisting of things dissimilar and mul 
tiform, is attached to souls. For how is it possible 
that the descent should be immediately from a life 
which governs the whole world to the most partial 
form of life? For it is not joining like to like to 
connect at once this particular and indivisible outward 
man with the universe, but a prior descent into a 
medium between the two is entirely necessary; which 
medium is not a certain animal, but the supplier of 
many lives.. For the descent does not directly pro 
duce the life of a certain man, but prior to this and 
prior to the generation of an individual it produces 
the life of universal man. And as the lapse is from 
that which is incorporeal, according to which the soul 
lives in conjunction with its celestial vehicle, into 
body, and a life with body, so from this the descent 
is into a genesiurgic body, according to which the soul 
is in generation; and from this into a terrestrial body, 
according to which it lives with the testaceous body. 
Hence before it is surrounded with this last body it is 
invested with a body which connects it with all genera 
tion. And hence it then leaves this body, when it 
leaves o-eneration. But if this be so, it then received 

r&gt; 

it when it came into generation. It came however into 
generation prior to its lapse into this last body. Hence 
prior to this last body it received that vehicle, and re 
tains the latter after the dissolution of the former. It 
lives therefore in this vehicle through the whole of the 
genesiurgic period. On this account Plato calls the 
adhering mob the irrational form of life in this vehicle; 
and not that which adheres to the soul in each of its in 
carnations, because it is that which circularly invests it 
from the first. The connascent vehicle or body there- 



i88 

fore makes the soul to be mundane; the second vehicle 
causes it to be a citizen of generation; and the testa 
ceous vehicle makes it to be terrestrial. And as the 
life of souls is to the whole of generation, and the 
whole of generation to the world, so are vehicles to 
each other. With respect to the circumpositions like 
wise of the vehicles, one is perpetual and always mun 
dane; another is prior to this outward body and poster 
ior to it for it is both prior to and subsists posterior to 
it in generation and a third is then only, when it lives 
a certain partial life on the earth. Plato therefore by 
using the term adhering-, and by attaching the irrational 
nature to the soul, according to all its lives, distinguishes 
this irrational nature from this outward body, and the 
peculiar life of it. But by adding the words externally 
and afterwards he distinguishes it from the con nascent 
vehicle in which the Demiurgus made it to descend. 
Hence this vehicle, which causes the soul to be a citi 
zen of generation, is a medium between both. 

Timaeus therefore knew the vehicle of the irra 
tional life, which adheres to us prior to this outward 
body. For that this irrational and tumultous mob, 
which adheres to us from fire, earth, air and water, does 
not pertain to the first vehicle, is evident. For, again, 
this must be urged, because some of the interpreters do 
not fathom the depth of the theory of Plato concerning 
the psychical vehicles: some of them, indeed, destroy 
ing the first vehicle, are compelled to make the soul to 
be at times out of all body. But others, preserving it, 
are forced to immortalize the vehicle of the irrational 
life, neither of them separating the connate from the 
adherent vehicle, the prior from the posterior, and that 
which was fashioned by the one Demiurgus, from that 
which was woven to the soul by the many demiurgi, 
though these are clearly distinguished by Plato. It is 
evident therefore that this irrational mob is not in the 



connate vehicle of the soul, into which the Demiurgus 
caused the soul to enter, for Plato clearly says that "// 
adhered to the soul afterwards! It is likewise manifest 
that neither is it the life in the testaceous body: for if it 
was, how is it that he says that the soul in changing its 
bodies will not be free from toils and transformations un 
til it subdues the tumultuous and irrational mob, which af 
terwards adhered to it? He says therefore that the soul 
exchanges one life for another, and that the irrational 
mob adhered to but is not connate with it. For this 
would be to change that which is appropriate and allied 
to it. Hence in each of the lives of the soul there is 
not a mutation of the irrational life, as there is of bod 
ies. This life therefore is different from the entelecheia, 
which is one in each body, and inseparable from it. For 
the one is inherent, descending with us into the realms of 
generation; but the other is changed together with bod 
ies, from which it is inseparable. Hence Timaeus knew 
that the irrational life is different from the life of the first 
vehicle, and from the life of the last body. It is dif 
ferent from the former, because he calls it posterior, and 
from the latter, because it is not changed in conjunction 
with the outward body. For it is necessary that the 
soul should subdue it, when it is present to it. For the 
soul is separated from the entelecheia of the body, and 
changing its bodies between the life of the ethereal ve 
hicle and the life of the testaceous body it accomplishes 
the genesiurgic circuit. It is however disturbed by the 
irrational life. But to the rejection of such vehicles as 
these, which are mentioned by Plato, who particularly 
names each of the elements, the philosophic life indeed, 
as he says, contributes; but in my opinion the telestic 
art is most efficacious for this purpose, through divine 
fire obliterating all the stains arising from generation, 
as the Oracles teach us, and likewise every thing for 
eign, which the spirit and the irrational nature of the 



iqo 

soul have attracted to themselves. Proclus: Commen 
tary on the Timseus, pp. 296 sq. Vol. III. ed. Diehl. 

VIII. 
Fragments of Ammonius Saccas. 

Ammonias Saccas, the famous teacher of Plotinus, 
lived about 175 250 A. D. He was surnamed Saccas, 
(ffaxxas, a sack-bearer), because his first vocation was 
that of a carrier of goods from the port of Alexandria, 
Egypt. Theodoret tells us that Ammonius, abandon 
ing the sacks in which he carried grain, embraced the 
life of a philosopher. His parents were Christians, and 
he was brought up as a Christian, but when, says Por 
phyry, "he began to think for himself, and came in con 
tact with philosophy, he straightway changed to the 
Hellenic faith." According to Hierocles, says Bayle, 
none but men governed by a spirit of contradiction and 
an itching desire of disputation, or by their prejudices 
and the darkness of their minds, found any disagree 
ment between the doctrines of Plato and Aristotle: 
"some voluntarily giving themselves up to strife and 
madness, others enslaved by prejudice and ignorance. 
There were a great number of the first kind of these 
disputants until at length the wisdom of Ammonius, 
who was called OeodidaxToS (taught by God), illlumi- 
nated the world. For he, having purified the doctrines 
of the ancient philosophers, and having removed from 
each all the useless and trifling incrustations, demon 
strated that in all fundamental and necessary dogmas 
Plato and Aristotle were at one." (Hierocles in the 
Bibliotheca of Photius, no. 214 p. 171 Vol. I. ed. Bek- 
ker). Again: "Many of the nominal followers of Plato 
and Aristotle wrangled with each other so unscrupu 
lously about the dogmas of their respective masters 
that they even corruptedf the writings of their teachers 
f This is an interesting- historical fact, but it seems to have es- 



in order to show the opposition between them. And 
this disgraceful innovation in philosophical discussions 
continued until the time of the divinely-taught Am- 
monius. He, impelled by a divine impulse to search 
for philosophic truth, despised the opinions of the many 
who had brought much discredit on philosophy, and en- 

caped the notice of the historians of philosophy. In the works of 
Aristotle there are only a few sentences and passages which ap 
parently contradict the doctrines of Plato, and these may be cor 
ruptions of the original text made by the crowd of philosophasters 
who were intent on representing him as an opponent of his 
Master. They of course changed or interpolated the Aristotelian 
and Platonic text only to the extent that it was necessary to ef 
fect their purpose, and they shrewdly made the contradiction of 
Plato by Aristotle more apparent than otherwise, since this would 
cause less suspicion, relying on the fact that the ordinary reader 
or student never penetrates beyond the surface meaning. But 
these imposters and rascals reckoned without their host in the 
case of philosophers of insight, like Ammonius Saccas, Plotinus, 
Syrianus, etc., who were not prevented by a corrupt text from 
apprehending the essential harmony of Plato and Aristotle. (It 
is morally certain that the corruptions were made chiefly in the 
text of Aristotle, because the writings of Plato had been much 
more carefully preserved and transmitted, and it was therefore 
more difficult to change them.) In examining the alleged an 
tagonism of Aristotle to Plato we should always remember that 
many of the books of Aristotle are lost, and that the text of those 
which remain is in a more or less imperfect condition. The 
MSS. of his works, says Prof. Sandys, (History of Classical Lit 
erature, p. 86 Vol. I.), after the capture of Athens by Sulla in 
86 B. C., were transported from Athens to Rome, where they 
were consulted by scholars such as Tyrannion, Andronicus, and 
others; but, owing to long neglect, many of them had become il 
legible, and the copies made after they had passed into the 
hands of Apellicon were disfigured with unskilful conjectures 
and restorations." That "the principal doctrines of Aristotle are 
conformable to those of Plato, and that he differs from his divine 
Master in appearance only and not in reality," is conclusively 
shown by Thomas Taylor, in his elaborate and very valuable Dis 
sertation on the Philosophy of Aristotle, (London, 1812), which 
f heartily commend to all who are interested in this question. 



192 

tered profoundly into the thought of Plato and Aris 
totle, thereby perceiving that they were of one and the 
same mind on all essential points, and imparted a philos 
ophy free from discord and contention to all his aud- 
tors, and especially to his best disciples, Plotinus and 
Origen, and their successors." (Hierocles in the Bibli- 
otheca of Photius, no. 251.) Ammonius taught orally 
only: he never committed his doctrines to writing. He 
was a teacher of remarkable genius, ability and insight, 
and some of the most gifted men of the age were 
among his hearers. Plotinus, after attending many 
philosophic schools with extreme dissatisfaction, when 
he heard Ammonius discourse exclaimed joyfully, 
"this is the man I have been seeking," and became his 
attentive pupil for eleven years. The teachings of Am 
monius were preserved in the works of his disciples, 
and the record of his lectures. It is probable that many 
of his auditors made accurate reports or memoranda of 
his lectures as they were delivered, for their own use 
and that of their friends. Partial reports of two of his 
lectures, on the nature of the soul and its union with 
the body, are preserved by Nemesius in his book, On 
the Nature of Man, (jrspi cpvoecdS AvOpGOTrov). There is 
no reason to doubt their authenticity or their faithful 
transmission to the age of Nemesius, and they are well 
worthy of the reputation of Ammonius as a great 
thinker. The following English version of these frag 
mentary reports, which seem to be complete, however, 
so far as they go, will doubtlesss be acceptable to the 
student of genuine philosophy.* 

* For this translation I am indebted to my daughter, 
Helen M, Johnson, A. M, 

An English version of Nemesius work by George Wither, a 
poet, satirist and political writer, was published in 1636. His 
knowledge of Greek was limited, and his ignorance of Philosophy 
was unlimited. It is said that Sir John Denham went to King 



1 93 

Charles II and begged him not to hang Wither, (who was im 
prisoned and in danger of losing his life), because "whilest G. 
W. lived he should not be the worst poet in England." 

I. 

Bodies, being by their very nature mutable, wholly 
dissoluble and infinitely divisible, nothing remaining in 
them which is immutable, need a principle to bring them 
together, to join them, to bind and hold them in unity, 
and this principle we call the soul. Now, if the soul is 
a body of any kind, even if it is the most subtle or re 
fined, what again is that which holds it together? For 
it has been shown that every body requires a connect 
ing and binding- principle to hold it tog-ether, and this 
will be true of every body ad infinitum. until we reach 
an incorporeal principle. If they should say, as the 
Stoics do, for instance, that there is a certain tense mo 
tion in or about bodies, extending at the same time 
to the internal and external parts of bodies, and that 
this motion tending outward is the cause of quantities 
and qualities, and tending inward is the cause of 
unity and essence, then we must ask them, since ev 
ery motion proceeds from some power, what is this 
power, and in what lies its essence? If this power is a 
certain matter, we will again use the same arguments. 
If it is not matter but a material thing for a material 
thing is different from matter, since that which partici 
pates of matter is called material what then is that 
which participates of matter? Is it matter or some 
thing immaterial? If it is matter, how can it be ma 
terial and not matter? * If it is not matter, it is there- 

* The materialists, driven from their position that the soul 
was matter, alleged that it was a material principle, or a prin 
ciple inherent in matter. But this opinion is no more tenable 
than the other. Either this principle is matter, or it is imma 
terial. If they say that it is matter, they involve themselves in 
a contradiction, since they have affirmed that the soul is not mat- 



94 

ter but a material principle, and therefore their argument be 
comes an absurdity, because it maintains that this material prin 
ciple is matter since it must be either matter or immaterial 
without being matter. But if this material principle is matter, 
their opinion is wholly destroyed by the preceding arguments: if, 
on the contrary, this principle is not matter, it is immaterial; and 
if it is immaterial, it is not a body.- Dehaut. 

fore immaterial: if it is immaterial, it is not a body, for 
every body is material. If they should say that bodies 
have the three dimensions, and that the soul extending 
through the whole body likewise has the three dimen 
sions, and is therefore necessarily a body, we will re 
ply that every body has the three dimensions, but that 
every thing having the three dimensions is not a body: 
for quantity and quality, which are incorporeal in their 
nature, are accidentally capable of increase or diminu 
tion, if they are in a thing which has magnitude. And 
so it is with the soul, which in its essence or nature has 
no dimensions, but accidentally is considered to have 
three dimensions by reason of its connection with the 
body, because that has three dimensions. Moreover, 
every body is moved (acted upon), either from without 
or from within: but if from without, it will be inanimate; 
if from within, it will be animate. If the soul is a body, 
if it is moved from without, it will be inanimate, if 
from within, it will be animate. But it is absurd to as 
sert that the soul is both inanimate and animate, and 
therefore the soul is not a body. Further, the soul if it 
is nurtured, is nurtured by the incorporeal, for the sci 
ences nurture it: no body is nurtured by the incor 
poreal, therefore the soul is not a body. 

II. 

We must now investigate how the union of the 
soul and an inanimate body arises. Ammonius, the 
teacher of Plotinus, solved the question in this way. 

He said that intelligible things have such a na- 



95 

ture that, when they are united to the things which 
are able to receive them, they are not changed like 
corruptible things, but remain distinct and indestruct 
ible, just like things which are laid side by side. With 
respect to bodies, union with each other changes them 
entirely, because they are changed into other bodies, 
just as the elements are changed into compound bodies, 
nourishment into blood, blood into flesh and the other 
parts of the body. As to intelligible natures, union 
may arise but there is no change of essence as a 

result: for an intelligible tiling by reason of its na- 

. . 

ture does not change its essence, but it either departs 

or vanishes into non existence, but its nature does not 
admit of change. Nor is it corruptible into non-exist 
ence, for in this case it would not be immortal. The 
soul, being life itself, if it was changed in the mixture 
or union would be different and no longer life. But 
what advantage would the soul be to the bod) , unless it 
supplied life to it? The soul therefore is not changed 
essentially in the union. Thus, it having been demon 
strated that intelligible natures are immutable in es 
sence, it necessarily follows that they do not perish with 
the things to which they are united. The soul is in 
timately united to the body, but yet remains totally dis 
tinct. That it is united to the body, sympathy with the 
body shows; for the whole animal sympathizes with 
itself as one being, that it remains distinct is evident 
from the fact that in a certain way the soul can with 
draw from the body in sieep and, leaving it lying like a 
corpse, the body only preserving in itself the breath of 
life, in order that it may not wholly perish, it acts by 
and of itself in dreams, foretelling the future, and ap 
proaching intelligible things. The same thing happens 
when the soul by and of itself apprehends any intelli 
gible nature: for then as much as possible the soul sep 
arates itself from the bodv, and isolates itself, in order 



that thereby it may rise to the knowledge of real be 
ings. For being incorporeal it separates itself from the 
whole body as from things which are wholly corruptible, 
but yet remains indestructible and distinct and, preserv 
ing its own unity, and changing the things wherein it 
abides by its own life and yet not being changed by 
them, just as the Sun by its presence changes the air 
into light, making it luminous, and the light is united to 
the air, and yet the Sun at the same time remains dis 
tinct and unmingled, so, in the same way, the soul be 
ing united to the body remains absolutely distinct, dif 
fering from the Sun, however, in this, that the Sun be 
ing a body and circumscribed by place, is not itself ev 
erywhere that its light is, and it is the same with fire, 
for it remains confined in the wood or in a wick as in a 
certain place. But the soul, being incorporeal and un- 
circumscribed by place, passes as a whole both through 
its own light and the whole body wherein it is, and 
there is no part lighted by it in which it is not totally 
present: for it is not dominated by the body, but domi 
nates the body. Nor is it in the body as in a jar or 
bag, but rather the body is in it: for intelligible natures 
are not hindered by corporeal, but enter, penetrate and 
pass through every body, and cannot possibly be re 
strained by corporeal place, because, since they are 
intelligible, they are in intelligible places: for they are 
either in themselves, or in intelligible natures which are 
above. Thus as the soul is then in itself when it reasons, 
so it is in intellect when it thinks. And when it is 
said to be in the body, it is not said to be in the body 
as if it was in a place, but to be as it were in a certain 
relation to the body, and to be present to it in such a 
way as God is said to be present in us. For we say 
that the soul is bound to the body by a certain rela 
tion or habitude, inclination and disposition, as the 
lover is bound to the object of his love: not corporeally 



97 

nor locally, but by their relation. For since the soul is 
an essence without size, magnitude or parts, it is su 
perior to any place circumscribed according to parts. 
As it has no parts, in what place could it be enclosed? 
Place is coexistent with magnitude, for place is the 
boundary of that which contains, inasmuch as it holds 
that which is contained. If any one should say, then 
my soul is in Alexandria and in Rome, and every 
where, he does not notice that he really says "place" 
again: for the words in Alexandria and here and 
there, or every where, designate place. But the soul 
is nowhere in any respect as in a place, but only in a 
certain relation; for it has been demonstrated that it 
cannot be enclosed in a place. Whenever therefore an 
intelligible nature is said to be in relation to some 
place, or thing which is in a place, we are guilty of an 
abuse of language in saying that it itself is there, be 
cause as a fact only its activity is there, we assuming 
the place for the relation and the activity of it. To 
speak accurately we should say, "it acts there," not that 
."it is there." 



8 



APPENDIX, 



Prop. XCVII. 



The Cause of all. 




Being. 
Hyparxis. 
Series. 




Cause of Life. 

Cause of Intellect. 



Life. ff/ V-* /N V , 
Hy,,-xi,(f -J^L^J Cause or Sou! 

Series. 
Hyparxis 

Series \ Intellect. ,$/ VJ/ \%\ 

Wholes consis- \ Hyparxis.i/ J e // \/ 
ting of parts. \ Series. \^~^^^_^-) 
"s7ul. (// \l// 
HyparxisV Sou!s A/ 7 ^ 
Series. 



Cause: 

Progression. 

Wholes prior 

to parts. 



Paradigms. 




The diagram points to causes giving 1 subsistence to 
natures in a two- fold manner, viz: the causes according 
to an order in the progression of causes, and the causes 
according to an order subsisting in each series or 
causal chain. 

In the four interlacing triangles, each containing 
three circles, the circle at the apex of the triangle repre 
sents a leading cause; the circle at the base, to the right, 
representing a secondary cause in the order of progres 
sion; and the circle to the left represents a secondary or 
der of natures subsisting according to the series. For in 
stance, the upper circle in the upper triangle represents 
Being. Being is the cause of Life. In the circle to the 



199 

right, life is represented as in the order of progression. 
And to the left the circle represents beings. The 
series of beings proceed from Being, for Being is the 
leader in the cause of beings; Life, of lives: Intellect, of 
intellects: Soul, of souls: Body, of bodies. 

The circles at the apex of each triangle represent, 
(i) causes according to imparticipable natures (2) 
causes according to self-subsistent natures (3) causes 
according to hyparxis. Natures proceeding from im 
participable causes subsist according to wholes consist 
ing of parts. Natures proceeding in the order of pro 
gression subsist according to self-subsistent causes. And 
natures proceeding according to hyparxis subsist in the 
series. 



Principles. 

Imparticipable 

Natures 

are 
Unbegotten. 



Prop. XCIX The One, 

Imparticipable 
Superessential 
Supervital 
Superintellectual 

Imparticipable Being. 
Being ) 

Life &gt; Essentially. 
Intellect \ 

Imparticipable Life. 
Being i 
Life [ vitally. 
Intellect \ 

Imparticipable Intellect. 
Being i 

Life v intellectually. 
Intellect ) 

Imparticipable Soul. 
Being i 

Life &gt; Pnychically. 
Intellect ) 

Imparticipabie Body. 
Being I 

Life ) Supernally. 

Intellect \ 

Primary causes subsist imparticipably. The One 
is the primary cause of all things, hence The One is the 
first imparticipable. The One is truly unbegotten, for 
there is no other prior, nor beyond. The One is truly 
the principle of all things, for the multitude subsists 
secondary to that which primarily subsists in The One. 

Of the multitude, some things are first, and with 



All Imparticipables 
emimite from the one. 




2OO 

reference to the First of things; others subsist secondary; 
and, again, others, the last of things. Hence there sub 
sists in the multitude an order of progression. But the 
principle of this progression subsists primarily in The 
One. For, as The One is to the multitude, or as the 
primary is to the secondary, so is that which is first in 
things, or primary in things, to that which is secondary 
in the multitude of things. The principle of ratio sub 
sists in a cause which is the same in all ratios, that is, 
imparticipably. But if the first imparticipable, The One, 
is unbegotten, then, by reason of one principle, all im- 
participables are unbegotten. 

ERRATA AND ADDENDA. 

P. 8 line 9: erase other . 

P. 13 line 24: after them put a period, 

P. 1 6 line 13: for s read 7 

P. 1 6 line 28: for !1 read 8 

P. 20 line 13: for n read 10 

P. 24 line 2 i : after it insert, is. 

P. 49 line 3: destroy comma after things. 1 

P. 49 line 22: for naturee read, natures. 

P. 78 line 13: for perpetuitity read, perpetuity. 

P. 128 last line: for Ane read, And. 

P. 137: For CLXXXVIII. read CLXXXVII. 

P. 140 line 8: after that insert, it. 

P. 157 line 14: after Further put a , 

P. 157 line 29: before There place " instead, of 

P. 172: in note 4 destroy parenthetical marks. 

Obvious misprints are not corrected. 

To note 24, p. 50, add: A revised reprint of Tay 
lor s translation of this book appeared in Vol. I. nos. n 
and 12 of The Platonist. and a new version by the late 
Prof. Thomas Davidson, a scholar of remarkable attain 
ments, was published in no. 4 of the Bibliotheca Pla- 



20 f 



tonica. The best edition of the text is that by Creuzer, 
Heidelberg, 1814, with valuable and copious notes. 

To note beginning- on p. 190, add: See on this 
point also the rare and valuable work of Stephanus 
Theupolus, Academicarum Contemplatiomim Libri 
Decem, (Venet., 1576). 



O 
O 



JH 
-P 



to 

P 

c 



a 

0) 



CO 



o o 

O H 



Q PH 

crj 

CO -P 

3 0&gt; O 

H S W 

O G 
O ^ 

JH O 



CO 

H 
bO 
CD 
O5 



UNIVERSITY OF TORONTO 
LIBRARY 




Acme Library Card Pocket 

Under Pat. " Ref. Index File." 
Made by LIBRARY BUREAU 




